TapBlaze
Home
About
Games
Careers
x
PRIVACY POLICY
TapBlaze, LLC (“Company”, “We", “TapBlaze” or "Lai Systems, LLC") respects the privacy rights of our users and are committed to protecting the information collected through its online products, online services and websites including, but not limited to TapBlaze’s games (together “Services”). TapBlaze has adopted this privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) to explain how TapBlaze collects, stores, and uses the information collected in connection with TapBlaze’s Services.
Website Log Files and Cookies
This website utilizes industry standard analytic packages which gathers limited information on visitors to our website automatically, and stores this anonymous information in server log files. This information may include IP addresses, browser type, basic IP information, referring pages, operating system used and date/time stamps. This information does not identify individual users; it is used only for site administration, as well as for analysis of website usage and trends.
The TapBlaze website does not use any non-technical cookies.
Links to Other Websites
This website may contain links to other sites that are not controlled in any way by us. Please be aware of this when you click on any such links; we are not responsible for the privacy practices and/or policies of any website other than our own. Consequently, we strongly suggest that you review the privacy policy of every website you visit, whether or not they are linked to by our own site.
Registration and Use of Personal Information
Registration is not required in order to use or access this website. However, this site may make forums, blogs, message boards or similar available to its users. You may be required to register for these features, particularly if you wish to leave comments or provide articles. In addition, this site collects personal information when:
You request support for a TapBlaze product;
You submit questions or comments to us.
The types of personal information collected may include (but are not limited to):
Your first and last name;
Your e-mail address;
If you do contact us for questions or comments, please rest assured that any such information you provide will not be shared with any third-party organization except with your express consent.
BY INSTALLING, USING, REGISTERING TO OR OTHERWISE ACCESSING THE SERVICES, YOU AGREE TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY AND GIVE AN EXPLICIT AND INFORMED CONSENT TO THE PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PRIVACY POLICY. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY, PLEASE DO NOT INSTALL, USE, REGISTER TO OR OTHERWISE ACCESS THE SERVICES. TapBlaze reserves the right to modify this Privacy Policy at reasonable times, so please review it frequently. If TapBlaze makes material or significant changes to this Privacy Policy, TapBlaze may post a notice on TapBlaze’s website along with the updated Privacy Policy.  Your continued use of Services will signify your acceptance of the changes to this Privacy Policy.
Being compliance with applicable data protection laws is our top priority and this Policy is updated to be compliance with the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) and the California Customer Privacy Act (“CCPA”).
Our Policy Regarding Children Under 16 (Global)
We do not knowingly collect or solicit personal information from anyone under the age of 16 or knowingly allow such persons to use our Service.  If you are under 16, please do not send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, email address or any other personal information.  No one under the age of 16 may provide any personal information.  If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under the age of 16, please contact us
here
.
Please note that in-game advertising in TapBlaze games and apps deemed directed to children under the age of thirteen (16), including without limitation the following mobile apps: My Pizza Shop, My Pizza Shop 2 (collectively, “Kids Apps”) are only CONTEXTUAL.
Our Policy Regarding Children Under 16 (EU, EEA, Switzerland, United Kingdom, and California Residents)
We do not knowingly collect or solicit personal information from anyone under the age of 16 or knowingly allow such persons to use our Service.  If you are under 16, please do not send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, email address or any other personal information.  No one under the age of 16 may provide any personal information.  If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under the age of 16, please contact us
here
.
Please note that in-game advertising in TapBlaze games and apps deemed directed to children under the age of sixteen (16), including without limitation the following mobile apps: My Pizza Shop, My Pizza Shop 2 (collectively, “Kids Apps”) are only CONTEXTUAL.
Non-Personal Data
For purposes of this Privacy Policy, “non-personal data” means information that does not directly identify you. Additionally, non-personal data means “aggregate” and “de-personalized” information, which is data TapBlaze collects about the use of TapBlaze Services, from which any personally identifiable data has been removed.
TapBlaze may use tools or third party analytical software to automatically collect and use certain non-personal data that does not directly enable TapBlaze to identify you. The types of non-personal data TapBlaze may collect and use include, but are not limited to:
(i) device properties; (model, service provider information, OS information, language and country information);
(ii) device software platform and firmware;
(iii) mobile phone carrier;
(iv) geographical data (coarse geo-location data);
(v) game activity and achievements (scores, credits, access logs, improper usage record and fraud detection information);
(vi) other non-personal data as reasonably required by TapBlaze to enhance the Services and other TapBlaze products and services such as domain name, browser type, operating system device type and other statistical or technical information related to your device.
TapBlaze may use and disclose to TapBlaze’s partners and contractors the collected non-personal data for purposes of analyzing usage of the Services, advertisement serving, managing and providing the Services and to further develop the Services and other TapBlaze services and products.
You recognize and agree that the analytics companies (Analytics and Attribution Technology section) utilized by TapBlaze may combine the information collected with other information they have independently collected from other services or products relating to your activities. These companies collect and use information under their own privacy policies.
Non-personal data may be kept up to a period of 3 years or until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Personal Data
For purposes of this Privacy Policy, “personal data” means personally identifiable information that specifically identifies you as an individual.
Likely situations when you make personal data available to TapBlaze include, but are not limited to:
(i) registration for Services, contests and special events;
(ii) accessing Services using a third party ID, such as social networking sites or gaming services;
(iii) subscribing to newsletters;
(iv) purchasing a product or services through TapBlaze’s online stores;
(v) using “tell a friend,” “email this page,” or other similar features;
(vi) requesting technical support; and
(vii) otherwise through use of TapBlaze Services where personal data is required for use and/or participation.
Registration & Profile Information
The types of personal data may vary depending on the type of activity you are engaged in. The personal data TapBlaze may collect, process and use may include, but are not limited to:
(i) Apple account: The value of the member identifier;
(ii) Google account: Member identifier value, profile picture, profile name;
(iii) Facebook account: Member identifier value, profile picture, profile name;
(iv) your name, screen/nick name;
(v) TapBlaze Services or third party service ID;
(vi) e-mail address, phone number;
(vii) photo or other image;
(viii) birthdate, sex, address;
(ix) friend connections, avatar image;
(x) shipping information.
Use of Personal Information and Legal Grounds
TapBlaze may use collected personal data for purposes of analyzing usage of the Services, providing customer and technical support, managing and providing Services (including managing advertisement serving) and to further develop the Services and other TapBlaze services and products. TapBlaze may combine non-personal data with personal data.
We use your information, including your personal information, for the following purposes and based on the following legal grounds:
(i) To enter into and execute the agreement with you:
- For account registration purposes;
- To provide and operate the Services.
(ii) Service Providers:
- Third-party vendors, service providers, contractors or agents that perform functions on our behalf may be outside your home country.
(iii) For the purposes of our legitimate business interests:
- To respond to your requests, complaints and communications, to verify your identity, to process your transactions, to provide technical support and troubleshooting, and for other customer service purposes;
- To develop new products and services;
- For member identification, fraud prevention, and detection of improper usage;
- Notification of activities to friends, user search & sign-up;
- To tailor the content and information that we may send or display to you, to offer personalized content and to assist us in advertising our services;
- To send you event information, marketing messages and advertisements;
- To better understand how users access and use our Services, to respond to user desires and preferences, and for other research and analytical purposes;
- To administer our contests;
- To protect our rights and the rights, health and safety of others;
- To determine, exercise or defend our legal position and rights.
(iv) To comply with our legal obligations:
- Where required by law or legal process;
- To comply with a binding request.
All personal information may be kept up to a period of 3 years or until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Entrusted Service Providers
The service providers we may share your personal information with include:
Entrusted Service Provider
Purpose
Data Retention
Zendesk
Customer support for players 16+
Until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Knownhost
Server partner to provide game services.
Until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Shopify
Physical merchandise e-commerce platform.
Until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Privacy policies for each of these entrusted service providers are provided as follows:
Zendesk:
https://www.zendesk.com/company/privacy-and-data-protection/
Knownhost:
https://www.knownhost.com/privacy-policy
Shopify:
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy/customers
Third Party Account Data
TapBlaze may use your personal data to send messages to you with informative and/or commercial content about TapBlaze’s services or third party products and services TapBlaze thinks may be of interest to you, such as new features and services, special offers and updated information.
Please note that certain features of the Services may be able to connect to your social networking sites to obtain additional information about you. In such cases, TapBlaze may be able to collect certain information from your social networking profile when your social networking site permits it, and when you consent to allow your social networking site to make that information available to TapBlaze.
The personal information we collect when you login via a Third Party Account may depend on your privacy settings for that Third Party Account.
We don’t control how such third parties collect, use and share your personal information. You should review the relevant third party privacy policy for more information.
This information may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Profile: We may collect your name, profile picture, gender, user ID, email address, your country, your language, your time zone, the organizations and links on your profile page, the names and profile pictures of your social networking site “friends” and other information you have included in your social networking site profile;
(ii) Purchases: If you make a purchase within the Services through the relevant store, we may collect and maintain your purchase history and details however, we do not receive your credit card number;
(iii) Customer Service: We may collect emails, chat records, attachments and customer opinions for customer consultation, handling complaints and other business, delivering announcements, and performing customer support tasks;
(iv) Other Automatically Collected Info: Device Identifiers. We may collect IP information, advertising ID, application ID or other identifiers.
Third party account data may be kept up to a period of 3 years or until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Third Party Data Collection and Use of End-User Information
When you use or connect to a TapBlaze website or download a TapBlaze mobile application by or through a Third Party Platform—including Facebook—you allow us to access and/or collect certain information from your Third Party Platform profile/account. You additionally allow us to access information contained in cookies placed on your device by the Third Party Platform as permitted by the terms of your agreement and privacy settings with the Third Party Platform. We may share this information with the Third Party Platform for their use as permitted by the terms of your agreement and privacy settings with the Third Party Platform.
We will share some of the information we collect from you with vendors and other service providers who work with us to support the internal operations of our website and/or mobile application. For example, we use a third-party service for ad tracking and to help us prepare website and mobile application analytics.
Our third-party ad tracking and analytics company never sends emails, notifications, or other communications to our end users. If you would like to opt out of third-party ad tracking and analytics, please visit
here
. Your choice to opt out of ad tracking and analytics services does not limit our ability to email you or collect other information.
TAPBLAZE ID
Some games allow players to restore their progress by using their email to register for a TapBlaze ID. Games with Age Gates only allow the creation of a TapBlaze ID if the user is NOT under 16. The email address is ONLY used for retrieving your game progress and for no other purpose. In addition, all email addresses are hashed. If you no longer want to have your email associated with a TapBlaze ID for game progress saving, please contact us
here
and your progress and email will be deleted within 48 hours. Please mention "TAPBLAZE ID Deletion" in your email subject.
Data collected for TapBlaze ID may be kept up to a period of 3 years or until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Ad Serving Technology
Mobile games and applications which are not directed to children under the age of thirteen (13) ("General Apps") may display advertisements, in various formats (such as banners, interstitials, rewarded videos, etc.) from third party ad networks. Please note that if you click on any of these advertisements, the advertisers may use cookies and other web-tracking technologies to collect data regarding advertisement performance, your interaction with such ads and your interests (which may include, non-personal and/or personal information (such as, device and network information, unique identifiers, gender, age and geo-location) in order to serve you advertisements and for the legitimate business interests of such third party ad networks. We recommend that you review the terms of use and privacy policy of any 3rd party advertisers with whom you are interacting before doing so. Their privacy policy, not ours, will apply to any of those interactions. The third party ad networks which may display advertisements in our “General Apps” are as follows:
Admob (Google):
https://support.google.com/admob/answer/6128543?hl=en#
Applovin:
https://www.applovin.com/privacy/
Chartboost:
https://support.chartboost.com/en/legal/privacy-policy
Digital Turbine (Fyber):
https://www.digitalturbine.com/privacy-policy/
Ironsource:
https://developers.is.com/ironsource-mobile/air/ironsource-mobile-privacy-policy/
Meta:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/center
https://accountscenter.facebook.com/ad_preferences
Mintegral:
https://www.mintegral.com/en/privacy/#privacy-policy-of-the-mintegral-services
Pangle:
https://www.pangleglobal.com/privacy/enduser-en
TapJoy:
https://dev.tapjoy.com/en/legal/Privacy-Policy
Unity:
https://unity.com/legal/game-player-and-app-user-privacy-policy
https://unity.com/legal/game-player-and-app-user-privacy-faq
Liftoff (Vungle):
https://vungle.com/privacy/
Analytics and Attribution Technology
For internal operations and to further improve our products, we use Firebase for analytics and crash reporting data:
https://policies.google.com/privacy#infochoices
To obtain user for some of our games, we use paid advertising. To attribute installs, post install events (i.e. in-app purchases) we have partnered up with an attribution provider, Singular:
https://www.singular.net/privacy-policy/
.
Disclosure and Transfer of Personal Data
TapBlaze collects and processes personal data on a voluntary basis and it is not in the business of selling your personal data to third parties. Personal data may, however, occasionally be disclosed in accordance with applicable legislation and this Privacy Policy. Additionally, TapBlaze may disclose personal data to its parent companies and its subsidiaries in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
TapBlaze may hire agents and contractors to collect and process personal data on TapBlaze’s behalf and in such cases such agents and contractors will be instructed to comply with our Privacy Policy and to use personal data only for the purposes for which the third party has been engaged by TapBlaze. These agents and contractors may not use your personal data for their own marketing purposes. TapBlaze may use third party service providers such as credit card processors, e-mail service providers, shipping agents, data analyzers and business intelligence providers. TapBlaze has the right to share your personal data as necessary for the aforementioned third parties to provide their services for TapBlaze. TapBlaze is not liable for the acts and omissions of these third parties, except as provided by mandatory law.
TapBlaze may disclose your personal data to third parties as required by law enforcement or other government officials in connection with an investigation of fraud, intellectual property infringements, or other activity that is illegal or may expose you or TapBlaze to legal liability. TapBlaze may also disclose your personal data to third parties when TapBlaze has a reason to believe that a disclosure is necessary to address potential or actual injury or interference with TapBlaze’s rights, property, operations, users or others who may be harmed or may suffer loss or damage, or TapBlaze believes that such disclosure is necessary to protect TapBlaze’s rights, combat fraud and/or comply with a judicial proceeding, court order, or legal process served on TapBlaze.
General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
For users in the EU, EEA, and UK, our services are by default data opted-out.
If you wish to exercise your data rights related to GDPR, please contact us at privacy@tapblaze.com for the following:
(i) Request a copy of your personal data in electronic format
(ii) Request a deletion of all your personal data
Your request will be processed within 30 business days.
Your Tracking Options and California Do Not Track Disclosures
You may adjust your browser or operating system settings to limit certain tracking through cookies or other identifiers or to decline cookies.  Check the “Help” menu of your browser or operating system to learn how to adjust your tracking settings or cookie preferences. Note that our system may not recognize Do Not Track (DNT) headers or requests from some or all browsers. Please note our Shopify store has the setting "Limit data collection for customers residing in California is Activated."
CCPA rights (California residents)
If you are a California resident, you can request access to or that we or delete your personal information at any time. Please note that, under certain circumstances, we have the right to impose a small fee for access and disclosure of your personal information where permitted under applicable law, which will be communicated to you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under California law.  For example, we may retain certain information for legal compliance and to secure our Services.
California law requires us to disclose information about the types of personal information we collect and how we use them, the types of sources from which we collect personal information, and the third-parties with whom we share personal information. We have provided detailed descriptions above in the “Registration and Use of Personal Information,” “Non-Personal Data,” “Personal Data,” and "Third Party Data Collection," "Ad Serving Technology," "Attribution Technology," and "Use of End-User Information" sections of this Privacy Policy.
Generally, we collect the following categories of personal and non-personal information, as defined by applicable California law:
a. Identifiers and contact information, including first and last name, username or handle, third party service ID, IP address, unique device identifier, advertising identifier, device serial number, email address, and phone number;
b. Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as device model, device OS, mobile carrier, preferred languages, device motion information, and mobile network information;
c. Commercial information, including in-game purchase information when applicable;
d. Demographic information, including your gender, age, date of birth, and language;
e. Non-precise geolocation information, such as approximate location as inferred from IP address;
f. Other information you may share if you use social features when accessing our services.
TapBlaze does not engage in “sales” of player personal information as defined by applicable California law.
If you are a California resident seeking to exercise your CCPA rights, please (i) email us at privacy@tapblaze.com, (ii) visit our website
here
and complete the webform, or (iii) use the support option in our games to contact us to exercise your rights under the CCPA. Please follow these instructions when contacting us for CCPA:
Tell us which game and which right(s) you wish to exercise. Under CCPA, you have the right to "Access your personal information", "Request deletion of your personal information", "Obtain additional details regarding TapBlaze's information practices."
Please include your city, state, and country of residence in your request. We cannot begin processing your request until you have confirmed your residence. We will only use this information in order to fulfill and document your request.
We may ask you to provide additional personal information so that we can properly identify you in our dataset and to track compliance with your opt-out request. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request. If you chose not to provide this information, we may only be able to process your request to the extent we are able to identify you in our data systems and authenticate you as authorized to receive the information.
Data Retention
We retain your data for as long as your account is active or as needed to provide you the Service. We will for example periodically de-identify unused game accounts and we regularly review and de-identify unnecessary data. Idle personal, non-personal and third party data may be kept up to a period of 3 years or until the user’s de-registration from the service, or the termination of entrustment agreement.
Personal Data
Purpose
Data Retention
Email Address
Game progress saving for players 16+
3 years from last activity or until user request to de-register.
Consumer support or complaints
Support for game operations for players 16+
3 years or until user request to de-register.
If you would like to delete your game account and cloud save from your local device, please go to the title screen > Settings > Account > Delete Account. This action will disassociate your device from our server and delete your game records, associated account and registration on your local device only. Please contact us at privacy@tapblaze.com with your TapBlaze ID and we will also delete any data on our servers, your removal request will be complete in 30 business days.
If you would like to delete your game data on your device, please go to the title screen > Settings > Erase Data. This action will disassociate your local game device from our server data and delete your game file on your local device only.
If you would like us to remove your personal, registration, profile or non-personal data for any reason, please contact us at privacy@tapblaze.com with your TapBlaze ID, player ID and email associated with your account. Upon confirming your identity and data records, your removal request will be complete in 30 business days, removing all personal, registration/ profile and non personal data from any records at TapBlaze.
This only applies to users over 16 as TapBlaze does not knowingly or intentionally collect personal information for any users under 16. TapBlaze ID is only available to users 16 or over. If you are under 16, please do not contact or provide TapBlaze any personal information.
How to Request Data Deletion
If you wish to request personal and/or non-personal data deletion, please send an email to privacy@tapblaze.com with subject line "
Data Deletion Request
." Your removal request will be complete in 30 business days.
The procedure and method of personal information destruction are as follows:
* Destruction procedure: The Company selects the personal information for which the reason for destruction occurred, and destroys the personal information with the approval of the person in charge of personal information protection.
* Destruction method: The company destroys personal information stored in the form of electronic files so that the record cannot be reproduced, and in the case of other records, printed materials, writing, or recording devices, it is destroyed by crushing or incineration with a shredder.
International Data Transfer
Information we collect may be transferred to countries outside your home country for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy.
These countries, including but not limited to the United States may not provide the same level of data privacy protection as the European Union/European Economic Area or your home country, and you hereby expressly consent to the transfer of your information to these countries for processing in accordance with this Privacy Policy. These transfers are essential to the provision of our Services and performance of the Terms of Service.
a. Personal information to be transferred overseas: email address
b. Country of transfer: United States
c. Transfer date/method: From time to time through the network
d. Person to whom personal information is transferred: TAPBLAZE, LLC (privacy@tapblaze.com), ZenDesk, Inc. (privacy@zendesk.com)
e. Purpose and period for using and retaining personal information by the person who receives personal information: For game progress saving, game support and complaints and will be retained for 3 years from last game activity or until the user’s de-registration from the service.
Your Rights and Choices
Upon request, TapBlaze will provide you with information about whether we hold any of your Personal Information. You can update or correct Personal Information (e.g., your email address) by accessing your account. You can also access or rectify your information by reaching out to us at support@tapblaze.com. You can delete your information by sending an email to privacy@tapblaze.com with your first name, last name, and the respective email addresses you would like for us to delete.
Legal Disclaimer
We reserve the right to disclose your personally identifiable information as required by law and when we believe that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights and/or to comply with a judicial proceeding, court order or legal process served on our website.
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this privacy policy, or you wish to contact us, you may do so
here
or at the following address:
TapBlaze Legal Department
11901 Santa Monica Blvd
STE 507
Los Angeles, CA 90025
NOTICE TO CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF 16 (OR UNDER THE AGE OF 16 IN THE EU, EEA, SWITZERLAND, UNITED KINGDOM, AND CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS) AND THEIR PARENTS OR LEGAL GUARDIANS: THE TAPBLAZE SITE IS INTENDED FOR ADULTS. WE DO NOT KNOWINGLY OR INTENTIONALLY COLLECT PERSONAL INFORMATION FROM ANYONE UNDER THE AGE OF 16. IF YOU ARE UNDER THE AGE OF 16, PLEASE DO NOT PROVIDE ANY PERSONAL INFORMATION TO TAPBLAZE. IF YOU KNOW OF ANYONE UNDER THE AGE OF 16 WHO HAS PROVIDED US WITH INFORMATION, PLEASE CONTACT US IMMEDIATELY AND WE WILL REMOVE THE INFORMATION.
We may revise this Privacy Policy at any time and we will update this Policy with any revisions. By continuing to access or use the Services after those changes become effective, you acknowledge and accept that your data will be handled in accordance with the revised Privacy Policy.
This privacy policy was last updated on August 29th, 2024
Privacy Policy Change History
Back Home
Back Up Top
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.zendesk.com/company/privacy-and-data-protection/:
Skip to main content
Secure Customer Service
Cover your bases
Zendesk takes security very seriously—just ask the number of
Fortune 100 and Fortune 500 companies
that trust us with their data. We use a combination of enterprise-class security features and comprehensive audits of our applications, systems, and networks to ensure that your data is protected, which means every customer can rest easy—our own included.
Security
Privacy
Zendesk AI
Legal
Compliance Certifications and Memberships
Zendesk uses best practices and industry standards to achieve compliance with industry-accepted general security and privacy frameworks, which in turn helps our subscribers meet their own compliance standards.
SOC 2 Type II
We undergo routine audits to receive updated SOC 2 Type II reports, available upon request and under NDA.
Request the latest SOC 2 Type II report
.
ISO 27001:2022
Zendesk is ISO 27001:2022 certified.
Download the certificate
.
ISO 27018:2019
Zendesk is ISO 27018:2019 certified. The certificate is available for download
here
.
ISO 27701:2019
Zendesk is ISO 27701:2019 certified. The certificate is available for download
here
.
ISO 27017:2015
Zendesk is ISO 27017:2015 certified. The certificate is available for download
here
.
FedRAMP LI-SaaS
Zendesk is FedRAMP authorized with Low Impact Software-as-a-Service (LI-SaaS) and is listed in the
FedRAMP Marketplace
. US Government agency subscribers can request access to the Zendesk FedRAMP Security Package by
completing a Package Access Request Form
or submitting a request to
fedramp@zendesk.com
.
PCI-DSS
For more information on
automatically redacting credit card numbers
or
adding a credit card identification field
HIPAA
For more information on our HIPAA program and our BAA
HDS
For more information on our HDS program
McAfee Cloud Trust - McAfee Enterprise Ready
Zendesk received the
McAfee CloudTrust Program
.  The program presents the McAfee Enterprise-Ready seal to only those services that have the highest CloudTrust™ rating possible. These are among the services that have earned McAfee's CloudTrust™ and a rating of McAfee Enterprise-Ready based on their attributes across the data, user and device, security, business, and legal evaluation categories.
Cloud Security Alliance (CSA)
Zendesk is a member of the Cloud Security Alliance (CSA), a not-for-profit organization with a mission to promote the use of best practices for providing security assurance within Cloud Computing. CSA has launched the Security, Trust & Assurance Registry (STAR), a publicly accessible registry that documents the security controls provided by various cloud computing offerings. Zendesk completed a publicly available Consensus Assessment Initiative (CAI) Questionnaire, based on the results of our due diligence self-assessment.
The CSA CAIQ is available
here
.
IT-ISAC
Zendesk is a member of
IT-ISAC
, a group focused on bringing together a diverse set of private sector companies to leverage evolving technology and have a common commitment to security. IT-ISAC enables collaboration and sharing of relevant, actionable threat intelligence information and practices. They moderate special interest groups that focus on Intelligence, Insider Threat, Physical Security, and other specific areas to help further our mission of securing Zendesk.
FIRST
Zendesk is a member of
FIRST
, an international confederation of incident response teams that cooperatively handles computer security incidents and promotes incident prevention programs. FIRST members develop and share technical information, tools, methodologies, processes and best practices. As a member of FIRST, Zendesk Security works with other members to use their combined knowledge, skills, and experience to promote a safer and more secure global electronic environment.
Financial Services Qualifications System (FSQS)
Zendesk has satisfied all requirements (Stage 1 and Stage 2) to become fully registered on the FSQS (Financial Services Qualification System) supplier qualification system, as set out by participating buying organisations. Request the latest FSQS Certificate
here
.
More details about FSQS
https://hellios.com/fsqs/
.
Artifacts
We can provide additional resources upon request.
ISO 27001:2022 certificates
ISO 27018:2019 certificate
ISO 27701:2019 certificate
ISO 27017:2015 certificate
SOC 3 Report
Datasheet / White Paper
Network Architecture Diagrams
Support/Guide
Chat
Talk
CSA CAIQ
Risk Ledger
FSQS (Financial Services Qualification System)
SIG Lite
VSA
HECVAT Lite
Get resources
The following resources may require an NDA on file. Click the button to gain access.
Certificate of Insurance
SOC 2 Type II Report
Annual Penetration Test Summary
Get resources
Cloud Security
Facilities
Zendesk hosts Service Data primarily in AWS data centers that have been certified as ISO 27001, PCI DSS Service Provider Level 1, and/or SOC 2 compliant.
Learn about Compliance at AWS
.
AWS infrastructure services include backup power, HVAC systems, and fire suppression equipment to help protect servers and ultimately your data.
Learn about Data Center Controls at AWS
.
On-Site Security
AWS on-site security includes features such as security guards, fencing, security feeds, intrusion detection technology, and other security measures.
Learn about AWS physical security
.
Data Hosting Location
Zendesk leverages AWS data centers in the United States, Europe, and Asia Pacific.
Learn about Data Hosting Locations for your Zendesk Service Data
.
Zendesk offers multiple data locality choices including the United States (US), Australia (AU), Japan (JP), or European Economic Area (EEA). For more information on product, plan, and regional offerings please see our
Regional Data Hosting Policy
.
Zendesk minimizes risks associated with third-party vendors by performing security reviews on all vendors with any level of access to our systems or Service Data.
Dedicated Security Team
Our globally distributed Security Team is on call 24/7 to respond to security alerts and events.
Protection
Our network is protected through the use of key AWS security services, integration with our Cloudflare edge protection networks, regular audits, and network intelligence technologies, which monitor and/or block known malicious traffic and network attacks.
Architecture
Our network security architecture consists of multiple security zones. More sensitive systems like database servers are protected in our most trusted zones. Other systems are housed in zones commensurate with their sensitivity, depending on function, information classification, and risk. Depending on the zone, additional security monitoring and access controls will apply. DMZs are utilized between the Internet, and internally between the different zones of trust.
Network Vulnerability Scanning
Network security scanning gives us deep insight for quick identification of out-of-compliance or potentially vulnerable systems.
Third-Party Penetration Tests
In addition to our extensive internal scanning and testing program, each year Zendesk employs third-party security experts to perform a broad penetration test across the Zendesk Production and Corporate Networks.
Security Incident Event Management
Our Security Incident Event Management (SIEM) system gathers extensive logs from important network devices and host systems. The SIEM alerts on triggers that notify the Security team based on correlated events for investigation and response.
Intrusion Detection and Prevention
Service ingress and egress points are instrumented and monitored to detect anomalous behavior. These systems are configured to generate alerts when incidents and values exceed predetermined thresholds and use regularly updated signatures based on new threats. This includes 24/7 system monitoring.
Threat Intelligence Program
Zendesk participates in several threat intelligence sharing programs. We monitor threats posted to these threat intelligence networks and take action based on risk.
DDoS Mitigation
Zendesk has architected a multi-layer approach to DDoS mitigation. A core technology partnership with Cloudflare provides network edge defenses, while the use of AWS scaling and protection tools provides deeper protection along with our use of AWS DDoS specific services.
Logical Access
Access to the Zendesk Production Network is restricted on an explicit need-to-know basis, utilizes least privilege, is frequently audited and monitored, and is controlled by our Operations Team. Employees accessing the Zendesk Production Network are required to use multiple factors of authentication.
Security Incident Response
In case of a system alert, events are escalated to our 24/7 teams providing Operations, Network Engineering, and Security coverage. Employees are trained on security incident response processes, including communication channels and escalation paths.
Encryption in Transit
All communications with Zendesk UI and APIs are encrypted via industry standard HTTPS/TLS (TLS 1.2 or higher) over public networks. This ensures that all traffic between you and Zendesk is secure during transit. Additionally for email, our product leverages opportunistic TLS by default. Transport Layer Security (TLS) encrypts and delivers email securely, mitigating eavesdropping between mail servers where peer services support this protocol. Exceptions for encryption may include any use of in-product SMS functionality, any other third-party app, integration, or service subscribers may choose to leverage at their own discretion.
Encryption at Rest
Service Data is encrypted at rest in AWS using AES-256 key encryption.
Uptime
Zendesk maintains a publicly available
system-status webpage
, which includes system availability details, scheduled maintenance, service incident history, and relevant security events.
Redundancy
Zendesk employs service clustering and network redundancies to eliminate single points of failure. Our strict backup regime and/or our
Enhanced Disaster Recovery
service offering allows us to deliver a high level of service availability, as Service Data is replicated across availability zones.
Disaster Recovery
Our
Disaster Recovery (DR) program
ensures that our services remain available and are easily recoverable in the case of a disaster.
This is accomplished through building a robust technical environment, creating Disaster Recovery plans, and testing
activities
.
Enhanced Disaster Recovery
Our
Enhanced Disaster Recovery
package adds contractual objectives for Recovery Time Objective (RTO) and Recovery Point Objective (RPO). These are supported through our capability to prioritize operations of Enhanced Disaster Recovery subscribers during any declared disaster event.
Get more information on Disaster Recovery Guarantees.
Application Security
Secure Code Training
Annual secure code training for all engineers, based on OWASP Top 10 security risks.
Framework Security Controls
Zendesk leverages modern and secure open-source frameworks with security controls to limit exposure to OWASP Top 10 security risks. These inherent controls reduce our exposure to SQL Injection (SQLi), Cross Site Scripting (XSS), and Cross Site Request Forgery (CSRF), among others.
Quality Assurance
Our Quality Assurance (QA) department reviews and tests our code base. Dedicated application security engineers on staff identify, test, and triage security vulnerabilities in code.
Separate Environments
Testing and staging environments are logically separated from the Production environment. No Service Data is used in our development or test environments.
Dynamic Vulnerability Scanning
We employ third-party security tooling to continuously and dynamically scan our core applications against common web application security risks, including, but not limited to the OWASP Top 10 security risks. We maintain a dedicated in-house product security team to test and work with engineering teams to remediate any discovered issues.
Software Composition Analysis
We scan the libraries and dependencies used in our products to identify vulnerabilities and ensure the vulnerabilities are managed.
Third-Party Penetration Testing
In addition to our extensive internal scanning and testing program, Zendesk employs third-party security experts to perform detailed penetration tests on different applications within our family of products.
Responsible Disclosure / Bug Bounty Program
Our
Responsible Disclosure Program
gives security researchers as well as subscribers an avenue for safely testing and notifying Zendesk of security vulnerabilities through our partnership with
HackerOne
.
Product Security
Authentication Options
Zendesk has several different authentication options. Subscribers can turn on Zendesk authentication (email and password sign-in), social media single sign-on (SSO) (such as Facebook and Google), and enterprise SSO (such as SAML and OIDC) for end user and team member authentication.
Learn about user access
.
Configurable Password Policy
Zendesk native authentication for products available through the
Admin Center
provides the following levels of password security: low, medium, and high, as well as set custom password rules for agents and admins. Zendesk also allows different password security levels to apply to end users vs. agents and admins. Only admins can change the password security level.
Learn about configurable password policies
.
2-Factor Authentication (2FA)
Zendesk native authentication for products available through the
Admin Center
offers 2-factor (2FA) for agents and admins via SMS or an authenticator app.
Learn about 2FA
.
Service Credential Storage
Zendesk follows secure credential storage best practices by never storing passwords in human-readable format, and only as the result of a secure, salted, one-way hash.
Advanced Data Privacy and Protection
For businesses that need a higher level of data privacy and security, Zendesk offers the
Advanced Data Privacy and Protection add-on
. The add-on includes capabilities for BYOK encryption, customizable data retention policies, data masking, PII redaction, and access logs.
Role-Based Access Controls
Access to data within Zendesk applications is governed by role-based access control (RBAC) and can be configured to define granular access privileges. Zendesk supports various permission levels for users (owner, admin, agent, end-user, etc.).
Learn about user roles:
Support Default Roles
Support Custom Roles *Enterprise only
Chat Default Roles
Chat Custom Roles *Enterprise only
Explore Default Roles
Guide Default Roles
Talk Default Roles
Session Time
Details on global security and user access
IP Restrictions
Any Zendesk account can restrict access to their Zendesk Support to users within a specific range of IP addresses. Only users from the allowed IP addresses will be able to sign in to your Zendesk account. You can allow subscribers (not agents or admins) to bypass this restriction. For more information, see
Restricting access to Zendesk Support and your Help Center using IP restrictions
and
Using IP Access Restriction in Chat
.
Hosted Encryption Certificates for Help Center (TLS)
Zendesk provides free TLS encryption for host-mapped Guide help centers. Zendesk uses Let’s Encrypt to request certificates and automatically renews the certificate before it expires.
You can also upload your own certificate, if you choose.
To learn more about setting up encryption certificates for a Guide help center please see
Setting up a hosted TLS encryption certificate
.
File Restrictions in Chat
Zendesk Chat allows the ability to restrict what file types are sent to agents. Alternatively, you can choose to turn off file sending entirely in the Chat product. To learn about this feature, see
Managing file sending in live chat
.
Audit Logs
Zendesk offers Audit Logs to accounts with Enterprise/Enterprise Plus plans. These logs include account changes, user changes, app changes, business rules, ticket deletions, and settings. The Audit Log is available in both the
Admin Center
and
Support API
. To learn more about Audit Logs and see what information is available within the log please see
Viewing the audit log for changes
.
Private Attachments
Subscribers can configure their instance so that users are required to sign in to view ticket attachments.
Learn about Private Attachments
.
Redaction
Zendesk has two types of redaction for removing sensitive data: Manual redaction provides the ability to redact or remove sensitive data in Support ticket comments, and securely delete attachments, so you can protect confidential information. The data is redacted from tickets via the UI or API to prevent sensitive information from being stored in Zendesk. Learn about redaction via the
UI
or
API
.
Automatic redaction allows for automatic redaction of credit card numbers from subscriber-submitted tickets. When enabled, credit card numbers are partially replaced with blank boxes in the ticket. They are also redacted from logs and database entries. To learn more about how to enable this feature and how credit card numbers are identified, see
Automatically redacting credit card numbers from tickets
and from
chats
.
Spam Filter for Guide help center
Zendesk’s spam filtering service can be used to prevent end-user spam posts from being published in your Guide help center.
Learn about filtering spam in Guide
.
Email Signing (DKIM/DMARC)
Zendesk offers
DKIM
(Domain Keys Identified Mail) and
DMARC
(Domain-based Message Authentication, Reporting, & Conformance) for signing outbound emails from Zendesk when you have to set up an external email domain on your Zendesk. Using an email service that supports these features helps you stop email spoofing.
Learn about digitally signing your email
.
Device Tracking
Zendesk tracks the devices used to sign in to each user account. When someone signs into an account from a new device, it is added to the device list in that user's profile. That user can get an email notification when a new device is added, and should follow up if the activity seems suspicious. Suspicious sessions can be terminated through the agent UI.
Learn about device tracking
.
HR Security
Policies
Zendesk has developed a comprehensive set of security policies covering a range of topics. These policies are shared with and made available to all employees and contractors with access to Zendesk information assets.
Training
All employees attend a Security Awareness Training, which is given upon hire and annually thereafter. All engineers receive annual Secure Code Training. The Security team provides additional security awareness updates via email, blog posts, and in presentations during internal events.
Background Checks
Zendesk performs background checks on all new employees in accordance with local laws. These checks are also required for contractors. The background check includes criminal, education, and employment verification. Cleaning crews are included.
Confidentiality Agreements
All new hires are required to sign Non-Disclosure and Confidentiality agreements.
Welcome to the Zendesk Global Privacy Program
Zendesk has a formal global privacy and data protection program, which includes cross-functional key stakeholders including Legal, Security, Product, and Executive sectors of the company. As privacy advocates, we work diligently to ensure our Services and team members are dedicated to compliance with applicable regulatory and industry frameworks.
Compliance
The Australian Privacy Act of 1998 (as amended) provides several data subject rights and added mandatory notification of eligible data breaches. Unlike the GDPR, there are no concepts of data controller and data processor.
https://www.zendesk.com/company/anz-privacy/
The Brazilian General Data Protection Law or Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”), was entered into effect on September 18, 2020. LGPD is a comprehensive data protection law which covers the activities of data controllers and processors and provides individual rights.
Zendesk subscribers that collect and store personal data in Zendesk Services may be considered “controllers” under the LGPD. Controllers bear the primary responsibility for ensuring that their processing of personal data is compliant with relevant data protection law, including the LGPD. Zendesk acts as a “processor,” as such term is defined in the LGPD, with respect to the processing of personal data through our Services.
Subscribers can view our
Product Guides
and
Service Data Deletion Policy
for more detailed information on how to use Zendesk’s products to align with compliance initiatives.The National Authority for Protection Data (“ANPD”) may issue additional guidance for the LGPD in the future. Zendesk will continue to actively track the law and we will continue to keep our subscribers updated on features and functionality they can use to support their compliance efforts.
Zendesk’s LGPD Addendum has been incorporated into Zendesk’s Data Processing Agreement. If you would like to review and/or execute Zendesk’s Data Processing Agreement, please
click here.
The
California Consumer Privacy Act
, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (“CCPA”) is a U.S. law enacted in the State of California, which went into force on January 1, 2020. It expands upon the privacy rights available to certain California consumers, and requires certain companies to comply with various data protection requirements. Please also visit the final
CCPA Regulations
and the
California Privacy Rights Act
(“CPRA”). A few CPRA provisions went into effect on December 16, 2020, with the remaining provisions of the CPRA becoming operative on January 1, 2023.
Zendesk subscribers that collect and store personal information in Zendesk Services may be considered “Businesses” under the CCPA. Businesses bear the primary responsibility for ensuring that their processing of personal data is compliant with relevant data protection law, including the CCPA. Zendesk acts as a “Service Provider,” as such term is defined in the current version of the CCPA, with respect to the processing of personal information through our Services. Therefore, Zendesk collects, accesses, maintains, uses, processes, and transfers the personal information of our subscribers and our subscriber’s end-users processed through the Services solely for the purpose of performing our obligations under our existing contract(s) with our subscribers; and for no commercial purpose other than the performance of such obligations and improvement of the Services we provide.
We do not “sell” our subscriber’s personal information as defined under the CCPA. We may share aggregated and/or anonymized information regarding use of the Service(s), which is not considered personal information under the CCPA, with third parties to help us develop and improve the Services and provide our subscribers with more relevant content and service offerings as detailed in our subscriber agreements.
Zendesk’s CCPA Addendum has been incorporated into Zendesk’s Data Processing Agreement. If you would like to review and/or execute Zendesk’s Data Processing Agreement, please
click here.
If you would like to review and/or execute Zendesk’s US State Addendum to the Main Services Agreement, please
click here
.
Canada’s Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act went into effect in 2000 and is focused around ten fair information principles, which form the rules for collection, use, access, and disclosure of personal information. In October of 2021, the International Technology Association of Canada and Information Technology Industry Council suggested changes to PIPEDA to provide greater privacy and transparency rights for Canadian citizens.
You can review and/or execute Zendesk’s DPA
here
. The Zendesk DPA covers the specific processing activities and security measures applicable to our Services and incorporates the new EU Standard Contractual Clauses (“EU SCCs”).
Subscribers can read our
Product Guides
and
Service Data Deletion Policy
for detailed information on how to use Zendesk’s products to assist in compliance with data protection and privacy laws.
Since our inception, Zendesk’s approach has been anchored by a strong commitment to privacy, security, compliance, and transparency. This approach includes supporting our subscribers’ compliance with EU data protection requirements, such as those set out in the
General Data Protection Regulation
(“GDPR”).
If a subscriber collects, transmits, hosts, or analyzes personal data of EU citizens, GDPR requires the subscriber to use third-party data processors who guarantee their ability to implement the technical and organizational requirements of the GDPR. To further earn our subscribers’ trust, our Data Processing Agreement (“DPA”) has been updated to provide our customers with contractual commitments regarding our compliance with applicable EU data protection law and to implement additional contractual provisions required by the GDPR.
Binding Corporate Rules (BCRs)
: Binding Corporate Rules (“BCRs”) are company-wide data protection policies approved by European data protection authorities to facilitate intra-group transfers of personal data from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) to countries outside the EEA. BCRs are based on strict privacy principles established by European Union data protection authorities and require intensive consultation with those authorities. Subscribers can find the full list of approved entities on the Binding Corporate Rules Approved List
here
. In 2017 Zendesk completed the EU approval process with the Irish Data Protection Commissioner (“DPC”) (peer reviewed by both the UK Information Commissioner’s Office and the Dutch Data Protection Authority) BCRs as processor and as a controller. This significant regulatory approval validated Zendesk’s implementation of the highest possible standards for protecting personal data globally, covering both the personal data of its customers and its employees. Zendesk is one of the first software companies in the world to have received approval for its BCRs; and was the second company ever to receive approval from the Irish DPC.
To access Zendesk’s EU BCRs, please visit:
Zendesk’s Processor EU Binding Corporate Rules
Zendesk’s Controller EU Binding Corporate Rules
To access Zendesk's UK BCRs, please visit:
Zendesk’s Processor UK Binding Corporate Rules
Zendesk’s Controller UK Binding Corporate Rules
Data Subject Requests
: An individual who seeks to exercise their data protection rights in respect of personal data stored or processed by us on behalf of a subscriber of ours within the subscriber’s Service Data (including to seek access to, or to correct, amend, delete, port, or restrict processing of such personal data) should direct such query to our subscriber (the data controller). Upon receipt of a request from one of our subscribers to remove personal data from Zendesk, we will respond to such request within thirty (30) days. We will retain personal data that we process and store on behalf of our subscribers for as long as needed to provide the Services to our subscribers.
Data Protection Officer
: Zendesk’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) can be reached at
euprivacy@zendesk.com
.
HDS enables healthcare providers in France to use Zendesk’s customer service and engagement platform with confidence that our platform has appropriate technical and governance measures in place to secure and protect personal health information (PHI). Additional information is available
here
.
The New Zealand Privacy Act in 2020 commenced on December 1, 2020, applies to agencies and maintains the principle-based framework of the 1993 Act. The 2020 Act states that organisations are responsible for ensuring that personal information sent outside of New Zealand is adequately protected and added mandatory breach notification requirements.
https://www.zendesk.com/company/anz-privacy/
The Personal Data Protection Act of Singapore establishes data protection laws that govern the collection, use, and disclosure of Personal Data as of July 2, 2014. Zendesk is a recognized Infocomm Development Authority of Singapore (IDA) Data Intermediary as a Software-as-a-Service (“SaaS”) Service Provider. Additional information is available
here
.
The United Kingdom withdrew from the European Union on 31 January 2020. On 28 June 2021, the European Commission adopted
adequacy decisions
for transfers of personal data to the United Kingdom under GDPR.
To achieve a HIPAA-Enabled Account, you will need to (1) purchase the Advanced Security Deployed Associated Service or Advanced Compliance Deployed Associated Service Add-On; (2) enable a set of security configurations as outlined by Zendesk; and (3) execute our
Business Associate Agreement
(“BAA”). For more details, including a list of which Services can be HIPAA-enabled, please see
Advanced Compliance
.
Subscriber Service Data Details
Service Data is any information, including personal data, which is stored in or transmitted via the Zendesk Services by, or on behalf of, our subscribers and their end-users. We use Service Data to operate and improve our Services, help customers access and use the Services, respond to subscriber inquiries, and send communications related to the Services.
Access
: Zendesk provides an advanced set of access and encryption features to help customers effectively protect their information. We do not access or use customer content for any purpose other than providing, maintaining, and improving the Zendesk services and as otherwise required by law. See
here
for additional information.
Data Hosting
: Zendesk uses Amazon Web Services to host Service Data as described
here
and in the
Regional Data Hosting Policy
. For additional information, please also see the
Security section
.
Default Data Types Collected by the Service
: Zendesk has created a
list of data points
, categorized by product. For the full picture of data types, subscribers can use this list in conjunction with their specific intended use case and resultant data types.
Legal or Government Requests
: Privacy, data security, and subscriber trust are our top priorities. Zendesk does not disclose Service Data, except as necessary to provide our Services and to comply with applicable laws, as detailed in our
Privacy Notice
. To assist our subscribers in performing compliance reviews, we have additional resources:
Transparency Report
and
Government Request Policy
.
Ownership
: From a privacy perspective, the subscriber is the controller of Service Data and Zendesk is a processor. This means that throughout the time that you subscribe to services with Zendesk, you retain ownership of and control over Service Data in your Zendesk instance.
Replication
: Zendesk periodically replicates data for purposes of archival, backup, and audit logs. We use Amazon Web Services (AWS) to store some of the information that is backed up, such as database information and attachment files. Please see our
Regional Data Hosting Policy
for further details.
Security
: Zendesk prioritizes data security and combines enterprise-class security features with comprehensive audits of our applications, systems, and networks to ensure subscriber and business data is protected. See additional information
here
.
Security Incidents
: For more information about security incident management see our
Security Incident Response
.
Sub-processors
: Zendesk may use sub-processors, including affiliates of Zendesk, as well as third-party companies, to provide, secure, or improve the Services, and such sub-processors may have access to Service Data. Our
Sub-processors policy
provides an up-to-date list of the names and locations of all sub-processors.
Termination
: Zendesk maintains a
Service Data Deletion Policy
that describes Zendesk’s data deletion processes upon subscriber’s termination or expiration of the Zendesk subscription.
Privacy Related Policies
Cookie Policy
Detailed information about how and when we use cookies on Zendesk websites.
In-Product Cookie Policy
Provides information about how and when Zendesk uses cookies within the Zendesk Services.
Service Data Deletion Policy
How our Subscribers’ Service Data is deleted in connection with the cancellation, termination, or migration of an Account within the Zendesk Services.
Shared Responsibility Model
This framework clarifies which party is responsible for which controls related to the security and privacy of your data.
Application Features Related to Privacy
Zendesk has tools for each of its products to assist with user requests and other obligations under applicable privacy and data protection laws and regulations, such as data access, correction, portability, deletion, and objection. To learn about the features and functionality in each Zendesk product, please see
Complying with Privacy and Data Protection in Zendesk products
.
Zendesk provides an advanced set of access and encryption features to help subscribers effectively protect their information. We do not access or use subscriber data for any purpose other than providing, maintaining, and improving the Zendesk Services and as otherwise required by applicable law. Additional information is available
here
.
Zendesk has achieved a number of internationally recognized certifications and accreditations demonstrating compliance with third-party assurance frameworks. Security certifications are described
here
.
Subscribers who purchase the
Data Center Location Deployed Associated Service
(“Data Center Location Add-on”), or have the Data Center Location functionality in their Service Plan, have the ability to select the region that will host their Service Data from a list of Zendesk available regions.
Zendesk has a robust global privacy and data protection program, which takes a unified approach to privacy and information governance to give customers flexibility to manage personal data that lives within Zendesk’s systems. For details, see our product guides:
Complying with Privacy and Data Protection in Zendesk Products
.
Zendesk has two types of redaction for removing sensitive data:
Manual redaction provides the ability to redact or remove sensitive data in Support ticket comments, and securely delete attachments so that you can protect confidential information. The data is redacted from tickets via the UI or API to prevent sensitive information from being stored in Zendesk.
Learn more about redaction via the UI or API
.
Automatic redaction allows for automatic redaction of credit card numbers from Agent- or End-User-submitted tickets. When enabled, credit card numbers are partially replaced with blank boxes in the ticket. The numbers are also redacted from logs and database entries.
Learn how to enable this feature and how the credit card numbers are identified
.
Zendesk AI
Zendesk AI is built based on the core principles of privacy, security, and compliance, by design. Our commitment to providing businesses with secure, trusted products and solutions is embedded in our DNA. As part of this, Zendesk leverages a set of
design principles
that not only set the standard for how we design, develop and build everything we do, but set a clear foundation for our use of AI for customer experiences (CX and employee experience (EX)).
Service Data processed by Zendesk AI is subject to all security standards and commitments, including compliance with Zendesk’s robust
Enterprise Security Measures
, and storage within Zendesk’s
SOC 2-compliant environment
. Service Data will not be shared with any other customer.
Generative AI features are currently powered by OpenAI. OpenAI deletes all data after producing the output, without any storage. OpenAI data security practices are available
here
.
All models developed by Zendesk are classification models – this means they are trained to read and classify inputs into one of a set number of categories created by Zendesk. Because these models are not generative, no content is produced by the model, and
it is not possible for data to be reproduced by the model
.
Does Zendesk use customer Service Data to train machine learning models?
Zendesk offers three types of machine learning functionality:
1. Account-specific ML functionality:
Zendesk creates machine learning models tailored to a customer’s account using only data existing in the account. Account-specific models will not be used by any other customer.
2. Generic ML functionality:
Zendesk uses Service Data to train its generic, cross-account machine learning models to be predictive and useful to multiple Zendesk customers. These include global and industry models. These models will never disclose one customer’s Service Data to another customer, because they are not “generative” (i.e., they do not create text).
3. Generative ML functionality supported by OpenAI:
OpenAI models are pre-trained and Zendesk customer data will never be used by OpenAI (or any other third party) to train their model(s).
How does Zendesk protect Service Data when used for model training?
Before Service Data is used to train generic ML functionality, Zendesk applies aggregation and sanitation processes, as necessary. No fields designed to intake personal data or ticket attachments are used for model training.
Zendesk is committed to ensuring that no Service Data will be reproduced by the model.
There is no risk that one customer’s data will be exposed to another customer through the model’s output. See
AI Data Use Information
.
Hallucinations are an intrinsic risk for generative AI features. Zendesk does two things to mitigate this risk:
Zendesk utilizes the Retrieval Augmented Generation (RAG) technique to ensure that generated replies or search results are grounded in specific knowledge base content
Zendesk development team regularly inspects replies with negative end user feedback for hallucinations to develop tools that can automatically detect and prevent such scenarios.
All Service Data is hosted in Zendesk’s existing
AWS regions
. For sub-processor hosting locations, please see the
Zendesk Sub-processor Policy
Use of Zendesk AI does not impact any Subscriber data locality commitments, including those available in the
Data Center Location Add-on
. Service Data of eligible Subscribers will continue to be hosted in the selected region.
Note: Zendesk WFM (Tymeshift), Zendesk QA (Klaus), and Ultimate Service Data are hosted in Google Cloud Platform in the regions provided below:
US, Germany
Germany
US, Belgium
All Zendesk products and features are designed with privacy in-mind, and the Zendesk AI is no different.
Subscribers are able to
comply
with various privacy laws (including GDPR and CCPA) when using Zendesk, including Zendesk AI features.
The Zendesk AI is eligible for coverage under
Zendesk’s Business Associate Agreement (BAA)
.
Subscribers interested in executing a BAA with Zendesk must have access to the
Advanced Compliance Add-on
.
Data Security
OpenAI data security practices are available
here
.
Model Security
Zendesk uses pre-trained OpenAI models, and Service Data will never be used by OpenAI for any purpose other than to provide and secure its service to Subscriber. Once the output is delivered, the Service Data is deleted.
Model Training
OpenAI will never use Service Data for model training or any other form of service improvement.
Data Hosting and Locality
OpenAI supports data processing locality in the European Economic Area (EEA) and Switzerland for eligible customers. However, please note that OpenAI does not store or host Service Data, which is only processed in memory to deliver the output.
Data Privacy
Zendesk uses OpenAI’s ‘Zero Data Retention’ policy so that no Service Data is stored or hosted by OpenAI after the output has been delivered. As a result, using OpenAI does not impact Subscribers’ ability to
comply
with various privacy laws (including GDPR and CCPA) when using Zendesk.
All OpenAI features within Zendesk are optional. Subscribers who do not wish to use these features do not have to turn them on, and are always able to disable the features through the Admin Center.
HIPAA
Select OpenAI-powered features are available for use with HIPAA-enabled accounts. Please see the
Advanced Compliance
page for more information.
You can learn more about Ultimate’s AI agent Security & Privacy
here
.
Legal
Our agreements and policies provide our subscribers transparency and detailed information about Zendesk’s Services, which in turn support our subscribers in meeting their own legal and compliance standards.
Zendesk offers several data processing agreements and other addenda to support subscribers’ compliance with data privacy laws, available for execution
here
. These include:
Data Processing Agreement
(DPA)
United States HIPAA Business Associate Agreement
(BAA)
Main Services Agreement
(MSA)
US State Addendum
Accessibility Policy
Subscribers can leverage our Voluntary Product Accessibility Template in making their preliminary assessments.
Code of Business Conduct and Ethics
The minimum standards that we expect from our directors, officers, employees and contingent workers in the conduct of our business.
Cookie Policy
Detailed information about how and when we use cookies on Zendesk websites.
In-Product Cookie Policy
Provides information about how and when Zendesk uses cookies within the Zendesk Services.
Copyright Infringement Notice & Takedown Policy
How Zendesk handles notifications of infringement.
Data Deletion Policy
How our Subscribers’ Service Data is deleted in connection with the cancellation, termination, or migration of an Account within the Zendesk Services.
Legal or Government Request Policy
Addresses Zendesk’s procedure for responding to a request received from a law enforcement or other government authority.
Privacy Notice
Describes how Zendesk collects, uses, shares, and secures personal data.
Regional Data Hosting Policy
Where Zendesk Service Data can be hosted if a Subscriber purchases or enables the Data Center Location Add-On.
Responsible Disclosure Policy
Programs for security researchers to report discoveries of security vulnerability in the Zendesk Services.
Additional Zendesk policies are available
here
.
Transparency Report
Disclosure of Service Data
: Zendesk only discloses Service Data to third parties where disclosure is necessary to provide or improve the services or as required to respond to lawful requests from public authorities. Please see our
Government Data Request Policy
as well as the
Zendesk Transparency Report
.
This could be the beginning of a beautiful relationship
Sign up for a trial
Take a tour
Sub-policy 1
https://www.knownhost.com/privacy-policy:
Hosting
Web
Web Hosting
Premium hosting with all the bells and whistles
Reseller Hosting
Great for creative agencies and multi domain projects
Semi Dedicated Hosting
VPS-Like resources without the hassle of root
WordPress Hosting
Structured environment for exceptional performance
VPS
Managed VPS Hosting
Fast performing servers on a RAID-10 SSD Backend
Unmanaged VPS Hosting
Full root provided environment to use as needed
NVMe VPS Hosting
High speed, high frequency servers on Enterprise-grade hardware
Cloud
Cloud Hosting
Redundant & Reliable hosting built on a dedicated backend
Dedicated
Dedicated Servers
Configurable servers, built-to-order; whatever you need
Budget Dedicated Servers
Legacy hardware at discount prices
Ryzen Dedicated Servers
High performing servers for multiple scenarios
WordPress
WordPress Hosting
Structured environment for exceptional performance
Services
Services
Application Hosting
Solutions for every application
cPanel Hosting
User-friendly panel at a reasonable cost
DirectAdmin Hosting
Easy to use panel in a dedicated environment
Domain Registration
No hassle domain registrations
SSL Certificates
Certificates of all types for many situations
DDoS Protection
Complimentary robust protection for all services
Migration Assistance
Let our migrations specialists handle it for you
WHMCS Hosting
Performance-grade solutions for your billing software
Remote Backups
Reliable storage for many backup applications
Why KnownHost?
About KnownHost
Why KnownHost?
Simple. We know hosting
About Us
Putting the customer first, our #1 priority
Our Network
World Class Facilities, premium networking with exceptional reliability
Our Clients
See why our clients like us, you should too
Referral Incentives
Leverage us to grow your customer base. We'll stand with you
Hosting Acquisitions
Looking to get out? Let us take over from here
Blog
Recent Articles, news and updates
KNOWLEDGE BASE
Browse our guides, articles, and how‐to's
Contact
Sign In
Support
Get Started Now
KNOWNHOST
Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy describes the information we collect from you, what we do with the information, and our information security practices. If you have any questions about our Privacy Policy, please contact legal@knownhost.com
Legal Name and Subsidiaries
#
KnownHost, (“we,” us,” or “our”) comply with the Data Privacy Framework Principles.
Affirmation Statement
#
KnownHost complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF). We have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program and to view our certification, please visit
dataprivacyframework.gov
.
Information
#
When you engage with our services, we collect certain information to ensure a seamless experience and to provide support. This includes:
Contact and Payment Information:
When you sign up, we ask for contact details, such as your name, address, phone number, and email address. Payment information, including your credit card number and expiration date, is also collected and securely processed for billing purposes.
Optional Demographic Information:
We may invite you to participate in user surveys to provide demographic information (e.g., age, gender, interests). These details are optional and not required to use our services but help us improve and tailor our offerings.
Customer Support Interactions:
If you contact our support team, we may request additional information about your technical setup, such as your operating system and software versions, to resolve issues effectively.
Website Usage and Interaction Data:
When you visit our website, we automatically capture data such as your IP address, visit duration, and specific pages viewed. This information may be tied to your account to improve your experience and for security and analytical purposes.
Cookies and Tracking:
We place cookies on your device to recognize repeat visits and enhance functionality. Cookies may be linked to your personally identifiable information to provide a customized experience. For more on cookies, please see "What is a Cookie."
Email Engagement:
If we send you an email, it may contain a tracking marker to help us determine if the email was opened and viewed. This allows us to understand which communications are relevant to our users and helps us improve our messaging.
This information is gathered in accordance with our privacy practices and is used solely for the purposes outlined in this policy.
Use of
Personally Identifiable
Information
#
We are committed to using your personally identifiable information responsibly and only for the purposes outlined below:
Service Delivery and Payment Processing:
Your information is essential for account setup, billing, and processing payments, as well as for providing customer support.
Communication of Offers and Updates:
We may use your email to send occasional updates, special offers, or relevant information about our services. We may also announce special offers on behalf of third-party partners; however, we do not share your email or other personal details with these third parties. You may opt out of such communications at any time by following the instructions included in the email.
Service Improvement and Customization:
We use aggregated data from user surveys, demographic insights, and website usage to improve and tailor our website and services to your preferences.
We will not disclose any personally identifiable information about you to other parties except under the following circumstances:
Legal Compliance:
When required by law, we may disclose your data to law enforcement or regulatory agencies as part of a lawful request.
Business Transfers:
In the event of a merger, acquisition, or sale of our business, your information may be transferred to the new entity, subject to continued privacy protections.
Service Providers and Contractors:
We may share your information with trusted third-party service providers (e.g., payment processors) who perform tasks on our behalf, provided they agree to keep your information confidential and comply with data protection laws.
Protection of Rights and Safety:
We may share data as necessary to protect our rights, your rights, or the rights of others, or to enforce our agreements.
Data Sale and Marketing Restrictions:
We do not sell, rent, or transfer your information to third-party marketing lists, and we do not allow third parties to use your information for marketing purposes without your consent.
Retention of Ownership:
All parties maintain their rights, titles, and interest in their respective data, information, and intellectual property. Nothing in this policy transfers ownership rights, and we claim no control over content you submit, post, or display via our services.
Disclosure Limitations:
We will never disclose your data to third parties unless required by court or administrative order. If such a request is made, we will notify you where permitted.
Use of
Non-Personally Identifiable
Information
#
We may collect and use non-personally identifiable information, such as aggregate statistical data, to improve our services and provide insights to third parties, such as advertisers, service providers, and suppliers. This data may include information about general customer demographics, website usage patterns, and trends, but it does not identify individual users personally.
We use this aggregated information to:
Analyze and understand overall usage trends to enhance our website’s functionality and user experience.
Improve our marketing efforts, allowing us to make more informed decisions regarding content and services.
Collaborate with third parties to create relevant offers and advertisements based on general user preferences.
In all cases, we ensure that any shared non-personally identifiable information is anonymized and does not contain data that could identify individual users. We do not link this data to any personally identifiable information you may have provided to us.
What is a Cookie
#
A "cookie" is a small text file containing an alphanumeric identifier that is unique to your browser. When you visit our website, we place a cookie on your device to recognize your browser. This cookie allows us to:
Personalize Your Experience:
Customize your visit to enhance user experience, remembering your preferences and settings.
Improve Site Functionality:
Track website usage patterns to help us improve functionality and usability.
Analyze Performance:
Measure interactions on our site, providing us with insights to optimize site performance and content.
Support Security:
Help in authenticating your sessions and protecting your account from unauthorized access.
Cookies do not store personally identifiable information about you. You may control cookies through your browser settings, though restricting cookies may affect some website features and functionality.
Security of Your Information
#
We prioritize the security of your personal and payment information by employing robust measures to protect it from unauthorized access, disclosure, or misuse. Key protections include:
Encryption:
All payment details are stored in an encrypted format, ensuring that your data remains secure during storage and transmission.
Access Control:
Access to sensitive data is restricted to authorized personnel only, based on a least-privilege principle, to minimize exposure.
Regular Audits and Monitoring:
Our systems undergo periodic security audits, and we monitor for any potential vulnerabilities or unauthorized access attempts.
Industry-Standard Protocols:
We utilize advanced security protocols, such as HTTPS and SSL/TLS, to safeguard your data during online transactions and interactions with our website.
Data Anonymization:
Where possible, we anonymize data to further enhance security and minimize personal exposure.
Despite these protections, no method of transmission or storage is 100% secure. We continuously update our practices in line with industry standards to help safeguard your information against emerging threats. If you have concerns about the security of your data, please reach out to legal@knownhost.com.
Children's Privacy
#
Our services are intended for use by individuals aged 13 and older. We do not knowingly collect, use, or maintain personal information from children under the age of 13. If we become aware that we have inadvertently gathered personal data from a child under 13, we will take immediate steps to delete such information from our records.
Parents and guardians are encouraged to monitor their children’s online activities to ensure their privacy and safety. If you believe that a child under 13 has provided us with personal information, please contact us at legal@knownhost.com, and we will promptly address and remove the data in compliance with applicable laws and regulations.
HIPAA Compliance
#
Our services are not designed to comply with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA). KnownHost is neither a “Covered Entity” nor a “Business Associate” as defined by HIPAA and, therefore, is not subject to HIPAA’s standards or requirements.
Since HIPAA does not apply to our services, users should refrain from submitting, storing, or disclosing any health information that would be subject to HIPAA protections. Using our services for such data may not provide the safeguards required under HIPAA, and KnownHost makes no guarantee of compliance with HIPAA standards. If you have any questions about whether our services meet your needs for HIPAA compliance, please consult a qualified expert before proceeding.
Merger or Acquisition
#
In the event of a merger, acquisition, restructuring, or other corporate transaction involving KnownHost, all personal data and information we hold may be transferred to the acquiring or successor entity. This transfer would occur as part of the transaction to ensure continuity of service and would be subject to the same privacy commitments outlined in this policy.
The new entity will be required to adhere to our existing privacy standards or provide you with notice of any significant changes to these standards. If applicable, we will notify users of the transfer and any new terms or privacy protections in advance, allowing you to make informed decisions regarding your data.
Complaint Contact
#
We are committed to addressing privacy inquiries and resolving complaints in a prompt and thorough manner. If you have questions, concerns, or complaints about our data practices, please contact us via email at
legal@knownhost.com
.
In your message, please include a detailed description of your concern to help us address it effectively. We aim to acknowledge receipt of your complaint and will work with you to resolve any issues as quickly as possible. If we cannot resolve your complaint to your satisfaction, we will provide information about further options, including referral to our independent dispute resolution mechanism.
Independent Recourse Mechanism
#
Pursuant to the DPF Program, EU, UK, and Swiss individuals have the right to obtain our confirmation of whether we maintain personal information relating to you in the United States. Upon request, we will provide you with access to the personal information that we hold about you. You may also correct, amend, or delete the personal information we hold about you. An individual who seeks access, or who seeks to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate data transferred to the United States under the DPF, should direct their query to legal@knownhost.com If requested to remove data, we will respond within a reasonable timeframe.
We will provide an individual opt-out choice, or opt-in for sensitive data, before we share your data with third parties other than our agents, or before we use it for a purpose other than which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized. To request to limit the use and disclosure of your personal information, please submit a written request to legal@knownhost.com.
In certain situations, we may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
KnownHost’s accountability for personal data that it receives in the United States under the DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party is described in the DPF Principles. In particular, KnownHost remains responsible and liable under the DPF Principles if third-party agents that it engages to process personal data on its behalf do so in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless KnownHost proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF), KnownHost commits to resolve complaints about our collection or use of personal information transferred to the U.S. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints should first contact KnownHost at legal@knownhost.com. KnownHost has further committed to refer unresolved DPF Principles-related complaints to a U.S.-based independent dispute resolution mechanism, BBB NATIONAL PROGRAMS. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
bbbprograms.org/dpf-complaints
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you. If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf
.
Enforcement
#
KnownHost is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Policy Date
#
This policy was updated November 14th, 2024.
Your teams are always brilliant in what they do to assist your customers!!!
— Tina L.
Great, my only word is the hosting provided is great, and it just works.
— Aiden D.
Fast tech support response time and resolution Great customer service.
— Rick C.
The best feedback is when you don’t need their help to keep everything up and running
— Jim M.
Excellent service, customer service and I couldn't be happier
— Joan W.
Great support, always have the solutions for my problems.   We are happy that we are doing business with you
— zac I.
10/10  I have no idea what I am doing when it comes to hosting my files and getting my page up and running and support has been very fast, polite and helpful.  They never once condescended or acted irritated at my dumb questions.  I really appreciate that.  Very helpful.  I was born West Chester too, so it's cool that you are based there.  But yeah, having there patience of Gandhi in tech matters is  huge  for me, very appreciative of you CS/tech staff.
— Lemuel M.
Having hosted with 3DCart - GoEcart - Miva Merchant - Shopify - Presta Shop - ZenCart - Actinic - GoDaddy - and others Knownhost is by far the best host we've had in terms of performance and support
— Mitch R.
We have been using your dedicated box circa 2019. Till date we haven't had any issue whatsoever. Customer support is just extraordinary.  Thank you so much for everything.
— Modo M.
I am a total beginner at website hosting / managing / adding content / Wordpress, etc. and really hate messing with the site in case I break something. Whenever that happens, however, your team has been quick to help (and without making me feel like an idio!). Thank you.
— Monica S.
You everytime respond fast and solve my inquiries, thank you!
— Marcelo S.
Server been up and running for 3 years with you guys and no issue. I got two server now gonna get another one soon! Keep up the good work!
— mike n.
I had other web hosts before with disastrous results. Know Host from start to finish has the best professionals to help you through anything!
— Barbara W.
I am much satisfied with the services, I always recommend KnownHost to my friends & colleague.
— Yasir K.
At this point of the game, the two boxes I have is literary running on their own with minimal input from my side...  What more could you want?
— Fred M.
The support team answered quickly and effectively to my ticket. Well done!
— Vincenzo
Nothing to Report, All good. I like a lot the quick response time. I would just like some more resources at the same price. I remember in the past each 2 years you were upgrading the packages for free.
— Francesco V.
I am satisfied and I recommend it at every opportunity
— Additional C.
KH has outstanding customer service and support. Here's to 10 years of an amazing relationship.
— Israel U.
There has been 99% UPTIME for more than 10 years. I have had multiple hosting backbone providers for the past 24 years, and KH has been the very best!
— K.H. C.
SImply the best customer service and tech support! I highly recommend KnownHost to everyone!
— Ashley M.
Your Customer Service is second to none.
— Jerry W.
I have been with Knownhost for more than 8 years and no complain at all.
— Dewan R.
Everyone at KnownHost who has assisted with our technical tickets, no matter how simple or complicated has been fantastic and very responsive!
— Colette H.
Top company always deliver
— Kevin W.
Everything is working fine with me! I need your help because my son has passed and need to get the account in my name. I am about to call you now. Cell 973-214-9913
— Robert D.
Great service and support
— david d.
Excellent service
— h.e.
Support is awesome!! Cannot be beatable by others. Uptime is also good. Overall a good experience.
— Rajesh R.
Reliable servers. Excellent, prompt and professional customer support.
— CHI Y.
Always so helpful and easy to deal with.
— Brian B.
Excellent support!
— Shane D.
Excellent customer service
— Malcolm H.
I have had KnownHost for my site for many years now, and I have been satisfied with it immensely. They are a reliable hosting service and their staff are always on time and respond immediately with lots of attention and caring to your issues. It takes literally a few seconds before they respond to a ticket and all are knowledgeable and friendly, doing their best to help you when there is a critical or important issue with your site. You will not go wrong with having KnownHost as your host and in the packages I have used and gradually upgrading, the increasing cost has been definitely worth it given the time and troubles they save helping me out. It has been a long while since I switched to KnownHost and have never looked back to any other sources. Thanks KnownHost for being there and improving always on your packages and services!
— Mohammad T.
Been a customer for just over 10 years now. Have had multiple servers and services and have been super happy the entire time. The service is second to none as far as I'm concerned. I recommend, and exclusively use, Knownhost for all my hosting.
— Micheal M.
It has been great. I've been with the company for a while and have a good experience even when I had issues.... especially when I had issues.
— Tressa S.
Great service, highly dependable and excelent client support. I would certainly work with knownhost again.
— Cristian M.
In over 10 years using KnownHost, my experience has been excellent. They provide high quality reliable servers and superb technical support. Best in the business!
— Evelio S.
I have had super high availability and anytime there was any issues, support was there and had me going very quickly.
— Karl L.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy/customers:
Skip to Content
Last Updated: November 6, 2023
Shopify Consumer Privacy Policy
Table of Contents
1. Introduction
2. What Personal Data We Receive
3. How We Use Your Personal Data
4. How We Process Your Personal Data on Behalf of Shopify Merchants
5. Third-Parties Who May Receive Personal Data
6. Third Party Partners & Integrations
7. Your Privacy Rights and Choices
8. Retention
9. How to Contact Us
10. Changes to this Privacy Policy
1. Introduction
This privacy policy describes the personal data that Shopify receives and/or processes (which may include collecting, organizing, structuring, storing, using, or disclosing) when you interact with Shopify or use Shopify Consumer Services, as defined in the
Consumer Terms of Service
, including while shopping with a merchant that uses or is powered by Shopify's platform (“
Shopify Merchants
” or “
Merchants
”). Additionally, please review our
overall privacy policy
that applies to everyone whose information we process. If any provisions in this policy conflict with provisions of the overall privacy policy, the provisions in this policy will apply.
2. What Personal Data We Receive
Personal Data is any information from or about an identified or identifiable person, but does not include aggregated or anonymized information. We receive Personal Data when you use or interact with Shopify or Shopify services, which may include the following categories:
Profile and Contact Information
: We receive contact or other profile information when you sign up for or interact with Shopify Consumer Services, which may include name, shipping address, email address, profile picture, or other information you choose to provide us. We may link this information to the different devices or accounts you use when you interact with Shopify or use the Shopify Consumer Services.
Device Information
: We receive information about the computers, phones, and other devices you use or interact with Shopify or Shopify Consumer Services, including IP address (which may be used to determine general location), device identifiers, cookie IDs, the browser you use, your network connection, or other unique identifiers or device information.
Payment Information
: We receive payment information when you use Shop Pay or make a purchase through Shopify services, such as your payment card number and expiration date.
Use of Shopify Consumer Services
: We receive information regarding your use of or interactions with Shopify Consumer Services, whether or not you are logged in to Shopify, such as your interactions with Shopify Merchants, the Shop(s) you visit, the products you view and visit, the product reviews and ratings you post and share, your order history, your interactions with Shop.app/search or other marketing activities related to the Shopify Consumer Services, and favorited Shops.
Settings and Privacy Preferences
: We receive information about your settings and preferences on Shopify and our Merchants, as well as information about your browser and device privacy settings.
Communications with Shopify
: We receive information, including message and email content, when you communicate with Shopify (such as for customer support inquiries, taking surveys, participating in promotions or research).
Social Network Accounts
. If you choose to link, connect, or login to Shopify Consumer Services through a third party online service, you direct the service to send us certain information about you controlled by that service, such as profile information. This sharing is subject to the applicable privacy notices and your privacy settings of that service.
Email and Shopping Service Integrations
. We receive information from email messages in the inboxes that you connect to your Shop account, and information from email messages you transfer to the app to be included in your order history. We do not use this information for advertising or marketing purposes.
3. How We Use Your Personal Data
Shopify uses Personal Data for the following purposes depending on how you interact with us or which Shopify services you use and based on your activity across all devices where you log in to, or interact with, Shopify or Shopify services:
Provide, Improve, and Customize Shopify Services
: To provide customized Shopify services to you, including by displaying your purchase history and order status in one place, providing easy payment options when you shop, recommending products, Merchants and Shop(s) and customizing the products featured for you, and to improve Shopify services, including based on your use of Shopify Consumer Services and activity with our Merchant(s).
Track and Implement Your Privacy Preferences and Settings
: To track and implement your settings and privacy preferences with Shopify and our Merchants.
Perform Product Research and Development
: To develop, test, and improve Shopify services, including troubleshooting our products and services, developing new or improved Shopify services, and analyzing your use of and interactions with Shopify services.
Advertise, Market and Promote Shopify
: To market, advertise, and promote Shopify services on and off Shopify, including for personalized communications or advertisements relating to the Shopify services on third-party services.
Provide Customized Advertising for our Merchants
: To provide advertising services to our Merchants, which may include personalized advertising.
Communicate with You
: To communicate with you about Shopify services, including about product updates, your account, and changes to our policies and terms. We also use your information to respond to you when you contact us.
Authentication, Integrity, Security, and Safety
: To authenticate your account, provide a secure payment and shopping experience, and to detect, investigate, and prevent malicious conduct, fraudulent activity or unsafe experiences, address security threats, protect public safety, and secure Shopify Services for you and our Merchants.
Legal Reasons
: To comply with applicable law or respond to valid legal process, including requests from law enforcement or government agencies, to investigate or participate in civil discovery, litigation, or other adversarial legal proceedings, and to enforce or investigate potential violations of our terms or policies.
Shopify may also aggregate, de-identify, and/or anonymize any information collected through the Shopify services in such a way that we cannot reasonably link information to you or your device. We may use such aggregate, de-identified, or anonymous information for any purpose, including, for example, to improve the Shopify service.
4. How We Process Your Personal Data on Behalf of Shopify Merchants
Shopify also processes your Personal Data from Merchants you interact or shop with in order to help Merchants run their Shop(s) and to provide business services to our Merchants. When Shopify processes Personal Data in this way, we are acting at the direction of the Merchant, and the Merchants' terms of service and privacy policy apply—not Shopify's. For more information about how Merchants collect and use personal information when you visit and make purchases in their Shop(s), review the Merchant's terms and privacy policy.
In addition, some Merchants may instruct us to use Personal Data they share with us for targeted advertising for these and other Merchants using these services on third-party sites. You may have the ability to opt out of allowing a Merchant to share your information with us for these purposes directly on that Merchant's site, such as through the Global Privacy Control. We also offer you choices about how Shopify uses personal information merchants share with us for ad services
here
.
5. Third-Parties Who May Receive Personal Data
Depending on which Shopify services you use or interact with, Shopify may provide Personal Data to the following categories of third parties:
Vendors
: Shopify works with third-party service providers to provide, support, and improve Shopify services and technical infrastructure, for business services such as payment processing, including in relation to purchases made when you use Shopify Services, and for marketing and business analytics.
Marketing, Advertising, and Analytics Partners
: We may use third-party marketing, advertising, and business analytics partners to deliver personalized advertising and to help us understand how people use or interact with Shopify services and our Merchants. These partners may receive information about your use of, or interactions with, Shopify services, including through third-party cookies or other technologies. For example, we may make information available to third-party advertising companies to serve you with relevant ads or content and to manage, improve and measure our advertising campaigns. Providing information to third parties for personalized advertising services may be considered “sharing” for cross-context behavioral advertising, or “targeted advertising,” as defined by applicable law. You may opt-out of our sharing of Personal Data for cross-context behavioral advertising or targeted advertising by using the relevant settings available
here
. Please see Your Privacy Rights and Choices below for additional information.
Change of Control
: We may share Personal Data with actual or prospective acquirers, their representatives and other relevant participants in, or during negotiations of, any sale, merger, acquisition, restructuring, or change in control involving all or a portion of Shopify's business or assets, including in connection with bankruptcy or similar proceedings.
Legal Reasons
: We may share Personal Data as needed to: (1) comply with applicable law or respond to, investigate, or participate in valid legal process and proceedings, including from law enforcement or government agencies; (2) enforce or investigate potential violations of its Terms of Service or policies; (3) detect, prevent, or investigate potential fraud, abuse, or safety and security concerns, including threats to the public; (4) meet our corporate and social responsibility commitments; (5) protect our and our Merchants and users' rights and property; and (6) resolve disputes and enforce agreements.
Sharing at Your Discretion
: Where you provide consent, we share your information as described at the time of consent, such as when connecting with a third party application or website.
6. Third Party Partners & Integrations
Parts of Shopify services may link to third party services. Shopify doesn't own or control these third parties. When you interact with these third parties and choose to use their services, your use is subject to the privacy policies of those providers.
7. Your Privacy Rights and Choices
You may have certain rights to manage your Personal Data depending on where you live. To exercise any privacy rights available to you, please visit our
privacy portal
. Depending on your jurisdiction, the following rights may apply, subject to certain exceptions:
Access and Portability
: Right to request access to your Personal Data.
Correction / Rectification
: Right to correct inaccurate or incomplete Personal Data in certain circumstances.
Deletion / Erasure
: Right to delete Personal Data about you.
Right to opt out of “sharing” for cross-context behavioral advertising or targeted advertising
. Right to opt-out of the “sharing” of your Personal Data for cross context behavioral advertising or targeted advertising (as further described in the Third-Parties Who May Receive Personal Data section).
You can also update your account information or request to deactivate or delete your account directly through your in-app settings. You may have additional rights available to you. Please see our
overall privacy policy
for more information.
8. Retention
We retain Personal Data for as long as we have an ongoing business need to do so (e.g., to provide the Shopify services, to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements, for security and fraud detection or prevention, or in connection with backup or disaster recovery processes), unless a different retention period is permitted or required by applicable law.
The criteria used to determine our retention periods include the following:
The length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you and provide Shopify services to you (for example, for as long as you have an account with us or keep using our services);
Whether you modify or delete your information through your accounts;
Whether Shopify has a legal obligation to keep the data (for example, certain laws require Shopify to keep records of your transactions for a certain period of time); or
Whether retention is advisable in light of our legal position (such as in regard to the enforcement of our agreements, the resolution of disputes, the applicable statutes of limitations, litigation, or regulatory investigation).
9. How to Contact Us
To exercise your rights, please visit our
Privacy Portal
. For questions or concerns related to this Privacy Policy, you may
contact us
.
10. Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy periodically to account for changes in our collection and/or processing of Personal Data, and we will post the updated Privacy Policy on our website, with a “Last Updated” date at the top.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.applovin.com/privacy/:
Products
Axon
AI-powered recommendation engine
AppDiscovery
Acquire your ideal users
MAX
Monetize your app
SparkLabs
Create ads that perform
AppLovin Exchange
Reach your audience
Array
Increase value across customer’s lifecycle
Adjust
Measure your marketing
Wurl
Our streaming TV solution
Solutions
Increase ARPDAU
Grow Ad Inventory
Acquire App Users
Increase IAPs
Resources
Success Stories
Blog
Video Library
Guides and Reports
Glossary
Events
View all resources
More about us
Partners
Jobs
NEW
Press
About Us
Sign Up
Sign In
ENG
中文
日本語
한국어
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policies
Privacy Policy
隐私政策
Datenschutzerklärung
プライバシーポリシー
개인정보 보호 정책
Política de Privacidade
Politique de confidentialité
AppLovin Partners
AppLovin Policies for Publishers
AppLovin Policies for Demand Partners
AppLovin Array Privacy Policy
Terms
Terms of Use
使用协议条款
Vereinbarung über die Nutzungsbedingungen
利用規約
이용 약관 계약
Contrato de Termos de Uso
Accord sur les Conditions d’utilisation
DMCA Notice
End User License Agreement — Software
AppLovin Array Terms of Service
APPLOVIN PLATFORM DATA PROCESSING AGREEMENT
AppLovin Demand Partner Data Processing Agreement
Effective Date
: October 30, 2024
You can find the prior version
here
.
AppLovin Corporation (“we,” “us,” “our,” or “AppLovin”) operates a suite of tools for app developers and other businesses to automate and optimize the marketing and monetization of their platforms, products, or services by enabling the placement of different types of advertisements on digital properties including mobile apps, websites, and connected TV devices (collectively, the “Advertising Services” or “Services”).  As explained below, consumers interact with us in a few ways, primarily through advertisements served by AppLovin on behalf of advertisers.
The AppLovin Privacy Policy (this “Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, use, and share information through our Services and advertising platform, and our corporate website at www.applovin.com (the “Website”), as well as your choices related to that information.
Contents
Our Advertising Services
Our Website
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Policy Changes
Contact Us
Our Advertising Services
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Advertising Services.
General Information Collection and Use
If you are a consumer who downloads and uses an application which contains the AppLovin SDK or otherwise interacts with the Services through advertisements served within a digital property, we may collect certain information, including the following:
Device, App, and Browser Data
Device make, model, and operating system;
Device properties related to screen size, orientation, audio, battery, device memory usage, settings, and boot time;
Device settings related to accessibility features, font size, and theme;
Carrier;
Name and properties of mobile application through which a consumer interacts with the Services;
Country, time zone, and locale settings (country and preferred language);
Network connection type and speed;
IP Address;
Internet browser user-agent used to access the Services;
HTTP header information;
Advertising IDs (IDFA/GAID/Amazon FOSAID);
Vendor IDs (IDFV);
App Set IDs; and
Advertising and tracking preferences and restrictions.
Application publishers may choose to share with us additional information including your age or year of birth, gender, email, phone number, and interest segments for purposes of their own direct ad serving.  We do not retain this data or pass it downstream to advertising partners.  Please see the applicable publisher’s privacy policy for more information about their use of first party data.
Advertisers (through the advertiser itself or through a third party service provider on behalf of such advertiser) may also share transactional or “event” data related to a consumer’s interaction with an application, such as information about the actions taken in an application like purchases or application installations.
Information Collection and Use Specific
to
e-Commerce Ads Only
If you are a consumer who interacts with the Services through an e-commerce platform or a merchant website, we may collect certain additional information (that you provided to the e-commerce platform or merchant, through a third party’s API, our SDK, pixel, or other similar technologies), including the following:
User IDs;
Shopping browsing behavior (e.g., views) and search history;
Records of products purchased or considered (e.g., added to cart, check out);
Purchasing histories; and
Information regarding user interactions with advertising partners and their merchant partners’ sites and advertisements.
How We Collect Your Information
This information may be collected automatically across mobile apps and devices or received from third-parties across different technologies over time. We may also combine information we collect with other information we derive through analytical techniques, and we will use that combined information to offer the Services.
How We Use Your Information
We generally use the information we collect to:
Deliver the Services, maintain, and improve them, including our AI-powered advertising technology, and research and develop new ones;
Promote safety, security, and integrity of Services;
Provide measurement, analytics, and reporting; and
Comply with legal and regulatory obligations.
We use AI-powered advertising technology (sometimes referred to as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our advertising products and Services and serve ads that are relevant and interesting to you. We use it in ways that do not produce legal or similarly significant effects on you (for example, by reordering how advertisements might appear when you visit a digital property such as a mobile app or a website).
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect or derive with third parties in the following contexts:
Service Providers.
We transfer information to service providers, and other partners who support our business, such as providing technical infrastructure services, analyzing how our Services are used, measuring the effectiveness of ads and services, providing customer service, or facilitating payments. These partners must adhere to strict confidentiality obligations in a way that is consistent with this Privacy Policy and the agreements we enter into with them.
Affiliates.
We may share information within the AppLovin family of companies for purposes consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Advertising Partners.
We share information with our third-party advertising partners, including advertisers, ad networks, exchanges, demand side platforms, merchants, other advertising partners (who aggregate their own demand sources), and ad optimization and measurement/attribution partners (e.g., mobile measurement partners or “MMPs”) to provide our clients with Advertising Services. This information may be used by such third-party partners to measure how effective ads are, show advertisements to end users for products and services that are more likely to appeal to them (a practice known as interest-based advertising or behavioral advertising), and to undertake web analytics to analyze traffic and other ad activity to improve the advertising experience.
Unless otherwise noted in our partner list, each AppLovin advertising partner is an independent controller of your data. You can view a list of AppLovin advertising partners with whom we share your data
here
, current as of the date listed at the top of that page.
If you do not want to receive interest-based advertisements, please see the
“Manage Your Privacy Choices”
section below. If you are located in the European Union, UK, or Switzerland, you may also see the
“Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals”
section below for more options. If you are an individual resident of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws, you may also review the “
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
” section below for more options.
Please note that the practices of our third-party advertising partners delivering advertisements through our Services are subject to those partners’ own privacy policies.
Regulatory or Legal Requirements.
We may disclose information to governmental regulatory authorities as required by law, including for tax or accounting purposes, in response to their requests for such information or to assist in investigations. We may also disclose personal information to third parties in connection with claims, disputes, or litigation, when otherwise required by law or court order.
Safety and Terms Enforcement.
We may disclose information if we determine, in our sole discretion, that its disclosure is necessary to protect the health, safety, or rights of you or any other person, protect against fraud, or enforce our legal rights, including contractual commitments made to us by third parties.
Business Transfers.
We may disclose personal information as part of an organizational business transaction, such as a merger, acquisition, joint venture, financing, or sale of organizational assets and may transfer personal information to a third party as one of the business assets in such a transaction. We may also disclose personal information in the event of insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership.
Manage Your Privacy Choices:
To limit collection of information from mobile devices, please visit your device’s settings to set the “Limit Ad Track” or other similar features on your device. Additionally, you may opt-out of interest-based advertising within ads served by AppLovin. For detailed instructions, see
How AppLovin Shows You Ads
. You can also make choices about data collection for certain companies by visiting an industry consumer choice platform such as the NAI (
https://optout.networkadvertising.org/
) or DAA (
https://optout.aboutads.info/
).  You may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests.
To see or manage the data collected by AppLovin from your device, you may download the AppLovin Privacy Management Application from the Apple or Google Play Stores:
By navigating through the tabs in the AppLovin Privacy Management Application, you can erase the personal information that AppLovin may have collected about you or request a copy of that personal information.
Children’s Privacy
We do not knowingly collect personal information from, or serve advertisements to, children as defined and required by applicable laws. If you believe we have served an advertisement to a child or might have any personal information from or about a child, or if you believe a mobile application in which an AppLovin-served advertisement appeared may be designed for, directed to, or pass personal information knowingly from, children in violation of our policies, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We implement reasonable measures to help secure the information we collect through the Services. We retain the data we collect through the Services for up to 2 years. Information is automatically purged from our system if the Services do not receive any updated information for a device in the last 2 years. Note that we will retain information in our systems for as long as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF ADVERTISING SERVICES-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Our Website
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Website.
Cookies and Other Similar Technology
The Website uses cookies, web beacons, or other similar technology to collect information for various purposes, including interest-based advertising. This information may include your IP address, device identifier, browser type, device type, the date and time of your visit, and the areas of the Website you visit. To learn more about and manage the cookies on this Website, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer. You may also be able to limit the use of cookies through your browser settings. Note that certain parts of the Website may not function properly without cookies. Additionally, you may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests. If you erase your cookies, reset your device identifier, or use different browsers or devices, you may need to make your choices again.
We partner with Google Analytics to learn more about how you use our Website. For more information about how Google Analytics works you can visit
here
. To opt-out of Google Analytics, you can visit
here
and follow the instructions.
Additional Information Collection for Business Account Owners
When you register with AppLovin to use our Services, you may provide us with personal information such as your name, email address, phone number, mailing address, user name, and password. You may also provide us with payment information when you submit or receive a payment, or other information when you complete the online forms available on the Website. We may also acquire information from other trusted sources to update or supplement the information that you voluntarily provide to us or that we collect automatically.
How We Use Your Information
We may use the information we collect or you provide to us through the Website for various purposes, including:
To communicate with you, for example through newsletters or with other information about our products and services;
To operate and improve the Website and our Services;
To customize the Website;
For analytics and research;
For marketing purposes; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect through the Website in the following contexts:
With your consent;
For advertising and marketing purposes;
In response to a subpoena, court order, or other legal process;
To protect our rights and the rights of others;
With our affiliates;
With service providers that help us operate the Website and Services;
As part of a sale, merger, or acquisition, including at bankruptcy; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Links to Other Websites
The Website may provide links to other websites or other digital properties that we do not control. We encourage you to review the privacy policy of those digital properties that you may visit.
Updating Information
You can update the personal information you provide to us by correcting, updating, or deleting the information associated with you via your AppLovin account. To add, modify, remove, or request access to the personal information about you that we hold, please see the
“Contact Us”
section below.
Your Marketing Choices
If you no longer wish to receive marketing-related emails from us on a going-forward basis, you may opt out of receiving these emails by clicking “Unsubscribe” at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from us or by emailing us at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Children
Our Website is not intended for use by children as defined and required by applicable law. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children through the Website. If you believe we might have any personal information from or about a child, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We have implemented reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures for the Website to help protect information we collect and store.
For detailed information regarding retention associated with cookies on the applovin.com domain, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer to learn more.
We retain other information such as customer contact and payment information in our systems for as long as necessary as permitted by law to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF WEBSITE-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
If you are located in the European Union, United Kingdom, or Switzerland, the following additional provisions apply to you.
Data Privacy Framework
AppLovin complies with the EU-U.S Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.
AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
If you are an EU, UK, or Swiss individual, where we transfer your personal data to third party servicer providers (see above) who perform services for us or on our behalf, we are responsible for the processing of that data by them and shall remain liable if they process your personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
With respect to personal data received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework, AppLovin is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, AppLovin may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, AppLovin commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact AppLovin at
dataprotection@applovin.com
. AppLovin refers unresolved complaints to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  These dispute resolution services are provided at no cost to you.
For complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website.
Lawful Basis for Processing
On certain occasions, we process your personal data when it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are a party, such as to provide services to you. We may also process your personal data to respond to your inquiries concerning our products and services.
On other occasions, we process your personal data where required by law. We may also process your personal data if necessary to protect your interests or the interests of a third party.
Additionally, we process your personal data when necessary to do so for fraud prevention, improving our network and services, and marketing our services to advertisers and publishers, where these interests are not overridden by your data protection rights.
If the processing of your personal data is necessary, we will generally ensure that consent has been obtained from you if there is no other lawful basis for such processing. You have the right to withdraw your consent to processing of personal data at any time.
If personal data covered by this Privacy Policy is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which the personal data was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is to be disclosed to a non-agent third party in a manner not specified in this Privacy Policy, we will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data so used or disclosed. Requests to opt out of such uses or disclosures of personal data should be sent to us as specified in the “Contact” section below. Certain personal data, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, is considered “Sensitive Information”. AppLovin does not collect or seek to elicit “Sensitive Information”.
For questions about data processing, please contact our Data Protection Officer. Visit the “Contact” section below for contact information.
Your Rights
If you are an individual in the EU, UK, or Switzerland, you are able:
To request access to the personal data we hold about you;
To request that we rectify or erase your personal data;
To request that we restrict or block the processing of your personal data;
Under certain circumstances, to receive personal data about you that we store and transmit to another without hindrance from us, including requesting that we provide your personal data directly to another, i.e., a right to data portability; and
Where we previously obtained your consent, to withdraw consent to processing your personal data.
To exercise these rights, please contact us at the email address set forth in the
“Contact Us”
section below.  Our Data Protection Officer can also be reached at this email address.  Please be aware that we may be unable to afford these rights to you under certain circumstances, such as if we are legally prevented from doing so.
In certain circumstances, you may appoint an authorized agent to exercise any rights that you may have on your behalf.  If you choose to exercise any rights through an authorized agent, you will need to verify your identity directly with us before we can process any requests.  In addition, we will need written documentation demonstrating the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf.
Additionally, you have the right to lodge a complaint against us. To do so, contact the supervisory authority in your country of residence.
EU and UK Privacy Representatives
We have appointed
Prighter Group
as our privacy representatives in the EU and UK.  You can contact us through our privacy representatives at the following addresses:
For residents of the EU
:
PrighterGDPR-Rep by Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG
c/o AppLovin Corporation
Kriegerstraße 44
30161 Hannover
Germany
For residents of the UK
:
PrighterUK-Rep by Prighter Ltd.
c/o AppLovin Corporation
20 Mortlake Mortlake High Street
London, SW14 8JN
United Kingdom
Additional information regarding our privacy representatives can be found at the following link:
https://prighter.com/q/19826057144
.
[END OF EU/UK/SWISS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Additional provisions for individual residents of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws are included in our
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
, which explains how those residents may exercise their privacy rights.
Policy Changes
We may, in our sole discretion, make changes to this Privacy Policy from time to time in order to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements, or for other purposes. If we make any changes, we will update the “Effective Date” posted at the top of this Privacy Policy. If we make any material changes, we may notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of a notice on the Website prior to the change becoming effective. We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to ensure that you understand how we collect, use, and share information.
Any changes to this Privacy Policy will become effective when the revised Privacy Policy is posted on the Website. By continuing to use the Website or Advertising Services following such changes, you are agreeing to accept the terms of the revised Privacy Policy.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy, please write to us at:
Data Protection Officer
AppLovin Corporation
1100 Page Mill Road
Palo Alto, CA 94304
You can also contact us or our Data Protection Officer via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Please be sure to include your relevant account information in any correspondence to us.  This will help ensure that we can respond to your inquiry in a timely manner.
If you have a customer care issue, please visit
AppLovin Support
.
Sub-policy 4
https://support.chartboost.com/en/legal/privacy-policy:
Legal
Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Terms & Conditions Addendum
Data Sharing Addendum
Subprocessors
Tipalti Agreement
Guidelines
Advertiser & Creative Content Guidelines
Chartboost Core Contribution License Agreement
Privacy Policy
Last updated: April 19, 2024
OVERVIEW
This privacy policy (“
Privacy Policy
”) explains how information about our customers, visitors of our sites and end users is collected and utilized by Chartboost, Inc. (“
Chartboost
”, “
our
”, or “
we
”). This Privacy Policy applies to the websites provided by Chartboost, including without limitation
www.Chartboost.com
(“
Sites
”) and Chartboost’s advertising services (“
Chartboost Services
”). The Chartboost Services allow publishers of mobile applications to show ads on their applications, and advertisers to reach audiences that could be interested in their products or services. We also work with a number of partners in the ad tech ecosystem to enable the serving of ads on publisher apps. “
Customers
” refers to publishers, advertisers and other ad tech partners (current and prospective) and their employees, contractors, or agents. “
End Users
” refers to end users of our Customers’ services. “
You
” and “
your
” refer collectively to Sites visitors, Customers and End Users. If you have any concerns about this Privacy Policy you can send an email to
privacy@chartboost.com
.
1.          PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
In this Section, we outline the categories of personal information (“
Personal Information
”) we collect and how we collect it.
a) Categories of Personal Information Collected
Customers and Sites visitors:
Contact details
, such as name and email address.
Account registration information
, including the company for which you work, country of residence, password.
Technical Information
about your browser and device is automatically collected when you visit the Sites. These include IP address, the type and version of browser used to access the Sites, operating system, language of the browser and operating system, and type of device.
Information about how you
interacted with the Sites
(e.g. whether you clicked on a specific link, where you clicked, time spent on the Sites, etc.).
End Users:
Identifiers
such as Advertising ID (i.e. Google Advertising ID on Android devices, and ID For Advertising, on iOS devices), IP address and other similar identifiers. The Advertising ID is a resettable persistent identifier generated by Android or iOS that allows online advertising companies to recognize a device across apps, for advertising purposes. We can also identify an End User’s device using Chartboost’s internal device ID, which is linked to an End User’s Advertising ID. We may also create a temporary identifier on an app by app basis, which would not be linked to an End User’s Advertiser ID.
Contact Information
- If you contact our customer support team, we will collect your name and email address in order to respond to your request.
Technical device information
, including operating system name and version, device model, the name and version of the app to which the ad is served, SDK version and information about your settings (screen size, audio settings, language settings, time zone, internet connection type (e.g. WiFi), storage space, and battery status) and other similar information.
Campaign information
such as whether an ad was viewed, clicked on, and whether an app was installed and, if shared by the advertiser, actions performed within the app such as when an End User launches the app, how long the End User plays the app, and other in-app events (e.g. in-app purchases, level reached).
In addition, when an End User accesses a video ad, we and others may collect additional statistics about videos and video playback such as: start/boot-up information, amount played/session length information, memory on the device used for our video cache, videos cached on a device and complete view event.
b) How is Personal Information of Customers and Sites Visitors Collected?
We collect Customer Personal Information directly from the Customer upon:
Registration
: We collect the above listed Personal Information when a Customer signs up for the Chartboost Services.
Contact/Other requests
: On the Sites, we offer online forms to enable Customers to contact us. We also offer Customers the opportunity to request specific content, like newsletters and whitepapers we publish. We may ask for consent before we send information about the Chartboost Services in the future.
We automatically collect the Personal Information of a visitor of the Sites through
cookies and beacons
. A “cookie” is a small piece of data that is stored on your computer or mobile device. Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our Sites. We may also allow third parties to place cookies on our Sites to track use of the Sites to enable us to analyze the traffic of our marketing pages. The Sites or the emails we send may also use web beacons (also called “clear GIFs” or “pixel tags”) and similar technologies in conjunction with cookies. Our Sites also use information collected in our log files (such as Internet Protocol Address, referring URLs, etc.) about activities on the Sites to better understand how the Sites are used, resolve technical problems, and enhance the experience of Site visitors. For more information about the cookies we use, please review our
Cookie Policy Notice
.
c) How is Personal Information of End Users Collected?
Chartboost works with advertisers, publishers and other ad tech partners. For example, Chartboost helps advertisers promote their products and services by allowing them to bid on advertising inventory and serve ads to their desired audiences. Chartboost also works with publishers (e.g. mobile apps) that have advertising inventory available on their platform for advertisers to buy.  Chartboost also works as an intermediary connecting advertisers and publishers directly as well as platforms that consolidate advertiser demand and publisher supply.
When an ad is served through the Chartboost Services, we may collect the above listed Personal Information either:
directly from the End Users’ devices
when our software developer kit (SDK) is integrated into the publisher app on which the ad is displayed (for example, if you see an ad that was served by us on an app that you use, we would have collected your Personal Information directly from that app);
from the advertiser
who would decide the Personal Information they want to share with us when creating their campaign;
from other third-parties
within the ad tech ecosystem, such as third party data providers or other advertising services companies.
2.          HOW WE USE PERSONAL INFORMATION
In this Section, we outline how we process the Personal Information of our Customers, Sites visitors and of End Users, including how long we retain the Personal Information for.
a) Business and Commercial Purposes of Personal Information Collection and Use
We generally collect and use the above-listed categories of Personal Information to best serve you and deliver, support, and market the Chartboost Services.
More specifically, we collect and use the Personal Information of
Customers and Sites visitors
for the following purposes:
To provide the Sites to our Customers.
To create, maintain, customize, and secure our Customers’ accounts with us.
To provide Customers with customized content or targeted offers.
To allow Customers to offer advertising inventory and/or bid on advertising inventory and serve ads.
To report information about a Customer’s ad campaign.
With consent, to send information, newsletters, and promotional materials from us or on behalf of our group of companies and marketing partners.
We collect and use the Personal Information of
End Users
for the following purposes:
To provide the Chartboost Services to our Customers. As outlined above, Chartboost works with advertisers, publishers and ad tech partners. Chartboost helps advertisers promote their products and services by allowing them to bid on advertising inventory and serve ads to their desired audiences. Chartboost works with publishers (e.g. mobile apps) that have advertising inventory available on their platform for advertisers to buy. Chartboost also works as an intermediary connecting advertisers and publishers directly as well as platforms that consolidate advertiser demand and publisher supply. Ads can be:
personalized and based on your potential interests, the interests of users similar to you, and what you are most likely to engage with when you consent to this (taking into account the nature of ads and apps you typically engage with) - we refer to these as “personalized ads”; and/or
served based on your device technical information, the content of the publisher platform the ad will be displayed on and current or prior geolocation (if you are in a specific country, the ads would be relevant to that location) - we refer to these as “contextual ads”.
To derive inferences from the above categories of Personal Information and create a personalized profile to better identify goods and services that could be of interest to you. The information we infer, access, and collect may determine the nature of the ad that the End User sees.
To optimize Customers’ advertising campaigns, including by re-targeting End Users based on usage patterns.
To report to our Customers information about an ad campaign, including for example, when you saw or clicked on ads, whether you downloaded an advertised app and your purchases in an advertised app.
To prevent you from seeing the same ad or similar ads too many times.
If Customers do not want to expose End Users to personalized advertising campaigns, Customers can choose to opt out of personalized advertising by following the relevant instructions as set out on the Sites.
Finally, we collect and use the Personal Information of
Customers, Sites visitors and End Users
for the following purposes:
To detect and prevent fraud and unauthorized transactions.
To improve the usability and design of our Sites and the Chartboost Services by analyzing user interactions, feedback, and/or navigation patterns, which allows us to understand how our Sites and the Chartboost Services are being used and to identify areas for improvement as well as to develop new products or services within the ad tech ecosystem.
To monitor, protect, and maintain the operation, security and integrity of the Sites, the Chartboost Services and our business.
To communicate with you, including by responding to your inquiries, requesting feedback from you, and sending you updates about the Sites, the Chartboost Services, and this Privacy Policy.
To comply with applicable laws and regulations and respond to lawful requests and communications from law enforcement and other government officials.
To carry out sales and business transactions in which information held by us is among the assets transferred or is otherwise relevant to the evaluation, negotiation, or completion of the transaction.
To protect our rights, privacy, safety, property and/or those of others.
To fulfill any other purpose for which you provide your Personal Information or as explained to you at the point of information collection.
b) Retention
We retain Personal Information for as long as is necessary or as permitted in light of the purpose(s) for which it was obtained and consistent with applicable law. To determine the appropriate retention period of Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of Personal Information; the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the Personal Information; the purpose for which we use the Personal Information; whether we can achieve the purposes through other means; and the applicable legal requirements (e.g. legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements).
If you are a Customer, we retain your Personal Information for as long as you have an account with us or keep using the Chartboost Services. Please refer to Section 9 to see how you can delete your account or information.
The Personal Information of Sites visitors is retained in accordance with our cookie policy.
The Personal Information of End Users is retained for a maximum of 365 days, after which it is either anonymized or destroyed.
We will store information for longer periods when complying with our legal and regulatory obligations, to defend Chartboost interests (in case of a dispute), for archiving or statistical purposes in which case we will take appropriate measures to ensure that the information is used solely for this purpose.
More information, including a description of your legal rights, can be found below in the “Privacy Rights and Requests” Section.
3.          LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING
Some jurisdictions require a legal basis for processing personal data. In this Section, we outline the different legal bases we rely on depending on the processing activity.
DATA SUBJECT
PROCESSING ACTIVITY
LEGAL BASIS
PERSONAL INFORMATION USED
End Users
Displaying personalized advertising on publisher platforms (e.g. mobile applications).
Consent obtained by the publisher
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Displaying contextual advertising - i.e. advertising based on the content of the publisher platform you visit, technical parameters of the device or current or prior geolocation.
Legitimate Interest
IP address
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Attribution - i.e. matching user conversions (e.g. purchases, app installs) to campaign events, like clicks and displays.
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Improvement of the Chartboost Services
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users, Customers and Sites visitors
Fraud prevention and detection
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
Technical Information
Information about Sites interactions
End Users
Reporting
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
End Users
Frequency capping
Legitimate Interest
Identifiers
Technical device information
Campaign information
Customers
Provision of the Chartboost Services to Customers
Performance of a contract
Contact details
Account registration information
Technical Information
Customers
Marketing communications
Consent
Contact details
Technical Information
Sites interaction
4.          INFORMATION DISCLOSURE
In this Section we outline who we may disclose your Personal Information with:
Processors and service providers.
We contract with vendors to provide some part of the Sites and the Chartboost Services or to assist us in analyzing our services or information. Chartboost may provide Personal Information to such processors and service providers, or they may collect information from you on our behalf or on behalf of our Customers.
Marketing, advertising, and analytics partners.
When we collect or receive End User data, we disclose this information to third parties with whom we have a strategic relationship with, including on behalf of our Customers, to provide the Chartboost Services. These partners include advertisers, ad networks, exchanges, demand side platforms, and ad optimization and measurement/attribution partners. The Personal Information disclosed to these partners can be used to measure how effective ads are, to track ad conversions, to offer advertising inventory, bid on advertising inventory, to serve ads, to analyze traffic and other ad activity to improve the advertising experience, for industry analysis and to create personalized profiles.
These partners may collect information about your online activities over time and across different websites and applications.
Public authorities.
We may be required to disclose information about you in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. We will disclose such information to government or law enforcement officials as we, in our sole discretion, believe necessary or appropriate to respond to legal process (including but not limited to subpoenas), to protect the property and rights of Chartboost, our Customers, End Users, or any third party, to protect the safety of the public or any person, or to prevent or stop activity we may consider to be, or to pose a risk of being, illegal, unethical or legally actionable.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction.
In the event of a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may disclose or transfer your Personal Information to certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisers.
Our subsidiaries and affiliates.
We may transmit your Personal Information to our subsidiaries and affiliates for processing in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Other third parties.
We will disclose your Personal Information to third parties if you or our Customers direct us to do so or you consent to such sharing. In addition, we will disclose your Personal Information as we believe necessary or appropriate to: (a) comply with applicable law; (b) enforce our terms and conditions; (c) protect our operations; (d) protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, and/or those of you or others; (e) allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain; or (f) private parties in response to a subpoena or other valid legal process.
Aggregate or anonymous data.
We may disclose aggregate or anonymous information about End Users to our Customers and other advertisers, publishers, business partners, sponsors, or third parties.
5.          PRIVACY PRACTICES OF CUSTOMERS AND THIRD PARTIES
End Users should review that Customers’ privacy policies. We do not control and are not responsible for the privacy practices of any Customer or other third party, and any website or service that links to or from our Sites or the Chartboost Services. This Privacy Policy applies solely to information collected by Chartboost.
6.          INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS
Chartboost is a company based in the United States. In the context of the provision of the Chartboost Services, your Personal Information is processed, transferred and stored in the United States and other countries that may not have privacy laws equivalent to the country where you reside.
When your information is in another country, it may be accessed by the courts, law enforcement, and national security authorities pursuant to the laws of that country. If you reside in the UK, EU, EEA or Switzerland, we rely on Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission (available at:
https://commission.europa.eu/publications/standard-contractual-clauses-international-transfers_en
) and/or other approved legal mechanisms to transfer personal data from the UK, EU, EEA or Switzerland to countries located outside of these locations (as applicable).
7.          CONFIDENTIALITY AND SECURITY
We follow generally accepted industry standards and maintain appropriate safeguards to help protect the security, integrity, and privacy of the information we collect about you. These security measures are designed to protect against the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, misuse, alteration, and unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, the information under our control. However, no system can be 100% secure and we cannot guarantee our security measures.
8.          END USER CHOICES
Sites visitors/Customers:
You can control how your browser responds to cookies by adjusting the privacy and security settings of your web browser. However, some features of our Sites, including certain features made available to Customers may not function properly if you disable cookies.
End Users:
To learn more about interest-based advertising, and to access the opt-outs of certain online advertising companies, visit the Network Advertising Initiative at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/#completed
or Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) at
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. For individuals from the UK, EU, EEA or Switzerland, you can visit Your Online Choices at
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You can opt out of interest-based advertisements by adjusting the settings on your mobile device. Each device and browser you use may have separate settings.
For iOS mobile devices, go to “Settings” from the device’s home screen; scroll down to “Privacy”; select “Advertising”; and turn on “Limit Ad Tracking.”
For Android mobile devices, go to “Google Settings” on the device; select “Ads”; and check the box labeled “Opt Out of Interest-Based Ads.”
At the app level, check the (Privacy) Settings section of the app. This setting and the language may vary by app and by where you are located. You may have to perform this action on each app.
You can review
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choices
for more information regarding how you can opt out via the mobile platform. If you would like to disable the collection of your mobile device geolocation information, you can make this selection on your mobile device.
You should complete the opt-out process for all devices and browsers you use. If you opt-out of interest-based advertising, you will still receive general advertisements but these might not be as relevant to you.
9.          PRIVACY RIGHTS AND REQUESTS
If you are a resident of the EU, Switzerland, or other jurisdictions with similar rules for data protection, Chartboost recognizes that you may have privacy rights listed below in relation to your Personal Information. Privacy rights that you may have include:
The right to obtain, at reasonable intervals and free of charge, confirmation as to what personal data about you Chartboost processes.
The right to object to the processing of your personal data for direct marketing purposes or based on your particular situation.
The right to have your personal data rectified or corrected, blocked or deleted if the data are incorrect, incomplete, irrelevant, outdated or processed unlawfully.
The right to receive the personal data Chartboost processes about you in a structured and commonly used format and to transmit those data to another controller.
The right to obtain information about how your data has been shared with third-parties.
The right to revoke consent and have data processed on such a basis to be erased.
Chartboost Services interface tools.
If you are a Customer, some of your Personal Information can be changed or deleted by following the process provided in your Chartboost Services account, unless we must keep the information for legitimate business or legal reasons. If you delete certain portions of your information, your account may become deactivated.
Support requests
. If the request you wish to make is not possible through your Chartboost Services account, you can file a support request by visiting:
https://docs.chartboost.com/en/support/contact-us/
.
Identity verification.
We may request evidence of your identity for verification purposes. We will respond to your request within the applicable statutory term.
End User request.
If an End User exercises any of their rights with you with respect to the processing of their Personal Information by us, please use the tools in your Chartboost Services Account to accommodate their request, or, if this is not possible, please visit:
https://docs.chartboost.com/en/support/contact-us/
.
U.S. STATE PRIVACY RIGHTS
A.          Summary of Categories of Personal Information Collected, Sold, and Shared for End Users
Category of Personal Information Collected
Is this Category Sold or Shared?
Contact information
, including your name, email address.
No
Other identifiers
, including Advertising ID (i.e. Google Advertising ID on Android devices, and ID For Advertising, on iOS devices), IP address and other similar identifiers.
Yes
Technical app and device information
, including operating system name and version, Bundle ID, device model, the name and version of the app to which the ad is served, SDK version and information about your settings (screen size, audio settings, language settings, time zone, internet connection type (e.g. WiFi), storage space, and battery status) and other similar information.
Yes
Coarse geolocation data (derived from IP address)
, including the location of the device you use and your country.
Yes
Campaign information and statistics
, including whether you view and how you interacted with an ad and/or publisher app.
Yes
Inferences
, meaning inferences that we draw from the above categories of Personal Information to create a personalized profile so we can better identify goods and services that could  be of interest to you.
No
B.          Summary of Categories of Personal Information Collected, Sold, and Shared for Sites Visitors and Customers
Category of Personal Information Collected
Is this Category Sold or Shared?
Identifiers
, including your name, email address, IP address, or other similar identifiers.
Yes (IP address)
Internet or other electronic network activity information
, such as IP address, cookie information and how you interacted with the Sites (e.g. whether you clicked on a specific link, where you clicked, time spent on the Sites, etc.)
Yes
Technical information
, including the type and version of browser used to access the Sites, operating system, language of the browser and operating system, and type of device.
Yes
Coarse geolocation data
, including the location of the device you use and your country.
No
Professional or employment-related information
, including the company you work for.
No
As indicated in the chart, we “sell” or “share” (as such terms are defined in California law and other applicable laws) some of these categories to business partners and third parties, such as data analytics providers, advertising technology vendors, and social media platforms for marketing purposes and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy. We do not knowingly sell or share Personal Information about persons under the age of 16. Please click
here
to opt out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Information by Chartboost.
Depending on your U.S. state of residences, you may have the following rights:
Right to Know:
The right to know what Personal Information we have collected about you, including the categories of Personal Information and the categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about you. Please note that we may not be required to respond to your requests “to know” or access specific pieces of Personal Information more than twice in any 12-month period.
Right to Data Portability:
The right to access your Personal Information in a portable format.
Right to Delete:
The right to request that we delete Personal Information that we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to Correct:
The right to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we may maintain about you, subject to appropriate verification.
Right to Opt Out of Certain Types of Personal Information Uses and Disclosures:
We use and disclose to third parties’ Personal Information for analytics and advertising purposes. Accordingly, you may have the right to opt out of the “sale” or "sharing” of your Personal Information, or the use and disclosure of your Personal Information for “targeted advertising” (as these terms are defined in applicable law).
If you are interested in exercising any of the above-listed rights, please visit:
https://docs.chartboost.com/en/support/contact-us/
.
To protect your privacy, we may require the matching of up to three pieces of Personal Information provided with your request with Personal Information we maintain to verify that it is you making the request. Where applicable, we will use the requested information for verification purposes only. Please note that we can decline a request where we are unable to verify your identity and confirm the Personal Information we maintain relates to you.
Exercising Your Sale and Sharing Opt-Out Right
As detailed in the table above, we “sell” and “share” certain categories of Personal Information to and with third parties. If you are 16 years of age or older, in addition to the rights described above, you have the right to direct us to not “sell” or “share” your Personal Information at any time. To exercise your opt-out right, you can submit a request to us by clicking on the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link at the bottom of any of the Sites’ web pages or completing and submitting the form available
here
.
Upon receipt of your request, we will endeavor to honor it based on the information that we collect and maintain.
Authorized Agents.
Residents of certain U.S. states may also use an authorized agent to submit the requests described above. The agent will need to provide us with signed permission from you to act on your behalf. Please note that we may contact you to verify your identity and/or request from you or the agent documentation demonstrating that they have the authority to act on your behalf.
Appeals.
Depending on your U.S. state of residence, you may have the right to appeal a decision we have made in connection with your privacy rights request. To appeal a decision, please contact us at
privacy@chartboost.com
.
Complaints.
If you do not agree with this Privacy Policy or the way Chartboost processes information about you, you can also lodge a complaint to a competent supervisory authority in your country of residence.
10.          COMMUNICATIONS
We may provide notice to our Customers via e-mail, written or hard copy, or through posting on our Sites, as determined by us in our sole discretion.
11.          CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We reserve the right to make changes to this Privacy Policy at any time, at our sole discretion. Any relevant changes or modifications to this Privacy Policy will be notified to you by the posting of a notice on the Sites and, if you are a Customer, you may also be notified by either e-mail or other means of communication, as set out in Section 10. If you access the Chartboost Services after the new version of the Privacy Policy is published and/or communicated to you, you agree to its new terms; should you disagree with the terms of the new version, you must cease using the Sites and the Chartboost Services. If we make any changes to this Privacy Policy, we will change the “Last Updated” date above.
12.          CONTACT
If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, or have any concerns about privacy, please contact us at:
Address: Chartboost, Inc., One Sansome Street, Floor 21, San Francisco, CA 94104
Email:
privacy@chartboost.com
Attn: Data Protection Officer
© 2025 Chartboost, LLC.
Chartboost.com
Legal
Cookie Settings
Sub-policy 5
https://www.digitalturbine.com/privacy-policy/:
Notice at Collection and Website
Privacy Policy
Last Updated
: October 2023.
We at Digital Turbine, Inc. (“
Digital Turbine
,” “
we
,” “
us,
” or “
our
”) put great efforts into making sure that we secure personal information related to you and use it properly.
The notice at collection (“
Notice at Collection
”) and privacy policy (“
Policy
,” and collectively: the “
Notices
”) provided on this page explain our privacy practices for processing personal information related to you when you use our website at
www.digitalturbine.com
(the “
Website
”).
The term “
personal information
” refers to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular individual consumer or household that identifies an individual or relates to an identifiable individual. For example, personal information is your name, email address, telephone number, and other contact details that you submit to us or that we collect from your mobile device or app.
These Notices apply to visitors to our Website (“
Customers
”).
The summary of this policy will give you a quick and clear view of our practices. Please take the time to read our full policy. If you disagree with this Privacy Policy, please do not access or use our Website.
The Policy Summary below will give you a quick and clear view of our practices. The first six headings in the summary also serve as the Notice at Collection.
Notice at Collection and Summary of the Policy
Categories of personal information you provide us.
We receive and store any information you enter on our Website or give us in any other way. If you register for our newsletter blog or fill out any form on our Website, we will collect your name, company name, and work email address.
Read More
Categories of personal information that we collect
We automatically log ‘traffic/session’ information, including IP addresses and user agents. We collect session durations and additional activity information.
Read More below
Categories of sensitive personal information
The Website is not intended to collect sensitive personal information (within the meaning of US Privacy Laws), we do not knowingly collect such data, and we require that you do not provide us with such data.
Read More below
What do we do with personal information?
We maintain the Website, make it better and continue developing it, and protect us and the Website from misuse and law violations.
Read More below
Who do we disclose, share, or sell personal information with or to?
We use service providers, for example, to send email messages and to store data. We will transfer personal information when we change our corporate structure and share the information with our affiliate entities. We will also obey authorities’ orders and other lawful requirements to disclose information.
Read More below
How long do we retain personal information?
We retain personal information for the length of time required to provide the Website and/or the newsletter or blog to the extent you signed up to either one and for legitimate and lawful purposes, as further explained in the
data retention section
of this policy.
Read More below
Your choices and rights
General:
We will give you various choices about how we use and share personal information related to you, and we will respect your choices. You can stop using the Website, newsletter, or blog at any time or request that your subscription be terminated, following which we will stop collecting personal information related to you. You also have rights under applicable laws, as further detailed in the Policy.
Read More below
US Laws:
In addition to your rights under other sections of the Policy, if you are a United States resident, you have additional rights applicable to processing personal information related to you, as further detailed in the Policy.
Read More below
Exercising your rights
You can terminate your subscription to our newsletter or blog or request that your account be terminated by contacting us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
.
You can unsubscribe to our mailing lists by clicking the “Unsubscribe” link in these emails and confirming the email address for which you would like to unsubscribe.
You can request to exercise any of the rights detailed under this policy by contacting us.
Suppose you are a resident of the United States. In that case, you can also exercise your rights to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information related to you by visiting our
Do not Sell or Share My Personal Information
page.
Aggregated and analytical information.
Aggregated data is not identifiable. We use it for legitimate business purposes and standard analytical tools.
Read More below
Specific provisions for U.S. residents
Suppose you reside in the United States (U.S.). In that case, further terms apply to our processing about your rights as a data subject under U.S. state laws governing the protection of privacy and personal information, for example, the California Privacy Rights Act of 2022 (CPRA).
Read More below
Transfer of Personal information outside your territory
We keep personal information related to you in the United States and will store it at additional sites at our discretion. Our service providers provide us with adequate security and confidentiality commitments.
Read More below
Cookies and other tracking technologies
We use cookies to make it easier to log in and facilitate any website activity.
Read More below
Information Security
We implement systems, applications, and procedures to secure personal information related to you to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of information.
Read More below
Dispute Resolution
Contact us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
or write us for every request and complaint. We will make good-faith efforts to resolve any existing or potential dispute with you.
Read More below
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We will update our policy from time to time after giving proper notice.
Read More below
Incorporation of the Terms of Use
This policy is an integral part of the Digital Turbine’s
Terms of Use
or, if applicable, of any other Digital Turbine service subscription agreement between you (or the entity you are acting on its behalf) and us.
Read More below
Contact Us
Don’t hesitate to contact us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
for further information.
Read More below
The Digital Turbine Website Privacy Policy
Categories of Personal Information That You Provide Us
We receive and store any information you enter on our Website or give us in any other way. For example, when you contact us via the Website, we receive any information you provide.
When you contact us to apply for a job with us, you provide us with personal information related to you, which we process for recruitment and general HR purposes.
Categories of Personal Information That We Collect
Like many websites, we use “cookies” (for further information about cookies, please see our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
), and we obtain information when your browser accesses our Website.
We also receive information about your online activity from third-party analytics services when you use the Website. For more information, please see this policy’s “Aggregated and Analytical Information” section.
Examples of such information we collect and analyze include the Internet Protocol (IP) address, login, e-mail address, device and connection information such as browser type, version, time zone setting, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system, and platform.
What Do We Do with Personal Information?
We use personal information related to you for the following purposes:
To provide you with the Website, newsletter, or blog you may have registered to or to contact you if you filled out a form requesting us to do so;
to provide you with notifications related to your use of the Website, such as electronic newsletters, blogs, or promotional emails;
to solicit your feedback and provide support;
to maintain the Website and to continue developing and making it better;
We obey the law and expect you to do the same. If necessary, we will use personal information related to you to enforce our terms, policies, and legal agreements, to comply with court orders and warrants, and assist law enforcement agencies, to collect debts, prevent fraud, misappropriation, infringements, identity thefts and any other misuse of our Website, and to take any action in any legal dispute and proceeding.
We commit to process personal information related to you solely for the purposes described in this policy.
Who do we Disclose, Share, or Sell Personal Information related to you with?
We do not sell, rent, or lease personal information related to you.
Personal information related to you is shared with certain employees, external consultants, and our affiliates, who are all governed by this Policy.
We also share personal information related to you with our vendors worldwide and third-party service providers that process your personal information on our behalf. Such vendors and service providers are contractually bound to keep personal information related to you confidential and appropriately secure.
A merger, acquisition, or any other structural change will require us to transfer personal information related to you to another entity as part of the structural change, provided that the receiving entity will comply with this policy.
We will share personal information related to you only subject to the terms of this policy or subject to your prior consent.
We will need to disclose personal information related to you in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
How__Long
How Long Do We Retain Personal Information?
We retain different types of personal information related to you for different periods, depending on the purposes for processing the information, our legitimate business purposes, and pursuant to legal requirements under applicable law.
We will maintain your contact details to help us stay in contact with you. You can contact our privacy team at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
and request to delete your contact details. Note that we will keep your details without using them if necessary and for the necessary period of time for legal requirements and proceedings.
We will retain personal information related to you after you have left our Website if retention is reasonably necessary to resolve disputes between our users, to prevent fraud and abuse, or to enforce this Privacy Policy and our
Terms of Use
. We will keep aggregated non-identifiable information without limitation, and to the extent reasonable, we will delete or de-identify potentially identifiable information when we no longer need to process the information.
In any case, we will keep information about you for as long as you use our Website unless applicable law requires us to delete it or if we decide to remove it at our discretion, according to the terms of this policy and our
Terms of Use
.
Your Choices and Rights
General
‍
The section below applies to all Users, regardless of which laws apply to processing personal information related to them.
We will give you choices about how we use and share personal information related to you, and we will respect your choices.
We will send newsletters or promotional communications to our users. To unsubscribe to these communications, you must click an “Unsubscribe” link in these emails and confirm the email address for which you would like to unsubscribe.
We collect and receive personal information related to you that we need for the purposes described in this policy. You can stop using our Website at any time; thereafter, we will stop collecting personal information related to you. However, as detailed above, we will store and continue to use or make available certain personal information related to you.
You may request that your account be terminated and that personal information related to you be deleted by contacting us. Any termination of your account will involve deleting your account information from our live databases and storing all the information and data for such an account.
You may request a copy of the personal information related to you that we store about you by contacting us. You may also request that we transfer personal information related to you or provide you with copies of such personal information to enable its transfer to a third party.
When we delete personal information related to you that we have collected from or about you, it will be deleted from our active databases. Still, we will keep a reasonable number of copies in our archives. Although we will deactivate your account, we will continue to retain the personal information related to you for legitimate business purposes as set forth above.
Web browsers offer a “Do Not Track” (“
DNT
”) signal. A DNT signal is an HTTP header field indicating your preference for tracking your activities on our Website or through cross-site user tracking. Our Website does not respond to DNT signals.
Additional Rights Applicable to United States Residents
In addition to your rights under the general section above, if you are a resident of the United States (“
US
”), you are also entitled to the following specific rights under federal and state laws and regulations governing the protection of personal information and Privacy (“
US Privacy Laws
”), regarding personal information related to you:
Access and Data Portability
. You have the right to request that we disclose certain information about our collection and use of personal information related to you over the past 12 months. Upon verification of your request, we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that personal information;
The categories of personal information that we disclosed for a business purpose and the categories of third parties with whom we disclosed that particular category of personal information;
The specific pieces of personal information that we collected about you;
Suppose we disclose personal information related to you for a business purpose. In that case, we will provide you with a list identifying the personal information categories each recipient obtained.
Correction
. You have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
Deletion
. You have the right to request that we delete any personal information related to you. Upon confirmation of your request, we will delete personal information related to you from our records unless an exception applies. Note that when we delete personal information related to you that we have collected from or about you, it will be deleted from our active databases. Still, we will keep a reasonable number of copies in our archives. We will continue to retain your personal information for legitimate business purposes, as set forth under the section titled
“Specific Provisions for US Residents”
in this policy.
Opt-out of Selling or Sharing
. You have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information related to you or otherwise the use of such data for targeted advertising or profiling for the purpose of making decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you. As detailed above, we do not sell or share personal information. Still, we do engage third parties that collect personal information on our Website to provide us with services that, although they do not pay us for collecting information, the right granted to them may be considered as disclosure for the purpose of sale or sharing. You can opt out of such processing at any time by contacting us or visiting our
Do not Sell or Share My Personal Information
.
Non-discrimination
. You also have a right not to be discriminated against for exercising your rights under US Privacy Laws.
Exercising Your Rights
If you wish to exercise any of your rights in relation to personal information related to you, please send us an email to
privacy@digitalturbine.com
.
You can stop using the Website at any time.
You may also control what personal information we collect from your device by changing the permissions settings on your browser or mobile device.
You may request to exercise the rights detailed under this section by submitting your request to us by emailing
privacy@digitalturbine.com.
Note that only you or a person authorized to act on your behalf may make a request related to personal information related to you. A request for access can be made by you only twice within a 12-month period.
Also note that your request must provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative and describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to understand, evaluate, and respond to it properly.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with the requested personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information related to you. We will only use the personal information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will do our best to respond to your request within 30 days of receipt. If we require more time (up to 30 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. We will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding receipt of your request. Our response will also explain why we cannot comply with a request, if applicable.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If the request warrants a fee, we will inform you of the reasons for such a decision and provide a cost estimate before completing your request.
We will not require that you create an account to exercise your rights under this Policy, and we will not increase the cost or decrease the availability of our Website based solely on the fact that you have chosen to exercise one of your rights.
After receiving our reply, you can appeal against our decision by contacting us. We will review your appeal and provide you with our answer and our explanation of the reasons for our decision(s) within 60 days of receiving it. We will also provide you with a link (to the extent available) where you can submit a complaint with the relevant Attorney General or Supervisory Authority, as applicable.
Aggregated and Analytical Information
We use standard analytics tools. The privacy practices of these tools are subject to their own privacy policies, and they use their own cookies to provide their service (for further information about cookies, please see our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
).
We use the standard analytics tools of Google Analytics, and we will use additional or other analytics tools from time to time to learn how you and other users use our Website to support its related activities and operations.
The privacy practices of these tools are subject to their own privacy policies. See Google Analytics Privacy Policy at
Privacy Policy – Privacy & Terms – Google
.
We use anonymous, statistical, or aggregated information and will share it with our partners for legitimate business purposes. It has no effect on your privacy because there is no reasonable way to extract data from the aggregated information that we or others can associate specifically with you.
Specific Provisions for United States Residents
This section applies solely to all visitors, users, and others who reside in the US.
Any terms defined under US Privacy Laws have the same meaning when used in this section.
Additionally, as used under this section and the rest of this Policy, personal information is defined under applicable US Privacy Laws.
This chapter supersedes any contradicting provisions under the other sections of this policy.
We have collected the personal information related to you described above under the sections titled “
Categories of Personal Information You Provide Us
” and “
Categories of Personal Information that We Collect
” of this Policy. Such Information consists of the following categories:
Identifiers and personal information categories are listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, search history, and information regarding your interaction with the Website.
Commercial information, including products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Geolocation data, namely your physical location or movements.
Inferences are drawn from any of the above-mentioned information.
We obtain the categories of personal information related to you listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly and indirectly from you and your activity on the Website.
Third parties such as reliable service providers.
We use the personal information related to you that we collect or receive for the purposes mentioned under the section “
What Do We Do With Personal Information
?” of this Policy.
We disclose personal information related to you to third parties for business purposes as described above under the section titled “
Who Do We Disclose, Share, or Sell Personal Information With?
”.
We do not sell personal information related to you.
Categories of Sensitive Personal Information
The Website is not intended to collect sensitive personal information (within the meaning of US Privacy Laws). We do not knowingly collect or allow others to collect sensitive personal information about you, and we require you not to provide us with any such data.
Selling and Sharing Personal Information
We do not sell or share personal information. However, we engage third parties to provide services such as analytics, marketing automation, and user experience and allow them to collect personal information on our Website.
We do not knowingly sell or share consumers’ personal information of children under 16 years of age.
The categories of personal information collected by these third parties in the preceding 12 months include identifiers, online activities, and inferences drawn from such activities.
These third parties do not pay us for collecting such information. Still, the right granted to them to collect personal information may be considered as disclosure for the purpose of sale or sharing for cross-context behavioral advertising. At any time, you can opt out of collecting personal information from our service providers by contacting us or visiting our
Do not Sell or Share My Personal Information
page.
Storing of Personal Information in the United States
In the United States, we store and process information from our Website, including personal information, either directly or using third parties, such as data hosting service providers. Digital Turbine has data centers in the United States.
Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to ensure our Website is continuously improved and meets your needs. Please view our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
for more information on our use of cookies.
Information Security
Digital Turbine is committed to ensuring the security of personal information. We and our hosting services implement systems, applications, and procedures to secure personal information related to you to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of information. These measures provide sound industry-standard security.
However, please understand that no security system is impenetrable. Although we make efforts to protect your privacy, we cannot guarantee that the Website will be immune from any wrongdoings, malfunctions, unlawful interceptions or access, or other kinds of abuse and misuse.
Dispute Resolution
We do periodical assessments of our data processing and privacy practices to ensure that we comply with this policy, update the policy when we believe that we need to, and verify that we display the policy properly and in an accessible manner. If you have any concerns about how we process personal information related to you, you are welcome to contact our privacy team at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
or write to us.
We will look into your query and make good-faith efforts to resolve any existing or potential dispute with you.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
From time to time, we will update this policy. If the updates have minor, if any, consequences, they will take effect 14 days after we post a notice on the Website. Substantial changes will be effective 30 days after we initially posted the notice.
Until the new policy takes effect, if it materially reduces the protection of your privacy right under the then-existing policy, you can choose not to accept it and stop using our Website. Continuing to use the Website after the new policy takes effect means that you agree to the new policy. Note that if we need to adapt the policy to legal requirements, the new policy will become effective immediately or as required by law.
Incorporation to the Terms of Use
This policy is an integral part of the Digital Turbine
Terms of Use
or, if applicable, of any other service agreement between you (or the entity you are acting on its behalf) and us or any of our corporate affiliates.
Contact Us
Don’t hesitate to get in touch with us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
Sub-policy 6
https://developers.is.com/ironsource-mobile/air/ironsource-mobile-privacy-policy/:
Home
Unity LevelPlay Platform
Unity LevelPlay SDK
ironSource Ads monetization
ironSource Ads user acquisition
My account
News and updates
Contact us
Contact us
Home
/
My account
/
ironSource Mobile Ltd. Privacy Policy
User management
User management
User profiles
Log in using single sign-on (SSO)
Funds and payments
How do I receive payments?
Net 60 payments
Advance payments
How to set up and update your payment method
How to update your payment method
How to set up two-step verification for payments
Company information
Payments dashboard
Legal resources
Platform Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Children and child-directed apps
Data Protection Addendum
ironSource US state privacy laws
ironSource SDK implementations under the GDPR
DMCA Takedown Policy
Apple’s app privacy questionnaire
Google’s Data Safety Questionnaire
Open Source Terms and Conditions
Ad Quality Terms and Conditions
ironSource Mobile Ltd. Privacy Policy
Effective Date: September 4th
, 2024
Table of Contents:
About us
Scope
Information we collect
How we use the information we collect
Maximum information retention period
How we share information
How to control information
Children
International transfers
EU Representative
State Privacy Rights
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Contact us
About Us
ironSource Mobile Ltd. (“ironSource Mobile”) operates 4 main services:
Ad Network
– A platform that allows app developers to serve ads within their apps, and advertisers to promote their products, and services within apps.
Mediation Platform
– A platform that helps app developers to manage all the ad providers with which they have a direct relationship (e.g. ironSource Mobile ad network, “third party” ad networks, additional online advertising companies, etc.) that serve ads on their apps.
Analytics Platform –
A platform that allows app developers to receive insights on their apps.
Ad Quality Platform
–
A platform that allows app developers to monitor advertising content displayed within their apps.
In addition, as of November 2022, Unity Technologies has been added as a corporate affiliate of ironSource Mobile Ltd. To view Unity’s privacy policy, please click
here
We collect information in either of 2 ways:
Directly
– through our SDKs integrated by app developers in their apps. SDK, or a Software Development Kit, is a software component that allows us to serve ads in a mobile app, and to collect information directly from such apps.
Indirectly
– through other third party mediation platforms with which we engage in order to serve ads in apps, or by receiving information from our advertisers, or affiliates.
Scope:
This privacy policy describes ironSource Mobile’s privacy practices with respect to information it processes through its Ad Network, Mediation Platform, Analytics Platform and Ad Quality Platform. This privacy policy does not govern the use of our website, dashboard for publishers, and dashboard for advertisers.
ironSource Mobile serves ads to users all around the world. Accordingly, throughout the document, we try to harmonize our approach and the language of the privacy policy as much as possible. However, sometimes we refer to specific laws that require further disclosures. For example,  whenever you see throughout the policy the annotation “The GDPR angle”, it means that the purpose of such section is to satisfy the transparency requirements of the General Data Protection Regulation (the “GDPR”), and therefore it applies only to personal data (as defined by the GDPR) associated with devices who we deem to be located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom, or Switzerland. If you are a resident of California, Virginia, Colorado, Connetecuit and Utah, please see “State Privacy Rights” section of this privacy policy for information related to privacy laws in these states.
Information We Collect:
Information collected through our Ad Network (“Ad Network Information”)
–
Identifiers: Advertising ID, IP address, and a self-created ID unique to a specific app, and IDs unique only to apps of the same developer. The term Advertising ID refers to the Google Advertising ID on Android devices, and ID For Advertising (“IDFA”), or . The Advertising ID is a resettable persistent identifier generated by Android or iOS that allows online advertising companies to recognize a device across apps, for advertising purposes. You can find additional information about how to limit our use of the Advertising ID under “How to Control Your Information”.
General technical information about a device: Technical information such as the device’s time zone, the amount of free memory on the device, the name and version of the app to which the ad is served, battery status, operating system name and version,  the language of the operating system, the name of the mobile carrier, internet connection type (e.g. WiFi), etc.
Campaign information: An indication if an ad was viewed, or clicked, or if there was an install of an advertised app. Information about actions performed within an advertiser’s app following such an install, such as in-app purchases, and level in the game (if the advertiser chooses to provide such information).
Information collected through our Mediation Platform (“Mediation Information”)
–
Identifiers: Advertising ID, IP address, a self-created ID unique to a specific app, and IDs unique only to apps of the same developer.
General technical information as described above.
Data provided by the app developers (if they choose to provide it) – The app developer can choose to share with us the following information: age, gender, in-app purchases, advance in the game, and such other information provided by the app developer.
Information collected by our Analytics Platform (“Analytics Information”)
Identifiers: a self-created ID unique to a specific app.
App events: Events set by the app developer that occurred within the app.
General technical data about the device.
Information collected by our Ad Quality Platform (“Ad Quality Information”)
Identifiers: a self-created ID unique to a specific app.
Advertising content: The ads displayed within the app, and interactions with such ads.
General technical data about the device.
How We Use the Information We Collect:
As stated above, we provide 4 main services. For each such service, we use the information we collect in different ways. Below is a general description of how we use information across our services:
Operating our Ad Network
– We use Ad Network Information to serve ads on app developers’ apps. More specifically, we use such information for the following purposes:
Ad delivery: we use Ad Network Information to technically enable the delivering of ads to your device.
Reporting, billing and attribution: We use Ad Network Information to generate reports for our publishers and bill advertisers and publishers, including for ensuring that if you interacted with our ads, we will receive payment for our service.
Internal Operations: We use Ad Network Information for internal operations, such as debugging, support, security, and improving our services.
Fraud detection and prevention: We use Ad Network Information for detecting and preventing fraud, and for ensuring viewability of our ads.
Optimization and frequency capping: We use Ad Network Information for optimizing advertising campaigns, including for limiting the number of times you view a specific campaign across our network, or the number of ads you view in a specific app.
Whitelisting/blacklisting: We allow advertisers to upload lists of device IDs to include/exclude in, or from their advertising campaigns.
Operating our ad marketplace. We use Ad Network Information to allow the third party advertising companies listed
here
to bid on ad inventory.
Operating our Mediation Platform
– We use Mediation Information to operate our mediation platform. More specifically, we use such information for the following purposes:
Reporting: We generate reports for the app developers using our mediation platform in order to allow them to better understand their audience in terms of interaction with ads.
Segmentation: We allow app developers to create segments based on parameters they configure in our mediation platform. Such segmentation allows them to use different ad networks and different ad units for different segments of users. However, this feature does not allow them to serve you with personalized advertising, as app developers cannot control the content of the ads served by different networks.
Sending ad requests on behalf of the app developer: In addition to the other information used to operate the mediation platform, we use the Ad Network Information in order to send ad requests on behalf of the app developer to ad networks with which the app developer has direct contractual relationship, but due to technical reasons, we are in the best position to populate the ad request with the Ad Network Information.
Operating our Analytics Platform
– We use Analytics Information to operate our Analytics Platform. More specifically, we use such information for the following purposes:
Reporting: We generate reports for the app developers using our Analytics Platform in order to allow them to better understand the use of their apps.
Internal Operations: We use Analytics Information for internal operations, such as debugging, support, security, and improving our services.
Operating our Ad Quality Platform
– We use Ad Quality Information to operate our Ad Quality Platform. More specifically, we use such information for the following purposes:
Reporting: We generate reports for the app developers using our Ad Quality Platform in order to allow them to see which ads were served within their apps, and how such ads affected the use of their apps.
Internal Operations: We use Ad Quality for internal operations, such as debugging, support, security, and improving our services.
Compliance with legal obligations –
We may use Ad Network Information, Mediation Information, Analytics Information, and Ad Quality Information to comply with applicable legal obligations.
The GDPR Angle:
Legal basis for the processing of personal data –
Processing
Details
Controller/Processor
Legal Basis
Mediation platform
Processing of Mediation Information for the purpose of operating our mediation platform on behalf of app developers
Processor
The legal basis applicable to the processing is chosen by the app developer, as the controller
Ad network
Processing Ad Network Information for the purpose of operating our ad network, including for purposes listed above, such as optimization and frequency capping, attribution, fraud detection and prevention, and internal operations
Controller
Our legitimate interests, and the legitimate interests of app developers
Ad network – Ad marketplace (allowing third parties to bid on ad inventory)
Processing of Ad Network Information for the purpose of operating our ad marketplace, including the sharing of personal data with third party advertising partners listed
here
, for the purpose of receiving bids from such third party advertising partners
Controller
Consent
Ad Network – Blacklisting/whitelisting ad campaigns
Processing of personal data for the purpose of excluding/including devices from, or in an ad campaign
Processor
The legal basis applicable to the processing is chosen by the app developer, as the controller
Ad Quality Platform
Processing of Ad Quality Information for the purpose of operating our Ad Quality Platform on behalf of app developers
Processor
The legal basis applicable to the processing is chosen by the app developer, as the controller
Analytics Platform
Processing of Analytics Information for the purpose of operating our Analytics Platform on behalf of app developers
Processor
The legal basis applicable to the processing is chosen by the app developer, as the controller
Maximum Information Retention Period:
We will retain personal data included in Ad Network Information, Mediation Information, Analytics Information, and Ad Quality Information for the longer of: (i) a period of up to 6 months from the date such information is first stored in our systems; or (ii) a period of 3 months from the last appearance of the applicable identifier in our systems.
How We Share Information:
We share information with:
Other advertising partners
– We share Ad Network Information for the purpose of allowing the advertising companies listed
here
to bid on ad inventory.
Our corporate affiliates
– for the purposes described in this privacy policy.
App developers
– for the purposes of attribution and whitelisting/blacklisting, and reporting, as stated above.
Service providers
–for the purpose of receiving services such as fraud detection and prevention, viewability measurement, reporting, and storage.
Viewability measurement
– Please note that certain versions of our SDK may include software libraries that allow advertisers to verify if their ads were actually viewed.
We may also disclose information if we have a good faith belief that disclosure of such information is reasonably necessary to: (i) comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request; (ii) enforce our agreements and policies, including investigations of potential violations thereof; (iii) investigate, detect, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities or other wrongdoing, suspected fraud or security issues; (iv) to establish or exercise our rights to defend against legal claims; (v) prevent harm to the rights, property or safety of us, our users, yourself or any third party; (vi) for the purpose of collaborating with law enforcement agencies or in case we find it necessary in order to enforce intellectual property or other legal rights; or (vii) when we are undergoing any change in control, including by means of merger, acquisition or purchase of all or substantially all of our assets.
How to Control Information:
Collection of device data
– Updated versions of iOS, and Android, enable you to control how apps can collect the Advertising ID. please follow the below instructions:
iOS devices (iOS 14+): go to Settings > Privacy > Tracking > Allow Apps to Request to Track. Please note that if you use more than one device, you need to opt-out separately in each device.
Android devices: Please follow the instructions set forth at:
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/1660762
(under Mobile Controls). Please note that if you use more than one device, you need to opt-out separately in each device.
The GDPR Angle:
Withdraw consent
–
You have the right to withdraw the consent you provided to us for sharing Ad Network Information with third party advertising companies. You can withdraw your consent from within the app you provided to us the consent (this will affect only our processing within this specific app), or by following the instructions above on how to control collection of device data (this will affect our processing of data of all apps on your device).
Data subject rights
– Please note that you have the right to request from us access to and rectification or erasure of your personal data we process as controllers, or to restrict or to object to processing of your personal data in accordance with the provisions of the GDPR. To submit a request for exercising your rights, please use one of the following ways:
You can submit a request to access or to delete the personal data collected about your device through the form available in the privacy policy accessible via the ironSource ad unit.
For other data subject requests, please send an email with your request to the following address: DPO@unity3d.com
Please note that we will process your request subject to verification, and authentication of your identity.
If you exercise your rights to delete, or access your personal data, we will also automatically share your request with Unity, our corporate affiliate, which will process your request separately. For exercising other rights with respect to Unity, please refer to its
privacy policy.
Complaint to supervisory authority
– You also have the right to file a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority (e.g. of your country or domicile) where ironSource has not addressed your concerns.
Children
If you believe your child has provided us with personal information, you may contact us at
DPO@unity3d.com
and we will make reasonable efforts to delete the information from our records.
The GDPR Angle:
We do not collect or otherwise process personal data from individuals in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland whom we know to be under the applicable age stated in the different implementations of the GDPR, except to comply with law or to support our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of our app developers partners as described above.
International Transfers
We store information that we collect from a device on our Amazon Web Services servers in the United States. Accordingly, please note that if you do not live in the United States, we will transfer your information to and store it in, the United States.
The GDPR Angle:
ironSource Mobile Ltd. is based in Israel, which is considered by the European Commission to be offering an adequate level of protection for the Personal Information of EU Member State residents.
We will transfer personal data to third parties located outside of the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, or Switzerland based on standard contractual clauses.
State Privacy Rights:
California, Virginia, Connecticut, Colarado and Utah residents have certain rights under state privacy laws with respect to personal data we collect.  If you are a resident of such states, this section of the privacy policy contains disclosures required by law and explains rights that may be available to you.
This section applies only to personal data that is subject to the state laws noted above.
In many cases, we act as a service provider or processor to collect personal data from, or on behalf of, customers who use our services. These customers have their own privacy policies that describe how they use information. To the extent that we are processing personal data subject to state privacy laws on behalf of a customer in our role as a service provider or processor, you should reach out to that customer directly to exercise your rights under state privacy laws.
The remainder of this section provides disclosures for users for cases where we are not acting as a service provider or processor to a customer, typically for our Ad Network.
Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
: In the past 12 months, we have collected, sold (including sharing for targeted advertising), and disclosed for business purposes the following categories of personal data. We do not knowingly sell, nor do we share or process for targeted advertising purposes, personal data about consumers under the age of 16.
Categories of Personal InformationData
Disclosed for business purposes to the following categories of third parties:
Sold to the following categories of third parties (including sharing for targeted advertising purposes):
Personal and online identifiers (such as first and last name, email address, or unique online identifiers)
See the “How We Share Information” Section
All categories listed below.
Commercial or transactions information (like records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered)
See “How We Share Information” Section
Not sold.
Internet or other electronic network activity information (such as browsing history, search history, interactions with a website, email, application, or advertisement)
See the “How We Share Information” Section
All categories listed below.
Geolocation information
See the “How We Share Information” Section
All categories listed below.
Other information about you that is linked to the personal information above
See the “How We Share Information” Section
All categories listed below.
Categories of Sources
– As described in the “About Us” section above, we collect personal data from the following categories of sources:
Directly through our SDKs integrated by app developers in their apps.
Other third-party mediation platforms.
Advertising partners.
Our Purposes for Processing Personal Data
– We use and disclose the personal data we collect for our commercial and business purposes, as further described above in the “How We Use the Information We Collect” and the “How We Share Information” Sections.
Recipients of Personal Data
– Although we do not sell personal data for monetary consideration, we do sell personal data, including sharing for targeted advertising purposes, subject to users’ choices communicated to us by app developers, to the categories of third parties listed below:
Advertising/marketing companies;
App developers; and
Your Rights Regarding Personal Data
– Residents of certain states have rights with respect to the personal data collected by businesses like ironSource.  You may be able to exercise the following rights regarding your personal data, subject to certain exceptions and limitations:
The
right to confirm
whether we are processing personal data about you.
The
right to correct inaccuracies
in the personal data we have collected about you.
The
right to know
the categories and specific pieces of personal data we collect, use, disclose, and sell about you, the categories of sources from which we collected your personal data, our purposes for collecting or selling your personal data, the categories of your personal data that we have either sold (including shared for targeted advertising purposes) or disclosed for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties with which we have disclosed personal data.
The right to request that we
delete the personal data
we have collected from you or maintain about you.
The right to
opt out of our sale of your personal data and our processing (including sharing) for targeted advertising purposes
. Please note that if you opt out of certain practices, we may be unable to provide you with some services.
The right
not to receive discriminatory treatment
for the exercise of the above privacy rights.
While some states provide residents with rights related to “sensitive” personal data,  ironSource does not collect this type of personal data.
Exercise your rights
– To exercise any of the above rights, please use one of the following ways:
You can submit a request to access, or to delete the personal data collected about your device through the form available in the privacy policy accessible via the ironSource ad unit.
Alternatively, you may send an email with your request to the following address: DPO@unity3d.com
Depending on your state, if you have submitted a request that you believe we have not fulfilled, you may contact us to appeal our decision by replying to our response to your request, or by contacting us at DPO@unity3d.com
If you exercise your rights to delete, or access your personal data, we will also automatically share your request with Unity, our corporate affiliate, which will process your request separately. For exercising other rights with respect to Unity, please refer to its
privacy policy.
Verification Process and Required Information
– Note that we may need to request additional information from you to verify your identity or process your request, although you will not be required to create an account with us to submit a request or have it fulfilled. We will require you to provide, at a minimum, your email address and state of residence. We will also collect information that identifies your device when you submit a request, in order to help verify your identity.
Authorized Agent
– You may designate an authorized agent to make a CCPA request on your behalf by verifying your identity and providing the agent with written permission to make the request on your behalf.
Information about California resident requests in 2022 –
As required by California law, ironSource has provided the following information about requests it received from California residents in 2022.
Request type
Requests received
Requests complied with
Requests denied
Mean number of days for response
Request to know
1128
684
444
9 days
Request to delete
2431
2364
67
1.94 days
Changes to This Privacy Policy:
We may revise this privacy policy from time to time. The most current version of the policy will govern our processing of information and is posted at https://developers.is.com/ironsource-mobile/air/ironsource-mobile-privacy-policy/. If we make a change to this policy we will post the revised privacy policy to this page.
Contact Us:
ironSource Mobile Ltd., located at 121 Menachem Begin Rd., Tel Aviv, Israel, is the organization responsible for collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Information under this Privacy Policy.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at DPO@unity3d.com
Because email communications are not always secure, please do not include credit card or other sensitive information in your emails to us.
You can also contact us as follows:
DPO@unity3d.com
ironSource Mobile Ltd., 121 Menachem Begin Rd., Tel Aviv, Israel
(Israel contact)
Unity Technologies, 30 3rd Street, San Francisco, CA 94103 (United States contact)
Unity Technologies ApS, Niels Hemmingsens Gade 24, 1153 Copenhagen, Denmark (European Union contact)
Unity Technologies, GINZA SIX 8F, 6-10-1 Ginza, Chuo-ku, Tokyo Japan 104-0061 (Japan Contact)
About Us
Scope:
Information We Collect:
How We Use the Information We Collect:
How We Share Information:
How to Control Information:
Children
International Transfers
State Privacy Rights:
Changes to This Privacy Policy:
Contact Us:
Notifications
By clicking “Accept Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookie Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Your Opt Out Preference Signal is Honored
Your Privacy
Functional Cookies
Performance Cookies
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Functional Cookies
Inactive
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
Inactive
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
Inactive
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising. Some 3rd party video providers do not allow video views without targeting cookies. If you are experiencing difficulty viewing a video, you will need to set your cookie preferences for targeting to yes if you wish to view videos from these providers. Unity does not control this.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 7
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/center:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Center
Make the privacy choices that are right for you. Learn how to manage and control your privacy on Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, and other Meta Products.
We build privacy into our products
Privacy Checkup
Tools like Privacy Checkup make it easy for you to take control of your privacy.
Private messaging
Our messaging products offer end-to-end encryption so your conversations stay safe and secure.
Teen privacy
Our default settings on Facebook and Instagram help keep teens’ accounts private.
Ads education
We show different factors that contribute to why you saw an ad and give you options to see more ads you like.
Privacy topics
Get answers to your privacy questions and manage your privacy in a way that’s right for you.
Generative AI
AI at Meta
Safety
Manage what you share to feel safer using our products
Location
Learn how to manage your location
Teens
Access support and resources for teens
View all topics
Learn about Meta’s commitment to privacy
Find more resources you can use to learn about how Meta builds privacy into its products.
More privacy resources
Learn more in the Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Privacy Policy
Looking for more privacy settings?
Quickly access your settings across Facebook and Messenger or Instagram
Facebook
Instagram
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 8
https://www.mintegral.com/en/privacy/#privacy-policy-of-the-mintegral-services:
PRIVACY POLICY
Privacy Policy of the Mintegral Services
Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website
PRIVACY POLICY
September 14
th
2024
Mintegral entities (for purpose of applicable data protection laws, Mintegral entities providing Mintegral Service which are subject to applicable disclosure requirements can be viewed
HERE
collectively, “Mintegral”, or “we”, “us”, “our”) provide this privacy policy to explain how we collect, use, and share information. This privacy policy (“Policy”) covers Mintegral’s handling of two types of information:
(1)Information we receive when we provide our service, including (i) device information about end users we collect through our software development kit (“SDK”), application programming interface (“API”), our platforms, services or technologies from traffic supply partners such as mobile app developer, ad exchange platform, supply-side platform, mediation platform; (ii) information about end users’ interaction with ads collect through our SDK, API or other technologies, or collected and transferred to us by our Business Partners (e.g. mobile app developers, advertisers, hereinafter referred to as “Business Partners”) or any third party designated by them; (iii) device information generated during end users’ use of our Business Partners’ mobile apps, websites, platforms or services and information collected and transferred to us by our Business Partners or any third party designated by them; (iv) information provided by Business Partners when they use Mintegral’s platforms, technologies, services. In the Privacy Policy of the Mintegral Services, the end users mentioned in this section are collectively referred to as “User”, “you” or “your”; the SDK, API, any technology, platform or service provided by Mintegral mentioned in this section are referred to as “Mintegral Service”.
Please click on the following link to access detail about
Protection for Minors
under the process of collecting this type of information
.
(2)Information we receive through the following websites from website visitors (hereinafter referred to as “Visitors”, “you” or “your”) in the Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website: (i) our website at:
www.mintegral.com
www.mintegral.net
or any other website on which this Policy is posted, as well as (ii) any website we provide to Business Partners or potential clients in order to provide our services.
Please click on the following link to access detail about
Protection of Minors
under the process of collecting this type of information.
This Policy is subject to any service agreement between Mintegral and you. By using the Mintegral Service or Mintegral Site, you acknowledge that you have read, understood and agreed to this Policy. Please review this Policy before using the Mintegral Service or the Mintegral Site.
We evaluate this Policy and procedures to implement improvements and refinements from time to time.We will review and update this Privacy Policy as necessary at least every 12 months.
Data protection and ensuring our Business Partners’ and your trust is at the core of Mintegral’s business principles. Accordingly, being compliance with applicable data protection laws is our top priority and this Policy is updated to be compliance with the applicable data protection laws, including but not limited to the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”),
the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais) (“LGPD”), the any personal information protection law announced by Chinese governments
(“PIPL”)
, and
the US States Privacy Laws
(
“
US States Privacy Laws
”
)
including
California Customer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act ("VCDPA")
,
the Colorado Privacy Act
(
“CPA”
), t
he Utah Consumer Privacy Act
(
“UCPA”
),
the Connecticut Data Protection Act
(
“CDPA”
),
the
Oregon Consumer Privacy Act (“OCPA”)
, and
the Texas Data Privacy and Security Act (“TDPSA”)
.
For the purpose of this Policy, “Processor” means an “entrusted handler” under the PIPL, a “processor” under the
US States Privacy Laws, excluding CCPA
, and a “service provider” under the CCPA. “Controller” means a “personal information handler” under the PIPL, a “controller” under the
US States Privacy Laws, excluding CCPA
, and a “business” under the CCPA.
Privacy Policy of the Mintegral Services
1. Introduction
This Policy describes Mintegral’s information collection and use while (i) Users view ads served by the Mintegral Services or interact with Mintegral’s Services in any manner; (ii) Users interact with platforms, applications, websites or other services provided by Business Partners; (iii) Business Partners interact with Mintegral’s Service.
Except as explicitly stated in this Policy, Mintegral acts as a Controller under the GDPR when processing Users' personal information in the provision of Mintegral Services.
Our technology enables our partners to show Users more relevant advertising that is based on Users’ interests and behaviors. In order to provide Mintegral Services, we may collect and use certain information about User activity and preferences. We understand how important it is to keep such User’s personal information confidential and discrete, especially in today’s online world. To this end, we have designed this Policy in a format that is easy to navigate and read so that our privacy practices can be clearly understood.
The Mintegral Services may link to third party websites, Apps or other third party content. Please note that we cannot control the treatment of a User’s information by such third parties, and that the privacy practices of third parties likely differ from those described in this Policy.
2. How We Collect Users’ Information
Depending on the nature of a User’s interaction with the Mintegral Services, or any service provided by Mintegral’s Business Partners, we may collect information directly from such User or from our Business Partners (e.g. mobile application developers, ad exchange platforms, supply-side platform and advertisers). For example, (1) we may collect user information through SDK embedded in mobile apps; (2) our Business Partners such as ad exchange platform and supply-side platform may share user information with us when they initiates an ad request to our DSP; (3) our advertisers or their third-party attribution platforms may share user information with us.
Therefore, in the process of providing Mintegral's services, we have no direct contact with users. We will obtain authorized consent from users regarding the collection and use of personal information through Mintegral's business partners (e.g., mobile application developers or advertisers). In our cooperation agreements with Mintegral's business partners, we have required them to commit to and guarantee the legitimacy of the data source, and they will inform users of the specifics of our processing of personal information as required by applicable law and obtain valid consent from users (obtaining separate consent as required by applicable law if necessary), and guarantee that users can revoke such consent at any time.
3. Information We May Collect From Users
When you view ads served by Mintegral Service or interact with services provided by Mintegral’s Business Partners, we and/or our Business Partners may collect your information.
(1) The information we collect through our SDK may include the following types：
①
Location Information:
IP, Country, Time Zone and Locale Setting (include country information and preferred language).
②
Device ID/ Avertising ID:
IMEI, Android ID, OAID, IDFV, GAID
,
Ama
zon
ID
or MAC address
. We will not collect such information if you restrict your device or the app from acquiring device ID or advertising ID according to Article 7 of this Policy.
③
Device Information:
device make, device model, information of operating system, device type, information of screen, information of battery, device volume and font size, whether the it is an emulator, information of network, information of hardware, information of device sensor, Limited Ad Tracking (LAT) status, system boot time, device user name, information of storage capacity;
④
Application Information:
package name of the app of Mintegral’s Business Partners, whether it is downloaded from App Store, version and characteristic of the app used by you when you interact with Mintegral’s Service, SDK version, list of installed apps*;
Notes: For Users of Android device in Mainland China, after our SDK receives an ad offer from Advertisers/DSPs, we may check if you have installed the app promoted by our ad before showing this ad to you, and if you have already installed the app, we will not show this ad to you (“Impression-Filter”), and we will inform the service end not to serve this ad when the ad request is sent by your device in the future. Mintegral only collects information related to the ad which is Impression-Filtered, and Mintegral does not collect any other information related to any installed application.
⑤
Interactive Information:
when you view ads served by us or have other interaction with ads served by us, we may collect information about your interaction with such ads, for example, information that you have viewed or clicked an ad.
⑥
Others:
timestamp, device event information such as crashes, system activity, the date and time of your request and referral URL, user-agent.
(2)
When you install and use the product (e.g. app) after you view and click an ad served by us, we may collect information
f
rom a
dvertis
ers o
r
the
ir
att
rib
ution
mea
s
urem
ent
partn
ers
in
clu
ding
the fol
l
owin
g t
y
pes:
① Location information: IP address, country, city;
② Device/advertising ID: IMEI, OAID, IDFV, IDFA, GAID,
A
mazon
I
D
,
MAC address;
③ Device information: device manufacturer, device model, device operating system information, device language, device type, device network information, device operator;
④ Application information: application version;
⑤ Usage data: timestamp of when the installation event other other event occurred;
⑥ Other information: user agent.
TCF string.
Special note: The TCF string is a machine-readable string defined by IAB Europe that encodes your consent choices regarding the processing of your personal information by us. For more information about the TCF string, you can visit the
IAB Europe website
. Please note that we only collect your TCF string information when you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”).
We may also collect the following information from the mediation platforms that the advertiser works with:
① Location information: IP address, country, city;
② Device/advertising ID: IMEI, OAID, IDFV, IDFA, GAID,
A
mazon
I
D
,
MAC address;
③ Device information: device manufacturer, device model, device operating system information, device language, device type, device network information, device operator;
④ Application information: application package name;
⑤ Usage data: timestamp of the occurrence of the monetization event;
⑥ Other information: user agent.
(3) Where Mintegral acts as Demand Side Platform (“DSP”), the ad exchange platform or supply-side platform may share with us your personal information through API may include the following:
①
Location Information:
IP, Country, Time Zone and Locale Setting (include country information and preferred language).
②
Device ID/ Advertising ID:
IMEI, Android ID, OAID, IDFV, Mobile Ad Identifier such as Apple IDFA or Google Advertising ID,
A
mazon
I
D
,
MAC address.
③
Device Information:
device make, device model, information of operating system, device type, information of screen, information of network, Limited Ad Tracking (LAT) status;
④
Application Information:
version and characteristic of the app used by you when you interact with the Mintegral Services, user-agent;
⑤
Interactive Information:
we may also collect information about your interaction with ads served by us, such as information that you have viewed or clicked an ad;
⑥
Others:
other information transferred by the ad exchange platform or supply-side platform.
We cooperates with reputational ad exchange platforms and supply-side platform including Google Doubleclick Ad Exchange. The ad exchange platforms or the supply-side platform may receive an ad request containing your personal information and, to the extent permitted by applicable law or with User’s valid consent, transfer to Mintegral to build your profile, personalize your ad experience, and serve future ads you may see on the internet.
(4) As we provide Mintegral Service for our Business Partners, we may collect name, job title, email address, contact address and the account name and password used to access Mintegral websites, IP address of the individuals using Mintegral services on behalf of such Business Partners.
ABOUT SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION
Sensitive Personal Information refers to personal information that, once leaked or illegally used, will easily lead to infringement of the human dignity or harm to the personal or property safety of a natural person. The scope of sensitive personal information may vary pursuant to different applicable data protection law.
We will not collect your sensitive personal information without your consent. Our Business Partner will transmit or authorize us to process your sensitive personal information after notifying you the necessity of processing your sensitive personal information and the impact of your rights and interests with your consent.
4. How We Use Users’ Personal Information
We use your personal information for the following purpose:
Type
o
f Personal Information
Usage
Device Information
Including all types of personal information described in paragraphs (1) to (3) of Article 3 of this Policy
Basic business functions:
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically send. We use your personal information to display ads on your device through automatic decision making process. We use de-identification techniques and algorithms based on machine learning, model prediction, and more. Ads may be shown to you based on information we legally collected such as the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your approximate location, your device type and your device status. We may create tag, features and build profile about you and your interest. According to the calculation results of the recommendation algorithm based on the profile, we may show you personalized ads or behavioral ads which are relevant to you and customized to your inferred interests, preferences, approximate locations and other features. Our recommendation algorithm does not identify the true identity of a particular natural person.
We also perform secondary processing of aggregated data in accordance with data security technologies such as de-identification and anonymization, which are commonly implemented in the industry, to form a database of features and tags that cannot identify the true identity of a specific natural person, conduct group analysis, and optimize algorithm training models to better understand and analyze your usage trends and preferences in order to improve the quality of our Mintegral Services and develop our new products.
Extended Business Functions: Your device information will be used to collect information about the cause of application crashes for later crash problem solving.
Contact Information
Including all types of personal information described in paragraphs（4）of Article 3 of this Policy
We may collect and use personal information of Users who are representing our Business Partners to use Mintegral Service (e.g. employees of publishers or advertisers) for purpose of business contact and direct marking (e.g. sending marketing emails).
Sensitive Personal Information
/
We will not collect your sensitive personal information without your consent. Our Business Partners will transmit or authorize us to process your sensitive personal information after notifying you the necessity of processing your sensitive personal information and the impact of your rights and interests with your consent.
5. The Legal Basis for Our Processing of Users' Personal Information
(1) Where required by applicable laws, We have contractually agreed that our Business Partners (e.g. developer of mobile app integrated with Mintegral’s SDK, advertisers) will obtain consent of a user or their employees for and on our behalf for our processing of his/her personal information described in this Privacy Policy. A data subject can withdraw their consent at any time.
(2) According to the laws and regulations, the following are exceptions to obtaining the consent of the user:
① Necessary for the conclusion and performance of a contract with the data subject;
② Necessary to fulfill our legal obligations;
③ Necessary to respond to a public health emergency, or to protect the life, health, and property of the data subject in an emergency;
④For the implementation of news reporting, public opinion monitoring and other acts in the public interest, within a reasonable range of the handling of end-user personal information;
⑤In accordance with the provisions of applicable laws within a reasonable range to process the personal information disclosed by the data subject himself/herself or other personal information which has been lawfully disclosed.
(3) If you are located in the European Economic Area, we may use your personal information based on the "legitimate interests" set forth in the GDPR, in necessary cases. Our legitimate interests include: monitoring and preventing fraudulent activity, remove technical obstacles to system operation and ensuring systems and processes work properly and securely.
6. How We Share, Entrust the Processing, Transfer, Disclose And Transmit Users’ Personal Information
(1)
Sharing
We may share personal information collected by us with third parties for the following purposes and scenarios：
<
vertising agencies, ad attribution service providers, ad demand-side platforms
No.
Type of Third Parties
Information of Third Parties
Type of Information
Processing Purpose and Processing Method
1
Advertisers, advertising agencies, ad attribution service providers, ad demand-side platforms
See the list of Third Parties for details
①
Location Information:
IP, Country, Time Zone and Locale Setting (include country information and preferred language).
②
Device ID/ Avertising ID:
IMEI, IMSI, Android ID, OAID, IDFV, IDFA，GAID，Amazon ID  or MAC address. We will not collect such information if you restrict your device or the app from acquiring device ID or advertising ID according to Article 7 of this Policy.
③
Device Information:
device make, device model, information of operating system, device type, information of screen, information of battery, device volume and font size, whether the it is an emulator, information of network, information of hardware, information of device sensor, Limited Ad Tracking (LAT) status, system boot time, device user name, information of storage capacity;
④
Application Information:
package name of the app of Mintegral’s Business Partners, whether it is downloaded from App Store, version and characteristic of the app used by you when you interact with Mintegral’s Service, SDK version, list of installed apps*;
⑤
Interactive
Information:
when you view ads served by us or have other interaction with ads served by us, we may collect information about your interaction with such ads, for example, information that you have viewed or clicked an ad.
⑥
Others:
user-agent.
①for conducting advertising attribution and settlement with advertisers/advertising agencies. In relation to such processing activities of personal information, Mintegral acts as a Processor on behalf of the advertisers/advertising agencies to process Users' personal information;
②for monitoring the quality of advertising delivery;
③
for performing precise targeting.
2
Mintegral Affiliates
See the list of
Mintegral Affiliates
for details
including all types of personal information described in items (1) to (3) of Article 3 of this Policy
for internal data analysis among our affiliates to improve service quality and provide their clients with analytical services based on aggregate data;
3
See the list of
Mintegral Affiliates
for details
including all types of personal information described in items (4) of Article 3 of this Policy
for promoting the products or services of our affiliates to users.
Except as expressly stated in this Policy, we will not disclose User’s personal information to any third party without User’s consent.
We have agreed with the partners who have direct access to the user that the partner will inform the user of the above-mentioned third party information and obtain the user's separate consent.
We may also share aggregate or anonymous information with other third parties in accordance with the terms of this Policy.
(2)
Entrusted Processing
Type of Third Parties
Information of Third Parties
Type of Information
Processing Purpose and Processing Method
cloud service providers
See the cloud service providers
Including all types of personal information described in Article 3 of this Policy
① for responding to advertising requests;
② for ensuring systems and processes work properly and securely;
③ for purpose of data storage.
Except as expressly stated in this Privacy Policy, we do not entrust other third parties with the processing of Users' personal information.
(3)Assignmenet:
We will not transfer the user's personal information to any company, organization or individual, except in the following cases:
① W
e inform the user in advance of the type, purpose, manner and scope of the transfer of personal information and obtain the user's separate consent;
② In the event of a merger, separation, dissolution, bankruptcy, etc. that requires the transfer of personal information, we will inform the user of the name and contact information of the recipient and request the recipient to continue to perform the obligations of the processor of personal information. If the recipient changes the original purpose or method of processing, we will ask the recipient to obtain the user's consent again.
(4)Public Disclosure
We do not publicly disclose the personal information of end users, except in the following cases:
① After informing the user of the type, purpose, manner and scope of the personal information to be publicly disclosed and obtaining the user's separate consent;
② When compelled by laws, regulations, legal proceedings, litigation or government authorities.
(5) International Transfers
When you are located in the European Econocim Area (“EEA”), personal information collected about you will be transferred to recipients in countries located outside the EEA or can be remotely accessed in countries located outside the EEA, including in countries which may not be decided by the European Commission that it provides an adequate level of protection to personal information. We have followed requirements as set out in applicable law to provide adequate protection to your personal data. To the extent as required by applicable law, our Business Partner will obtain your valid consent to the extent for us to transfer your personal information to recipients including Mintegral’s affiliates and any other recipients as described in this Policy, which are located outside the EEA. You are entitled to withdraw your consent at any time.
Mintegral has entered into EU standard contractual clauses (“Model Contracts”) for intra-group transfers of personal information to its affiliates. You can request a copy of these Model Contracts by submitting your request via email to privacy@mintegral.com
If you are located in the mainland of the People's Republic of China, the personal information we collect about you under this Privacy Policy will be stored in the mainland of the People's Republic of China.
We will not transfer your personal information outside of the mainland of the People's Republic of China. If our business partners transfer your personal information overseas, they shall be solely responsible for fulfilling the compliance obligations related to data transfer. They should inform you of the name or identity, contact information, processing purposes, processing methods, types of personal information, and the ways and procedures for exercising your legal rights towards the overseas recipients. They should obtain your separate consent, fulfill the evaluation process as required by laws and regulations, and meet other conditions specified by applicable laws and regulations.
7. Your Data Rights
If you are in the EEA, you have a right to (subject to a limited number of exceptions as permitted by GDPR): (i) request access to and rectification or erasure of your personal information; (ii) obtain restriction of processing or to object to processing of your personal information; and (iii) ask for a copy of your personal information to be provided to them, or a third party, in a digital format. You also have the right to lodge a complaint about the processing of your personal information with your local data protection authority in the EEA.
If you are residents of the State of California in the United States, you can request the following information about how we have collected and used your personal information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected the Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting,  selling or sharing Personal Information.
The categories of third parties with whom we disclose the Personal Information.
The categories of Personal Information that we sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
The categories of third parties to whom the Personal Information was sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
Access. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
You can ask us to correct inaccuracies of your Personal Information.
You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination as prohibited by the CCPA.You may (i) submit requests to exercise your California privacy rights described above by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
or send a written document to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222-3 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou City, Guangdong Province, China; (ii) o
pt out of selling or sharing of your data by clicking on the following link:
DO NOT SELL OR SHARE MY DATA
and (iii) submit requests to restrict the use of your sensitive Personal Information by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
.
When you submit a request we will verify your request by the information you provide (e.g. device ID, company email) according to our internal guidelines. You may designate an authorized agent to make a request to know or a request to delete your personal information by providing the authorized agent written permission to do so; and by verifying your own identity with us directly.  We will deny any requests from agents that do not submit proof of authorization. For request metrics as designated by the CCPA, please see
here
.
We have sold (as defined under the CCPA) the following categories of Personal Information to the following categories of third parties: please see column “Type of Information” and column “Type of Third Parties” of the 1
st
line under Article 6(1) (“Sharing”) of this Policy. We do not sell Personal Information of minors under the age of 16 without affirmative authorization.
You can also find a list of the categories of Personal Information that we collect in the
“Information We May Collect From Users”
section above. For details regarding the sources from which we obtain personal information, please see the
“How We Collect Users’ Information”
section above. We collect and use personal information for the business or commercial purposes described in the
“How We Use Users’ Personal Information”
section above.
If you are
(i)
a resident of the State of Virginia in the United States, effective January 1, 2023,
(ii)
a resident of the State of Colorado
in the
United States, effective July 1, 2023,
(iii)
a resident of the State of Connecticut
in the
United States, effective July 1, 2023
,
or
(
iv
)
a resident of the State of
Texas in the
United States, effective July 1, 202
4,
you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the VCDPA,
CPA, CDPA
, and
TDPSA
you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are a resident of the State of Utah in the United States, effective December 31, 2023, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, or (ii) selling your personal information.
As set forth in the UCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are a resident of the State of Oregon in the United States, effective July 1, 2024, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
a. to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
b. to obtain a list of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
c. to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
d. to delete your personal information;
e. to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
f. to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the OCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are in the mainland areas of China, you have the following rights related to your personal information except when laws and administrative regulations otherwise provide.
(1)Right to be informed, right to decide and right to restrict or refuse processing of your personal information.
(2)Right to access and copy your personal information except in special circumstance provided by law.
(3)Right to request to transfer your personal information to another data handler.
(4)Right to request to revise and supplement your personal information when you notice that the personal information we process is inaccurate or incomplete.
(5)Right to delete your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where the purpose of processing has been achieved or is unable to be achieved, or the personal information is no longer necessary for achieving the purpose of processing;
Where Mintegral ceases the provision of its product or service involved, or the retention period has expired;
Where consent is withdrawn by the User;
Where the processing of personal information by Mintegral is in violation of any law, administrative regulations or any agreement; or
Any other circumstance as provided by law or administrative regulations.
If it is technically difficult to delete the personal information, Mintegral shall cease the processing of the personal information, except for the storage and any necessary measure taken for security protection.
(6)For the algorithmic services we provide, you have the right to select or delete user tags for your personal characteristics used for such services.
(7)You have the right to request an explanation of this Policy.
You can contact us via
privacy@mintegral.com
and request your data rights.
Setting about Personalized Ads
If you are in the mainland areas of China, you can manage Mintegral’s ads your see and set for the personalized ads by clicking
here
.
No matter you are in which country or region, you can opt out personalized ads in the following way:
Guidance of Opt out
You can opt-out from receiving interest-based advertising or behavioural advertising from Mintegral on supported devices following the guideline below.
On an iOS device, if you are using iOS 14.5 or above, you can click on "Ask the App Not to Track" in the app's asking pop-up window or manage your "Tracking" settings in [Settings] - [Privacy] . If you ask the App not to track, Mintegral will not access your advertising identifiers and will not use advertising identifiers to infer your interests or serve advertisements to target devices based on your inferred interests.
On Android devices, your settings may allow you to “Opt out of Interest-Based Ads.” When you opt out using this setting on a device, Mintegral will not use information collected from that device to infer your interests or serve ads to that device that are targeted based on your inferred interests.
You can also manage your personalized advertising settings by clicking on the [Settings] section of the mobile app you have downloaded to find privacy-related settings. If you choose not to allow personalized advertising, Mintegral will not use information collected from your device to infer your interests or serve ads to target devices based on inferred interests.
Your mobile web browser may also provide a “Do Not Track” browser setting. When you have enabled this setting in your browser, Mintegral will not use mobile web browsing information from that browser to infer your interests or serve ads to that device that are targeting based on your inferred interests.
8. Security of Users’ Personal Information
The security of User’s information is our utmost priority, and we take strict measures in order to protect our data from unauthorized access, use, disclosure or destruction of data. We have implemented physical, technical and administrative security measures for the Services that comply with applicable laws and industry standards. For example, we use firewalls, encryption technology and other automated software designed to protect against fraud and identity theft; our data is only stored in centers that provide high-level security for User’s information. Physical access is strictly controlled both at the perimeter and at building ingress points by our staff utilizing video surveillance and other electronic means. We will establish a dedicated security team, security management system, and data security process to safeguard the security of your personal information. We adopt a strict data use and access system to ensure that only authorized personnel have access to your personal information, and conduct security audits of data and technology when appropriate. We will develop emergency handling plans and activate them immediately in the event of a user information security incident, in an effort to prevent the expansion of the impact and consequences of such security incidents. Once a user information security incident (leakage, loss, etc.) has occurred, we will promptly inform you in accordance with the requirements of laws and regulations.
We also protect User’s privacy by seeking to minimize the amount of sensitive data that we store on our servers in the first place. We also seek appropriate contractual protection from our partners regarding their treatment of user data.
At present, Mintegral programmatic interactive advertising platform has passed the national information security level protection (Level 3) assessment and record, and passed the international authoritative ISO27001 information security certification and SOC 2 Type 1 and Type 2 audits. mintegral also passed the ePrivacy privacy protection certification of the famous European privacy protection certification agency Mintegral has also been certified by the kidSAFE Seal Program under the U.S. Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, which means that Mintegral's programmatic interactive advertising platform is certified as compliant with GDPR regulations and effective in safeguarding user privacy. Mintegral has been certified by TrustArc, an authoritative privacy and security certification authority, as compliant with CPPA requirements for Mintegral's handling of customer and end-user personal data, further demonstrating that Mintegral's services provide comprehensive privacy protection for customers and end-device users. Users provide comprehensive privacy protection.
Mintegral participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies, Mintegral’s identification number within the framework is [Vendor ID: 867].
Mintegral may retain the information relating to you collected from our Business Partners as necessary for the provision of the services, internal analytical purposes, or to comply with its legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce agreements (e.g. settlement). We will only keep your personal information for as long as necessary and in any event in relation to personal information collected by us according to this Policy we will only keep this personal information for no more than two (2) years. The criteria used to determine the retention periods include: (i) how long the personal data is needed to provide the services and operate the business; (ii) the type of personal data collected; and (iii) whether we are subject to a legal, contractual or similar obligation to retain the data (e.g., mandatory data retention laws, government orders to preserve data relevant to an investigation, or data that must be retained for the purposes of litigation or disputes).
9. Protection for Minors
Mintegral’s service is not mainly for minors. If a User is deemed as minor under applicable law, please make sure that before the use of the application which integrates Mintegral’s product or service or the application of an advertiser that partners with Mintegral for delivering its ads, parents or other guardian and such User have together read the application’s privacy policy with the guardianship and guiding of parents or other guardian, and their consent have been provided for processing of personal information.
We process minor’s personal information according to requirements of related laws and regulations. Except as otherwise provided by law, we will only collect, use, store, disclose, or make available to the public the personal information where permitted by law, with consent of parents or other guardians, or for the necessity of protection of the minors. If we notice the collection of personal information of minors without verifiable consent of parents, we will take measures to delete related information as soon as possible.
If you are parents or other guardian of minors, please contact us via the email we provide in this Policy when you have any question regarding to the protection of minors.
If you are Users in the U.S., we ensure that we comply with COPPA. If our business partners (such as Publishers) operate apps directed to children under the age of thirteen (13) or knowingly collect, use or disclose personal information of children under the age of thirteen (13) during our cooperation, they will obtain verifiable parental consent for Mintegral to collect, use or disclose such personal information according to this Policy. Further, such business partners must enable the COPPA settings when using the Mintegral Services. This allows Mintegral to ensure that any persistent identifiers collected about Users of apps that are flagged as “child-directed” will be processed according to the requirements of COPPA, including not being used to serve behaviorally-targeted ads or track users for such purposes in violation of COPPA. In addition, we will not knowingly collect any other personal information (such as the precise geo-location of Users’ devices) from Users of Apps that we know to be directed to children under the age of thirteen (13).
If you are Users in California U.S.,we ensure that we comply with CCPA. We will not sell or conduct targeted advertising with the data of consumers under the age of 16, unless there is explicit opt-in consent. If the request for consent is declined, we will not ask again for 12 months. Minors under the age of 13 must get permission from a parent or guardian to opt-in.
If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with information without their consent, he or she should promptly contact us and we take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is deleted from our files.
10. Marketing
If you are our Business Partners, we or our affiliates may contact you periodically by e-mail to provide information regarding our products, services and content that may be of interest to you. If applicable law requires that we receive your consent before we send you certain types of marketing communications, we will only send you those types of communications after receiving your consent.
If you decide at any time that you no longer wish to receive such communications from us, you may follow the unsubscribe instructions provided in any of the communications or request to be opted-out of receiving such communications via email to
privacy@mintegral.com
11. Contact Us
If you are located in mainland China, you can (i) send a written request to privacy@mintegral.com or send written documents to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou, Guangdong Province, China.
If you are located outside mainland China, you can (i) contact our DPO by sending a written request to privacy@mintegral.com. You can also contact our data protection representative in the EEA, Eurocore B.V., with address: Hullenbergweg 278, 1101BV Amsterdam.
Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website
1. Introduction
This Privacy Policy of Mintegral Website applies to information collection and use including while you are visiting and using the Mintegral Site. According to the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Mintegral is the data controller of your personal information.
2. What Information We Collect
As you navigate through this Mintegral Site, we may collect information include:
(1)
personal information you voluntarily provide (for example, names, birth dates, numbers or copies of your personal ID card/passport/social security card/driver's license/other license, addresses, telephone numbers, E-mail addresses, occupations, education, work experience, account log-in information, debit or credit card or other payment account information and related information).
Among them, numbers or copies of your personal ID card/passport/social security card/driver's license/other license may constitute sensitive personal information under the definition of CCPA; debit or credit card or other collection account information may constitute sensitive personal information under the definition of CCPA and China Personal Information Protection Law.
(2) s
ome information that are not voluntarily provided such as your browser type, domain name, IP address, pages visited, and the length of your user session using various technologies and means, such as Internet Protocol Address, cookies, Internet Tags and navigational data collection.
Mintegral is entitled to take measures to validate the authenticity of personal information you provide.
If you give us personal information of somebody else, you should warrant that you have gained their permission to do so.
If you are located in mainland China, we may use the Baidu Statistics Service provided by Baidu.com to help us analyze our website usage and help improve the quality of our website services. For more information about the information collected by Baidu's statistical services and its data processing activities, please visit:
Here
If you are located outside of mainland China, We may also use Google Analysis that assists us with analysing the usage of our website and help to improve the service quality of our website. For the personal information that may be collected by Google Analysis and its processing activities, please visit:
Here
3. How We Use Your Information
Based on your consent or based on our legitimate interests, we may use your personal information for the following purposes: (i) to provide you with Mintegral’s products or services or information; (ii) to sign you up for an event or training; (iii) to contact you and respond to your requests and enquiries; (iv) for business administration, including statistical analysis; (v) to personalize your visit to the Mintegral Site and to assist you while you use the Site; (vi) to improve the Mintegral Site by helping us understand who uses the Site; or (vii) to periodically provide you with information about our products and services and content that may be of interest to you by email.
If you decide at any time that you no longer wish to receive such communications from us, you may follow the unsubscribe instructions provided in any of the emails or request to be opted-out of receiving such communications via email to
privacy@mintegral.com
4. Disclosure of Your Personal Information
Subject to compliance with applicable laws and regulations, we may disclose User’s personal information to
Mintegral’s Affiliates
and other third parties.
We may use
Third-party Technology Service Providers
to provide us with services who may have access to your personal information, including
companies
that assist with technical aspects of hosting and operating the Mintegral Site, technical service provider  that assists with analyzing the usage of our website, or email service provider.
(please see our
Cookies Policy
for details).
Except as expressly stated in this Policy, according to the Personal Information Protection Law of the People's Republic of China, we will not disclose User’s personal information to any third party without User’s consent.
We may also share aggregate or anonymous information with other third parties in accordance with the terms of this Policy.
We may disclose users' personal information to our affiliates for the purposes set out in this Policy or to promote the products or services of our affiliates to users.
The servers used in the operation of the Mintegral Site automatically identify a computer by its IP address. Although, we will not be able to identify the computer using its IP address once you have left the Mintegral Site. If we, in good faith, determine that you have or are attempting to misuse or harm the Site, we may investigate and cooperate with appropriate law enforcement agencies to protect our rights or property.
Similarly, we may share your personal information as required or permitted by law to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process or government request, or when we believe in good faith that disclosure is legally required or otherwise necessary to protect our rights and property, or the rights, property or safety of others, including to advisers, law enforcement agencies, judicial and regulatory authorities. We may also transfer your personal information to a third party that acquires all or part of our assets or shares, or that succeeds us in carrying on all or a part of our business, whether by merger, acquisition, reorganization or otherwise.
5. International Transfers
When you are located in the European Econocim Area (“EEA”), personal information collected about you will be transferred to recipients in countries located outside the EEA or can be remotely accessed in countries located outside the EEA, including in countries which may not be decided by the European Commission that it provides an adequate level of protection to personal information. We have followed requirements as set out in applicable law to provide adequate protection to your personal data. To the extent as required by applicable law, our Business Partner will obtain your valid consent
to the extent for us to transfer your personal information to recipients including Mintegral’s affiliates and any other recipients as described in this Policy, which are located outside the EEA.
You are entitled to withdraw your consent at any time.
Mintegral has entered into EU standard contractual clauses (
“Model Contracts”
) for intra-group transfers of personal information to its affiliates. You can request a copy of these Model Contracts by submitting your request via email to
privacy@mintegral.com
If you are located in the mainland areas of China, we store your personal information inside the mainland areas of China.
We will not transfer your personal information outside of the mainland areas of China.
6. Your Data Rights
You have the right to access, modify, correct or delete any personal data which we may have collected. To exercise this right please contact privacy
privacy@mintegral.com
If you are in the EEA, you have a right to (subject to a limited number of exceptions): (i) request access to and rectification or erasure of your personal information; (ii) obtain restriction of processing or to object to processing of your personal information; and (iii) ask for a copy of your personal information to be provided to them, or a third party, in a digital format. You also have the right to lodge a complaint about the processing of your personal information with your local data protection authority in the EEA.
If you are residents of the State of California in the United States, you can request the following information about how we have collected and used your personal information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected the Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling or sharing Personal Information.
The categories of third parties with whom we disclose the Personal Information.
The categories of Personal Information that we sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
The categories of third parties to whom the Personal Information was sold, shared or disclosed for a business purpose.
Access. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
You can ask us to correct inaccuracies of your Personal Information.
You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination as prohibited by the CCPA.You may (i) submit requests to exercise your California privacy rights described above by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
or send a written document to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222-3 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou City, Guangdong Province, China; (ii) opt out of selling
or sharing
of your data by clicking on the following link:
DO NOT SELL OR SHARE MY DATA
and (iii) submit requests to restrict the use of your sensitive Personal Information by writing to us at:
privacy@mintegral.com
.
When you submit a request we will verify your request by the information you provide (e.g. device ID, company email) according to our internal guidelines. You may designate an authorized agent to make a request to know or a request to delete your personal information by providing the authorized agent written permission to do so; and by verifying your own identity with us directly.  We will deny any requests from agents that do not submit proof of authorization. For request metrics as designated by the CCPA, please see
here
.
For clarity, we do not sell or share (as defined under the CCPA) your Personal Information.
You can also find a list of the categories of Personal Information that we collect and details regarding the sources from which we obtain Personal Information in the “
What Information We Collect
” section above. We collect and use personal information for the business or commercial purposes described in the “
How We Use Your Personal Information
” section above.
If you are (i) a resident of the State of Virginia in the United States, effective January 1, 2023, (ii) a resident of the State of Colorado in the United States, effective July 1, 2023, (iii) a resident of the State of Connecticut in the United States, effective July 1, 2023, or (iv) a resident of the State of Texas in the United States, effective July 1, 2024, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us:
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the VCDPA,
CPA, CDPA
, and
TDPSA
you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are a resident of the State of Utah in the United States, effective December 31, 2023, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, or (ii) selling your personal information.
As set forth in the UCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com.
If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com.
If you are a resident of the State of Oregon in the United States, effective July 1, 2024, you may exercise the following personal information rights with us.
to confirm whether we are processing your personal information and to access that personal information;
to obtain a list of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
to correct any inaccuracies in your personal information;
to delete your personal information;
to obtain a copy of the personal information you have provided to us; and
to request a refusal to allow us to process your personal information for the purposes of (i) personalized advertising, (ii) selling your personal information, or (iii) user profiling that has significant legal or similar implications for you.
As set forth in the OCPA you have the right to exercise the above rights without discrimination.
You may (i) exercise your rights to personal information as described above by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
and (ii) click on this
link
to refuse personalized advertising, refuse the sale of your personal information, and refuse user profiles that have a significant legal or similar impact on you. If you fail to provide valid information for our effective feedback, etc. when exercising your rights as described above, we may deny your right to exercise your rights. If you have any dispute on such denial, you may raise such dispute by sending email to
privacy@mintegral.com
.
If you are in the mainland areas of China, you have the following rights related to your personal information except when laws and administrative regulations otherwise provide.
(1)Right to be informed, right to decide and right to restrict or refuse processing of your personal information.(2)Right to access and copy your personal information except in special circumstance provided by law.(3)Right to request to transfer your personal information to another data handler.(4)Right to request to revise and supplement your personal information when you notice that the personal information we process is inaccurate or incomplete.(5)Right to delete your personal information in the following circumstances:
Where the purpose of processing has been achieved or is unable to be achieved, or the personal information is no longer necessary for achieving the purpose of processing;
Where Mintegral ceases the provision of its product or service involved, or the retention period has expired;
Where consent is withdrawn by the User;
Where the processing of personal information by Mintegral is in violation of any law, administrative regulations or any agreement; or
Any other circumstance as provided by law or administrative regulations.
If it is technically difficult to delete the personal information, Mintegral shall cease the processing of the personal information, except for the storage and any necessary measure taken for security protection.
(6)You have the right to request an explain of this Policy.
You can contact us via
privacy@mintegral.com
and request your data rights.
7. Security of Your Personal Information
The security of User’s information is our utmost priority, and we take strict measures in order to protect our data from unauthorized access, use, disclosure or destruction of data. We have implemented physical, technical and administrative security measures for the Services that comply with applicable laws and industry standards. For example, we use firewalls, encryption technology and other automated software designed to protect against fraud and identity theft; our data is only stored in centers that provide high-level security for User’s information. Physical access is strictly controlled both at the perimeter and at building ingress points by our staff utilizing video surveillance and other electronic means.
We also protect User’s privacy by seeking to minimize the amount of sensitive data that we store on our servers in the first place. We also seek appropriate contractual protection from our partners regarding their treatment of user data.
We will only keep your personal information for as long as necessary and in any event in relation to personal information collected by us on the Site we will only keep this personal information for one (1) year. For personal information collected via Google Analytics the following retention periods apply:
Here
8. Protection of Minors
The Site does not knowingly collect any personal information from minors. The personal information of any minor you provide shall be agreed by the minor’s parent or guardian in advance. Minor is defined in accordance with the laws applicable to this Policy of Mintegral Website.
We process minor’s personal information according to requirements of related laws and regulations. Except as otherwise provided by law, we will only collect, use, store, disclose, or make available to the public the personal information where permitted by law, with consent of parents or other guardians, or for the necessity of protection of the minors. If we notice the collection of personal information of minors without verifiable consent of parents, we will take measures to delete related information as soon as possible.
If you are parents or other guardian of minors, please contact us via the email we provide in this Policy when you have any question regarding to the protection of minors.
If you are Users in the U.S., we ensure that we comply with COPPA. If our business partners (such as Publishers) operate apps directed to children under the age of thirteen (13) or knowingly collect, use or disclose personal information of children under the age of thirteen (13) during our cooperation, they will obtain verifiable parental consent for Mintegral to collect, use or disclose such personal information according to this Policy. Further, such business partners must enable the COPPA settings when using the Mintegral Services. This allows Mintegral to ensure that any persistent identifiers collected about Users of apps that are flagged as “child-directed” will be processed according to the requirements of COPPA, including not being used to serve behaviorally-targeted ads or track users for such purposes in violation of COPPA. In addition, we will not knowingly collect any other personal information (such as the precise geo-location of Users’ devices) from Users of Apps that we know to be directed to children under the age of thirteen (13).
If you are Users in California U.S.,we ensure that we comply with CCPA. We will not sell or conduct targeted advertising with the data of consumers under the age of 16, unless there is explicit opt-in consent. If the request for consent is declined, we will not ask again for 12 months. Minors under the age of 13 must get permission from a parent or guardian to opt-in.
If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with information without their consent, he or she should promptly contact us and we take reasonable steps to ensure that such information is deleted from our files.
9. Use of Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Mintegral may use cookies or other technology (collectively “Cookies”) to collect certain information about you when you are visiting the Site. Please read our
Cookies Policy
for more details.
10. Outside Sites and Linking
The Site may contain links and pointers to other sites on the Internet that are owned or operated by third party vendors and other third parties (the “
Outside Sites
“). Mintegral is not responsible for the availability of, or the content located on or through, any Outside Site, including any webcasting or other form of transmission received from any Outside Sites. You should contact the site administrator or Webmaster for those Outside Sites if you have any concerns regarding such links or the content located on such Outside Sites. Mintegral permits certain third party links to the home page of its Site, provided that Mintegral is provided with notice of such links and does not thereafter object to such linking. Mintegral a reserves the right to revoke unilaterally any consent that it may at any time give to any linkage, including linkages to the home page. The Outside Sites are being provided to you only as a convenience and any link or pointer contained on this Site does not imply endorsement of the Outside Sites.
11. Copyright
All Site content, design, text, graphics, images, logos, buttons, icons, interfaces, audio and video clips, and the selection and arrangements thereof are the exclusive property of Mintegral, or its respective content providers, and are protected by Hong Kong SAR and international copyright laws. All software used on the Site is the property of Mintegral or its respective software suppliers, and such software is protected by Hong Kong SAR and international copyright laws and other applicable laws and treaties. Users of this Site shall not transmit/post any information to this Site that infringes the copyright or other intellectual property rights of others.
12. Trademarks
All trademarks, service marks and trade names used on the Site (collectively the “Marks“) are solely owned by Mintegral. The Marks may not be used in connection with any product or service that is not a product or service of Mintegral or that is likely to cause confusion among customers, or that in any manner disparages or discredits Mintegral.
13. Online Conduct
Any conduct by a person that in Mintegral ‘s sole discretion restricts or inhibits any other person from using or enjoying the Site, is prohibited. You agree to use the Site only for lawful purposes and in accordance with that prohibition. You agree that you will not post on the Site or transmit any unlawful, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, sexually explicit, profane, hateful, racially, ethnically, or otherwise objectionable material of any kind, including, but not limited to, any material that encourages conduct that would constitute a criminal offense, give rise to civil liability or otherwise violate any applicable local, state, national, or international law.
14. Termination of Usage
Mintegral may, without incurring any liability to you, terminate access by you or suspend any access to all or part of the Site, without notice, for any conduct that Mintegral, in its sole discretion, believes is in violation of any applicable law or this Agreement, or is harmful to the interests of another user, a third-party, a merchant, a sponsor, a licensor, a service provider, or the Site.
Due to the rapidly evolving technologies on the Internet, we may occasionally update this Policy. All revisions will be posted to this website
www.mintegral.com
15. Contact Us
If you are located in mainland China, you can (i) send a written request to privacy@mintegral.com or send written documents to the following address: Legal Department, Room 4312, No. 222 Xingmin Road, Tianhe District, Guangzhou, Guangdong Province, China.
If you are located outside mainland China, you can (i) contact our DPO by sending a written request to privacy@mintegral.com. You can also contact our data protection representative in the EEA, Eurocore B.V., with address: Hullenbergweg 278, 1101BV Amsterdam.
Contact Mintegral
boost your mobile growth
如您是中国大陆用户，请点击按钮切换网页站点，以获得更好的浏览体验
确定
By clicking “Agree”, you agree to our use of tools to send you marketing information and to record and analyse your browsing behaviors. For more details, please see "Customise Settings".
Agree
Customise Settings
Sub-policy 9
https://www.pangleglobal.com/privacy/enduser-en:
Home
/
Privacy and Terms
Pangle Partner Data Privacy Policy
Pangle Partner Data Privacy Policy
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
パートナーデータプライバシーポリシー
パートナーデータプライバシーポリシー
エンドユーザーデータプライバシーポリシー
エンドユーザーデータプライバシーポリシー
Pangle 파트너 개인정보처리방침
Pangle 파트너 개인정보처리방침
최종 사용자 개인정보처리방침
최종 사용자 개인정보처리방침
合作夥伴資料隱私權政策
合作夥伴資料隱私權政策
終端使用者資料隱私權政策
終端使用者資料隱私權政策
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Parceiro Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Parceiro Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Usuário Final Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Usuário Final Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Socio Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Socio Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Usuario Final de Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Usuario Final de Pangle
Politique de protection des données des partenaires de Pangle
Politique de protection des données des partenaires de Pangle
Politique de protection des données de l’utilisateur final de Pangle
Politique de protection des données de l’utilisateur final de Pangle
Pangle Publisher Agreement
Pangle Publisher Agreement
EEA/SWISS/UK SPECIFIC DATA TERMS (“DATA TERMS”)
EEA/SWISS/UK SPECIFIC DATA TERMS (“DATA TERMS”)
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
The Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy applies to personal data that we process through Pangle (as defined below), where you interact with Pangle through mobile applications and/or websites that have integrated with Pangle s advertising platform either directly or via an advertising exchange, each a “Partner”. The Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy will apply to the processing of your personal data in your capacity as an end user.
Last updated: 8 March 2023
I. Who we are and who this applies to
I.1 We are Bytedance Pte. Ltd., a company incorporated in Singapore whose registered office is at 1 Raffles Quay, #26-10 ,Singapore 048583 (" we", "our" or " us"). This Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy ("Privacy Policy") explains who we are, how we collect, process, store, use, transfer, share, and disclose ("process") personal data about you, and how you can exercise your data privacy rights.
I.2 It is the Partner’s responsibility to inform you of Pangle’s use of your data (i.e. by directing you to this policy) and to acquire all consent necessary for Pangle’s use of your data. We will process your personal data on the basis that your personal data is required for us to provide our services to the Partner under the relevant contract between us and the Partner.
I.3 If you have any questions or concerns about our processing of your personal data, please contact us using the contact details provided at the bottom of this Privacy Policy.
II. What is Pangle?
II.1 Pangle is a mobile advertising platform, including support systems and services operated by Bytedance and accessible via www.pangleglobal.com ("Pangle"). Pangle enables advertisers to serve advertisements on third party mobile applications and/or websites owned or operated by a Partner or to which a Partner has the right to serve advertising (each a“Partner Site”). We do this by processing certain information collected from those Partner Sites, as described in this Privacy Policy.
III. What personal data we process
III.1 The types of personal data that we process depend on the circumstances of collection and on the nature of the services requested or transaction undertaken for our Partners.
III.2 When you interact with a Partner Site, we process certain information about you and your device. This information may be collected automatically from your device using our software code (referred to as a "software development kit", or "SDK"), or shared with us by other advertising exchanges (e.g. Google DoubleClick). We also use cookies (text files inserted in your browser when you visit our partners or customers' mobile applications and websites) and other tracking technologies available on your device.
III.3 The information that we process about you may include some or all of the following categories:
a. Information obtained automatically from your device
i. Identifiers: We may process device-specific identifiers such as your IP address, mobile advertising identifier (such as the "Google Advertising ID" on Android phones or the "ID for Advertisers" on iOS devices), or a Pangle-specific identifier which our SDK has assigned to your device. A mobile advertising identifier is an identifier that is provided by your device operating system and allows companies, like Pangle, to recognize your device across apps for advertising purposes. In addition to the mobile advertising identifier, and other similar technologies, Pangle may also obtain your device's model, operating system (e.g. iOS or Android), your device's language settings, general geographic region, time zone, network type (such as 5G or WiFi), your ROM version, screen resolution (to know which ads which will appear best on your device), mobile country code and mobile network code, and the time your device was last updated and started.
ii. Geolocation data: We may infer your approximate geo-location from your device s IP address. We may also process your precise latitude and longitude using your phone s GPS data, where we have your consent or are otherwise permitted to do so in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
iii. Internet activity: We may process information about your app and website usage, including the name and version of the app or website that has integrated Pangle. We may also process information about your interactions with any advertisements we deliver (e.g. information about the advertisements served, viewed, or clicked on, such as the type of ad, where and when the ad was served, whether you clicked on it, and whether you visited the advertiser s website or downloaded the advertiser s app, as well as any preferences you may have expressed in respect of that advertisement).
b. Information obtained from other sources
i. From time to time, we may receive information about you from other sources. For example, we may receive information about you from third parties, such as advertising exchanges that share data with us for the purposes of serving advertising, if third parties are legally permitted to disclose this information to us.
ii. The information we receive from these sources may include identifiers (such as your IP address or mobile advertising identifier), information about your Internet activity (such as information about your interaction with third party websites, applications and advertisements) and inferences relating to your preferences and characteristics (e.g. your approximate age and gender).
IV.How we use personal data
IV.1 We use personal data to serve you with personalised advertisements and understand the audiences who see the advertisements we serve. Specifically, we process personal data for the following purposes:
a. To serve you advertisements: To enable third party advertisers to bid on and fill advertising space on Partner Apps with their advertising. We use your mobile advertising identifier, together with the other device identifiers described above, to serve you with personalised advertising and for related purposes such as frequency capping (limiting the number of times you see the same ad), attribution (making sure we get paid by advertisers for the advertisements we deliver), and fraud detection (detecting malicious software, or "bots", that generate false interactions with advertisements to drive fraudulent advertising revenues). We also use your device data to ensure we display advertisements that display properly on your device.
b. To personalise the advertisements we show you: To infer your interests from the types of apps you use and the adverts you interact with, as well as to infer certain demographic information about you (such as your age and gender) so we can show you advertisements that are more relevant to you;
c. To serve you advertisements on the basis of your location: To serve you advertisements that are relevant for your region and displayed in the relevant local language, as well as to better understand the audiences who see our advertisements, based on your current or prior location, including through location-based targeting segments created by us or by our third party advertisers.
d. For auditing and reporting: To verify accurate delivery of, and count the number of end users who see and interact with, advertisements we serve on behalf of our advertisers and what ad campaigns led to further consumer activity (such as a purchase, app install or visit) (sometimes called "attribution"). We use this information to report to our advertisers about the advertisements users have seen and interacted with, so that we and our publishers are paid appropriately for the advertisements we display.
e. To provide campaign analytics to advertisers: To provide advertisers information about how well their campaigns perform, whether relative to their prior campaigns, or bench-marked against third party campaigns or other data.
f. For cross-device targeting: To "link" or "resolve" the same user across their various devices (such as across mobile devices, browsers and tablets). For instance, we (or a third party partner we work with) may help an advertiser "find" a consumer they have engaged with previously on a mobile device when that consumer is browsing on their tablet, in order to target ads to the user across those devices.
g. To detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecute those responsible for such activities: For example, to identify invalid clicks (or advertising queries) and protect us and our advertisers from fraudulent behaviour.
h. To verify or maintain the quality of Pangle and improve, upgrade or enhance Pangle: For example, (i) for audit, research, and analysis of the information in order to maintain, improve, upgrade or enhance our advertising services, and to ensure that our technologies function properly; and (ii) other internal operations, such as debugging, support, and security.
i. For compliance with legal obligations: To comply with legal obligations that apply to us, for example to respond to law enforcement requests.
j. For archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or historical research purposes.
k. For any other purpose to which you consent: To use your personal data for any other purpose to which you have provided consent.
IV.2 In general, we will process personal data only for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy or for purposes that are explained to you at the time your personal data is collected. However, we may also use your personal data for other purposes that are not incompatible with the purposes we have disclosed to you if and where this is permitted by applicable data protection laws.
V. Who we share your personal data with
V.1 We may share your personal data for the purposes described above in this Privacy Policy with the following categories of recipients:
a Our advertising partners and platforms: We may share personal data with our
advertising partners
(such as DSPs) and partner platforms (such as
TikTok for Business
) in connection with their bidding on the ad opportunity and optimizing their ad bidding systems and ad biddingÅ strategies, so as to target and display advertisements on Publisher Partner Apps on behalf of advertisers.
b. Our advertisers: We also share limited personal data in aggregated form with our advertising partners, through reports about the kinds of people seeing their advertisements and how their advertisements are performing (for example, that an ad was seen by 100 men between the ages of 25 and 34 who live in Singapore and like football). Aggregated data cannot by itself can be used to contact you or identify your name. We also report to our advertising partners which Pangle advertisements resulted in you making a purchase or taking an action with an advertiser.
c. Partners: We share aggregated data with Partners through reports about the types of advertisements served to their apps, in order that they can measure the effectiveness and value of our services. As these reports are aggregated they do not reveal any information that directly identifies you.
d. Our affiliates, corporate group and third party service providers: We share personal data with our affiliates and other companies, including other Bytedance entities, who help us operate our business, perform functions on our behalf or provide services to us, including data processing services to us (for example, to support, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the accuracy, safety and security of our services, or to provide analytics or attribution services to us, as well as service providers who provide technical, customer, hosting, data hygiene and enhancement or operational support), as well as other professional advisors. We may also share personal data with members of our corporate group to improve their ads systems and processes, to help them deliver more relevant ads to you and to reach you on non-Bytedance properties.
e. Our analytics and attribution partners: We share personal data with our analytics and attribution partners who help us monitor the success of our advertising campaigns (such as how many end users saw and clicked on an advertisement) and provide reporting to our advertisers.
f. Any competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party: We may share personal data with these parties where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation; (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights; (iii) to detect and protect against fraud or other security or technical vulnerabilities; (iv) to respond to an emergency; or (v) to otherwise protect your vital interests or those of any other person where permitted by applicable law.
g. Any other person: We will only share personal data with any other person with your consent to the disclosure or as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection law.
VI. How we keep your personal data secure
VI.1 We use reasonable technical and organisational measures to protect the personal data that we process about you. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal data.
VII. International data transfers
VII.1 Your personal data may be transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are located or in which your personal data was collected. However, we will not transfer or permit any of your personal data to be transferred outside of such country unless we have taken measures necessary to ensure the transfer is in compliance with applicable laws, and in any case to a recipient that has comparable privacy protections in place.
VII.2 Specifically, our servers are located in the United States of America and Singapore, and our group companies and third party service providers and partners operate around the world. This means that we may process your personal data in any of these countries in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
VIII. Data retention
VIII.1 We retain your personal data for as long as it is necessary to provide you with services so that we can fulfil our contractual obligations and exercise our rights in relation to the information involved. Where we do not need your information in order to provide services to you, we retain it only for so long as we have a legitimate business purpose in keeping such data or as necessary to comply with the law.
VIII.2 When we have no ongoing legitimate business or legal need to process your personal data, we will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal data has been stored in backup archives or the law requires otherwise), then we will securely store your personal data and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
IX. Targeted ads and your right to opt-out
Our partners use the Pangle SDK for the purpose of serving targeted ads to you. To do this, Pangle receives and processes device information such as cookies, mobile advertising identifiers, IP addresses, user agent information and browsing or app data where the SDK is installed. Pangle uses this device information to identify your device and deliver relevant ads to you.
IX.1 Opt-out
You can opt out of ads that are targeted based on data Pangle previously received about you by clicking
Ad label
. Pangle's ability to opt you out of targeted ads depends on our ability to recognize your device. As device and connection information can change frequently, we encourage you to revisit this page periodically to ensure your opt-outs are up to date.
IX.2 Non-targeted ads
If you opt out of targeted ads, Pangle will stop showing ads based on data it previously collected and can link to your device. However, Pangle may still show you ads based on data it receives about the context of the app or website you are visiting (e.g. sports advertisements in a sports app) or your device (ads for iPhone users or Android users).
X. Your data protection rights
X.1 Pangle supports the exercise of your data protection rights which may be available in your country in accordance with applicable data protection laws. Specifically:
a. You can request to access, correct, update or delete your personal data by contacting us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below, and we will fulfil your request if these rights are available under applicable data protection laws in your country.
b. You can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above.
X.2 We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws. We do not discriminate against any individual based on the exercise of their data protection rights. However, we may request for you to further provide us with your personal information for the purposes of verifying your identity.
XI. Children
XI.1 Where applicable laws prohibit us from processing personal data about children who are under specified age thresholds or require us to obtain parental consent before we may process personal data about such children, then we will not knowingly process personal data about children unless we are in compliance with those laws.
XI.2 If you believe we may be processing personal data relating to children contrary to applicable law, please contact us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below and we will investigate and, where necessary, take appropriate steps to cease any such processing and delete any such personal data.
XII. Updates to this Privacy Policy
XII.1 This Privacy Policy is effective as of the date set out at the top of this Privacy Policy.
XII.2 We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time, including in response to changing legal, technical or business developments, in accordance with applicable law.
XII.3 You can see when this Privacy Policy was last updated by checking the "last updated" date displayed at the top of this Privacy Policy.
XIII. How to contact us
XIII.1 If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your personal data, please contact us using the details below.
- For individuals located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland: europe_privacy@pangleglobal.com
- For individuals located in any other part of the world: privacy@pangleglobal.com.
- For individuals located in the Americas: americas_privacy@pangleglobal.com
XIV. Language
XIV.1 This Privacy Policy is made in English and translations into other languages may be provided. In the event of any conflict between the English version and any translations, the English version will prevail to the extent permitted by the prevailing laws.
Jurisdiction-specific terms
For individuals located in Israel:
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section III. What personal data we process:
III.4 You are under no legal obligation to provide us any personal data.
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section VII. International Data Transfers:
VII.3 You hereby consent to the transfer of your personal data as set out in this Section VII.
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section X. Your data protection rights:
X.3 You have the right to appeal the refusal of Pangle to comply with your request to exercise your rights in a court of competent jurisdiction.
For individuals located in Brazil
If you are using the Platform in Brazil, the following additional terms apply. If any conflict arises between the main Privacy Policy and the additional terms, the following terms shall prevail:
The following paragraph shall replace section I, 1.2. of this Privacy Policy:
I.2 It is the Partner’s responsibility to inform you of Pangle’s use of your data (i.e. by directing you to this policy) and to acquire all necessary authorizations for Pangle’s use of your data. We will process your personal data on the basis that your personal data is required for us to provide our services to the Partner under the relevant contract between us and the Partner.
The following paragraph shall replace section III.3, a, ii. of this Privacy Policy:
ii. Geolocation data: We may infer your approximate geo-location from your device s IP address. We may also process your precise latitude and longitude using your phone s GPS data, where we have proper authorization or are otherwise permitted to do so in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
The following paragraph shall replace section IV, k. of this Privacy Policy:
k. For any other purpose in compliance with the applicable data protection law: To use your personal data for any other purpose in compliance with the applicable data protection law.
The following paragraph shall replace section V, g. of this Privacy Policy:
g. Any other person: We will only share personal data with any other person in compliance with the applicable data protection law.
The following paragraph shall replace section X. of this Privacy Policy:
Exercise of data protection rights. Brazilian law provides certain rights to individuals with regard to their personal data. Thus, we seek to ensure transparency and access controls in order to allow users to benefit from the mentioned rights.
We will respond and/or fulfill your requests for the exercise of your rights below, according to the applicable law and when applicable, to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law - LGPD:
I. confirmation of whether your data are being processed;
II. access to your data;
III. correction of incomplete, inaccurate or outdated data;
IV. anonymization, blocking or erasure of data;
V. portability of personal data to a third party;
VI. object to the processing of personal data. Please note that you can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above;
VII. information of public and private entities with which we shared data;
VIII. information about the possibility to refuse providing personal data and the respective consequences, when applicable;
IX. withdrawal of your consent.
Verifying your identity: For your safety and to allow us to make sure that we do not disclose any of your personal data to unauthorized third parties, in order to verify your identity and guarantee the adequate exercise of your rights, we may request specific information and/or documents from you before we can properly respond to a request received concerning your data. All data and documents received from you in the process of responding to your requests will be used for the strict purposes of analyzing your request, authenticating your identity, and finally responding to your request.
Limitations to your rights: In certain situations, we may have legitimate reasons not to comply with some of your requests. For instance, we may choose not to disclose certain information to you when a disclosure could adversely impact our business whenever there is a risk of violation to our trade secrets or intellectual property rights. In addition, we may refrain from complying with a request for erasure when the maintenance of your data is required for complying with legal or regulatory obligations or when such maintenance is required to protect our rights and interests in case a dispute arises. Whenever this is the case and we are unable to comply with a request you make, we will let you know the reasons why we cannot fulfill your request.
DPO: If you wish to reach the Pangle’s Data Protection Officer, contact us at: dpobrasil@pangleglobal.com
Access Logs. We keep your application access logs, under confidentiality, in a controlled and safe environment, for, at least, 6 (six)  months, in order to comply with legal obligations.
The following paragraph shall be added to section XI. of this Privacy Policy:
Parental and Guardian Consent. If required by Brazilian data protection laws, (i) if you are over the age of 16 but under the age of 18, you can only use and register for an account with the assistance of your parent or legal guardian and you declare and represent that you had such assistance to use the Services and to agree to the Policy; (ii) if you are over the age of 13 but under the age of 16, you can only use and register for an account with the representation of your parent or legal guardian, and you must obtain the consent from your parent or legal guardian to the use of the Services and acceptance of this Privacy Policy; and (iii) if you are under the age of 13 you are not allowed to have an account.
For individuals located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland:
The following paragraph shall replace section X. of this Privacy Policy:
Your data protection rights
X.1 Pangle supports the exercise of your data protection rights which may be available in your country in accordance with applicable data protection laws. Specifically:
a. Opt-out of targeted advertising: You can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above.
b. Access Your Data: You can ask us, free of charge, to confirm we process your personal data and for a copy of your personal data.
c. Delete Your Data: You can ask us to delete all or some of your personal data.
d. Change or Correct Data: You can ask us to change or fix your data.
e. Portability: You can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in a machine-readable for
f. Object or Restrict Use of Data and Withdraw Consent: You can ask us to stop using some or all of your data, e.g. if we have no legal right to keep using it. You can ask us to stop processing your personal data for direct marketing purposes; withdraw your consent or ask us to stop making any automatic individual decisions, including profiling. If you object to such processing, we ask you to share the reason for your objection in order for us to examine the processing of your personal data and to balance our legitimate interest in processing and your objection to this processing.
g. Complain: The right to lodge complaints before the competent data protection regulator.
X.2 For further information, contact us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below. We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws. If you do not provide your personal data, we will not be able to provide some or all of our services to you. If you have made a specific request to us, and do not provide personal data that we can use to identify you (such as a device identifier) we will be unable to fulfil your request. The following paragraph shall be added as section XIV of this Privacy Policy:
XIV. Legal basis
XIV.1 In the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom we must have a legal basis to process your personal data. For users located in these regions, we will only serve targeted adverts to you with your consent. The legal basis for other processing of your personal data will depend on the personal data concerned and the specific context in which we process it. If we process your personal data in our legitimate interests, such as for security and product improvement purposes, this interest will normally be to provide an effective, secure and dynamic platform.
XIV.2 In some cases, we process your data to comply with our legal obligations, with your consent or where it is in the vital interests of you or another person.
XIV.3 If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal data, please contact us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below.
By Clicking "Accept All Cookies", you agree to the storing of
Cookies
on your device to enhance your user experience.
Accept all
Reject all
Sub-policy 10
https://dev.tapjoy.com/en/legal/Privacy-Policy:
ENG
Log In
Create Account
Oh no... We can't find the page you are looking for
Seems like you've tried to reach a page that doesn't exist.
Back To Safety
Sub-policy 11
https://unity.com/legal/game-player-and-app-user-privacy-policy:
Legal Information
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
Last Updated: December 4, 2024
Last Edit/ Review: July 3, 2024
1. Frequently Asked Questions (FAQs)
These
FAQs
provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive Privacy Policy (below). They enhance rather than replace the important notices in this Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
What’s new as of December 4, 2024?
On December 4, 2024, we updated our position with LevelPlay from a “Data Processor” to a “Data Controller”. We also made some formatting updates, updated our Third Party Partners list.
The difference between an edit/review and an update is that "updates" involve material changes to our Policy whereas edits are not material or simply indicate a review has occurred. For example, we may make clarifying edits by giving additional examples. When we provide an update, you will receive a notice to accept and read the changes, which are summarized here.
2. Privacy Policy Overview
Unity Technologies and its subsidiaries and
affiliates
(collectively “
Unity
”) offer a variety of products, Services, and websites for Developers and App Users that will be referred to in this Policy as the “
Service
” or “
Services
.” The Policy refers to Unity as “
we
” or “
us
” and to game players / App Users as “
you
.” When we say “
device
,” we mean any device, including desktop, laptop, PC or Mac computers, smartphones, tablets, or any other device that is used to access or interact with the Service. When we say “
Developer
,” or “
Publisher”
we mean a third party that develops and/or distributes a game or other app made with and/or using Unity Services. When we say
“App User”
we mean a game player or person who is using an app made with and/or using Unity Services. When we say
“User”
we mean an App User and people browsing our websites. “Struckd” is inclusive of all Struckd by Unity products. When we say “
Personal Information
” we mean information that identifies you as an individual or relates to an identifiable individual. Personal Information does not include aggregated, de-identified, and/ or anonymized information, i.e., when the information has been transformed so that it no longer relates back to a person's identity.
It is important that you read this Privacy Policy together with any other privacy policy or fair processing notice we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting or processing Personal Information, so that you are fully aware of how and why we are using your Personal Information. To learn about our practices for Developer data, please see our
Developer Privacy Policy
. You can find a link to all privacy notices
here
.
This App User Privacy Policy (this “
Policy
”) will provide you with information on how Unity Technologies (herein “we”, “us”, “our”, or “Unity”) will collect, use, store, share or otherwise handle your Personal Information (as described below) that we are responsible for and collect or receive through your use of applications (“
app
” or “
apps
”) which are owned by third parties but utilize Unity’s technology. This Privacy Policy also applies to Personal Information we collect offline, such as when you call us or interact with Unity in person, such as at an industry event or at a place of business.
Developers use our products in their applications. They may collect Personal Information that we, they, or another party is responsible for. This Policy only applies to your Personal Information that we are responsible for when acting as a data controller and as explained below. As such, please be sure to also read the privacy policy for the application you are using for a full understanding of how Developers use your Personal Information.
3. Information We Collect
Depending on how you interact with Unity (e.g., by contacting us, by interacting with our website) we may collect the following categories of Personal Information:
A. Personal Information we receive from you:
Name & Contact Details
Such as first and last name, title, prefix, email address, telephone number, postal address, country of residence.
Account Information
Such as password(s) you create to access the Service, username/user ID.  For Struckd, this may include your age or date of birth, which we do not store.
Social Network Information
When you log into our Services with a social network account, you may have the option of sharing information, such as the username you use on that network and your friends list or other information that you or the third-party social network choose to share with Unity. By doing so, you understand that the use of shared information will be governed by the social media provider’s privacy policy and this Privacy Policy.
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
In using the Services, such as the Struckd App, a User may upload information such as assets for publication or display on public areas of the App. Please note that any information you post or disclose through these Services will become public and may be available to other Users and the general public.
Information Provided Through Use of Services
In using the Services, such as the Struckd App,Users provide us with various information when they participate in community and forum pages. Please note that any information you post or disclose through these public forums will be available to other Users and the general public.
Biometric Information
We may collect information, including voice data, associated with our Users’ storage of data they collect from you using our tools, such as Safe Voice which may be considered biometric information under applicable laws. For more information on our collection of biometric information, please refer to the Biometric Information section below.
Name & Contact Details
Such as first and last name, title, prefix, email address, telephone number, postal address, country of residence.
Account Information
Such as password(s) you create to access the Service, username/user ID.  For Struckd, this may include your age or date of birth, which we do not store.
Social Network Information
When you log into our Services with a social network account, you may have the option of sharing information, such as the username you use on that network and your friends list or other information that you or the third-party social network choose to share with Unity. By doing so, you understand that the use of shared information will be governed by the social media provider’s privacy policy and this Privacy Policy.
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
In using the Services, such as the Struckd App, a User may upload information such as assets for publication or display on public areas of the App. Please note that any information you post or disclose through these Services will become public and may be available to other Users and the general public.
Information Provided Through Use of Services
In using the Services, such as the Struckd App,Users provide us with various information when they participate in community and forum pages. Please note that any information you post or disclose through these public forums will be available to other Users and the general public.
Biometric Information
We may collect information, including voice data, associated with our Users’ storage of data they collect from you using our tools, such as Safe Voice which may be considered biometric information under applicable laws. For more information on our collection of biometric information, please refer to the Biometric Information section below.
B. Personal Information we collect through your use of our Services or from other sources:
Device Information
Such as information about your devices and your use of our Services. This includes data obtained through cookies and similar technologies, as described in our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
.
IP Address
Our systems automatically collect an IP address when Users access the Service. IP addresses can be used to learn about the general location (e.g., city, state, and country) of the User’s point of access to the web.
Log Information
When you access the Unity website, Services or products that use an aspect of our Service, we may log a variety of technical information (“Log Info”), including but not limited to User ID, device identifiers (including advertiser ID), browser information, session IDs, session token data, authentication token data, unique app installation-specific ID, login data, play session information, and events such as monetization events and/or campaign and app interaction events. To the extent cookies and similar technologies are used to do this, please see our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
.
Cookies and Related Technologies
We collect Personal Information through cookies and similar technologies. For more information on how Unity uses cookies, the types of cookies and other technologies used, and your privacy choices, please see our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
.
Other Information
We may obtain additional information about you from third parties such as marketers, partners, researchers, and others. We may combine information that we collect from you with information about you that we obtain from such third parties and information derived from any other subscription, product, or Service we provide.
Device Information
Such as information about your devices and your use of our Services. This includes data obtained through cookies and similar technologies, as described in our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
.
IP Address
Our systems automatically collect an IP address when Users access the Service. IP addresses can be used to learn about the general location (e.g., city, state, and country) of the User’s point of access to the web.
Log Information
When you access the Unity website, Services or products that use an aspect of our Service, we may log a variety of technical information (“Log Info”), including but not limited to User ID, device identifiers (including advertiser ID), browser information, session IDs, session token data, authentication token data, unique app installation-specific ID, login data, play session information, and events such as monetization events and/or campaign and app interaction events. To the extent cookies and similar technologies are used to do this, please see our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
.
Cookies and Related Technologies
We collect Personal Information through cookies and similar technologies. For more information on how Unity uses cookies, the types of cookies and other technologies used, and your privacy choices, please see our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
.
Other Information
We may obtain additional information about you from third parties such as marketers, partners, researchers, and others. We may combine information that we collect from you with information about you that we obtain from such third parties and information derived from any other subscription, product, or Service we provide.
C. Sensitive Information:
Unless we request it, we ask that you not send us, and you not disclose, any sensitive Personal Information (e.g., social security numbers, information related to racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religion or other beliefs, health, criminal background, or trade union membership) on or through the Unity website, the Services or otherwise to us.
D. Aggregated, De-Identified, and/ or Anonymized Information:
We may aggregate, de-identify, and/ or anonymize Personal Information, i.e., transform the information so it no longer relates back to a person's identity so that it will no longer be considered Personal Information. We do so to generate other data for our use, which we may use and disclose for any purpose.
4. How We Use the Information we Collect or Receive
Below, you will find a table depicting how we use the information we collect or receive through the use of our Services.
Service Provision & Maintenance
Providing the Services*
Analyzing and acting on the analysis of our products such as system and log maintenance, technical and customer support, system debugging.
Carrying out operations and general business such as administering online Services; employee training and managing work activities and personnel generally
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services
Consent, such as:
When we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
When we serve personalized advertisements in Unity Ads.
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Service maintenance, optimizations, & operational improvements
Responding to inquiries
Contextual advertising
Legal obligations, such as when you submit a request to access your personal information
Developers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Social Sharing
Facilitating social sharing, such as through your Struckd account.
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
- Consent, such as:
When you have opted in to sharing your social media account(s) with us.
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Interacting with you on social media through posts
Attributing a contribution to an individual
Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services, such as fulfilling our obligations associated with those who sign up to the Unity Affiliate Program.
Third-Party Social Networks
Promotions & Contests
Allowing you to participate in sweepstakes, contests, or other promotions, such as related to Struckd.
Some of these promotions have additional rules containing information about how we will use and disclose your Personal Information, which we will communicate to you separately
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
- Manage our contractual relationship, such as fulfilling obligations associated with a contest.
- Consent, such as:
When you have opted into relevant marketing communications
When we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
Marketers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Researchers
Third party lead generation services
Personalizing Services
Personalizing our interactions with you and providing you with information and/ or offers. These may be:
Tailored to your interests, shipping history and/ or behavior.
Based on your past usage and/ or preferences.
Delivering content via our Services that we believe will be relevant and interesting to you
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
- Consent, such as
To send you offers tailored to your specific interests, and/or behavior.
When we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Providing tailored Services based on past usage and/or preferences, and such tailoring is based on basic and privacy-non-intrusive segmentation.
Developers
Marketers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Business Reporting
Improving the efficiency of our Services
Identifying usage trends
Determining our promotional campaign effectiveness
Develop new products and Services
Developing, enhancing, improving, repairing, maintaining or modifying the Services and/or assisting our Developers with this activity
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
- Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services.
- Consent such as when we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
- Legitimate Interests, such as developing new Services and/ or products
Developers‘
Marketers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Researchers
Security Purposes
Fraud & security purposes, such as monitoring to detect and prevent cyberattacks or identity theft
Prevention of criminal activity or harm to Users, such as illegal or harmful content being posted on our message boards.
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Comply with a legal obligation
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Securing our services, investigating cyber intrusions, fraud, & abuse.
Protecting our operations, rights, safety, or property
Pursuing all available legal remedies, defending claims, and limiting damages we may sustain
Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services.
Law enforcement
Legal Purposes
Reporting to our Board of Directors as required by the Securities & Exchange Commission.
Audits to verify e.g., that our internal processes function as intended and are compliant with legal, regulatory, & contractual requirements.
Financial & accounting purposes
Complying with laws and regulations. These may be outside of your country of residence.
For other reasons, e.g., to enforce our terms and conditions or licenses; to protect our operations; to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others; to allow us to pursue available legal remedies, defend claims and limit the damages that we may sustain.
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
- Comply with a legal obligation
- Legitimate Interests, such as:
Securing our services, investigating cyber intrusions, fraud, & abuse.
Reporting company progress to key-stakeholders and making decisions on such reporting
Protecting our operations, rights, safety, or property
Pursuing all available legal remedies, defending claims, and limiting damages we may sustain
Law enforcement
Law Enforcement Requests
Cooperating with public and government authorities, including law enforcement. These may be outside of your country of residence
Fulfilling our legal and compliance related obligations, including complying with applicable laws; complying with legal processes; responding to requests from public and government authorities; meeting national security or law enforcement requirements.
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Comply with a legal obligation
Law enforcement
Business Transactions
-In connection with a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceedings). You will be notified of any such business transaction and of possible changes to the processing of your Personal Information in accordance with applicable law.*
[Name & Contact Details] (#nameandcontact)
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Service
Device Information
Biometric Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legitimate Interests, such as:
In pursuing a business transaction
Corporate restructuring
N/A
Emergency & Incident Response
Such as responding to, handling and documenting incidents and emergencies, actively monitoring to ensure adequate incident prevention, response and documentation, sending notifications and alerts in the event of incidents or emergencies
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
- Legitimate Interests, such as
in monitoring, reacting to, and documenting an emergency and/ or incident.
Law enforcement
Incident reporter
Purpose
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Service Provision & Maintenance
Examples of Processing Activities
Providing the Services*
Analyzing and acting on the analysis of our products such as system and log maintenance, technical and customer support, system debugging.
Carrying out operations and general business such as administering online Services; employee training and managing work activities and personnel generally
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services
Consent, such as:
When we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
When we serve personalized advertisements in Unity Ads.
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Service maintenance, optimizations, & operational improvements
Responding to inquiries
Contextual advertising
Legal obligations, such as when you submit a request to access your personal information
Third-Party Sources
Developers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Social Sharing
Examples of Processing Activities
Facilitating social sharing, such as through your Struckd account.
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
- Consent, such as:
When you have opted in to sharing your social media account(s) with us.
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Interacting with you on social media through posts
Attributing a contribution to an individual
Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services, such as fulfilling our obligations associated with those who sign up to the Unity Affiliate Program.
Third-Party Sources
Third-Party Social Networks
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Promotions & Contests
Examples of Processing Activities
Allowing you to participate in sweepstakes, contests, or other promotions, such as related to Struckd.
Some of these promotions have additional rules containing information about how we will use and disclose your Personal Information, which we will communicate to you separately
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
- Manage our contractual relationship, such as fulfilling obligations associated with a contest.
- Consent, such as:
When you have opted into relevant marketing communications
When we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
Third-Party Sources
Marketers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Researchers
Third party lead generation services
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Personalizing Services
Examples of Processing Activities
Personalizing our interactions with you and providing you with information and/ or offers. These may be:
Tailored to your interests, shipping history and/ or behavior.
Based on your past usage and/ or preferences.
Delivering content via our Services that we believe will be relevant and interesting to you
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
- Consent, such as
To send you offers tailored to your specific interests, and/or behavior.
When we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Providing tailored Services based on past usage and/or preferences, and such tailoring is based on basic and privacy-non-intrusive segmentation.
Third-Party Sources
Developers
Marketers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Business Reporting
Examples of Processing Activities
Improving the efficiency of our Services
Identifying usage trends
Determining our promotional campaign effectiveness
Develop new products and Services
Developing, enhancing, improving, repairing, maintaining or modifying the Services and/or assisting our Developers with this activity
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
- Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services.
- Consent such as when we collect Personal Information through our use of cookies and similar technologies.
- Legitimate Interests, such as developing new Services and/ or products
Third-Party Sources
Developers‘
Marketers
Third-Party Social Networks
Unity Partners
Researchers
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Security Purposes
Examples of Processing Activities
Fraud & security purposes, such as monitoring to detect and prevent cyberattacks or identity theft
Prevention of criminal activity or harm to Users, such as illegal or harmful content being posted on our message boards.
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
Comply with a legal obligation
Legitimate Interests, such as:
Securing our services, investigating cyber intrusions, fraud, & abuse.
Protecting our operations, rights, safety, or property
Pursuing all available legal remedies, defending claims, and limiting damages we may sustain
Performance of the Terms of Service Agreement we enter with you to provide the Services.
Third-Party Sources
Law enforcement
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Legal Purposes
Examples of Processing Activities
Reporting to our Board of Directors as required by the Securities & Exchange Commission.
Audits to verify e.g., that our internal processes function as intended and are compliant with legal, regulatory, & contractual requirements.
Financial & accounting purposes
Complying with laws and regulations. These may be outside of your country of residence.
For other reasons, e.g., to enforce our terms and conditions or licenses; to protect our operations; to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others; to allow us to pursue available legal remedies, defend claims and limit the damages that we may sustain.
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
- Comply with a legal obligation
- Legitimate Interests, such as:
Securing our services, investigating cyber intrusions, fraud, & abuse.
Reporting company progress to key-stakeholders and making decisions on such reporting
Protecting our operations, rights, safety, or property
Pursuing all available legal remedies, defending claims, and limiting damages we may sustain
Third-Party Sources
Law enforcement
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Law Enforcement Requests
Examples of Processing Activities
Cooperating with public and government authorities, including law enforcement. These may be outside of your country of residence
Fulfilling our legal and compliance related obligations, including complying with applicable laws; complying with legal processes; responding to requests from public and government authorities; meeting national security or law enforcement requirements.
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Services
Information Provided Through Use of Services
Biometric Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
Comply with a legal obligation
Third-Party Sources
Law enforcement
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Business Transactions
Examples of Processing Activities
-In connection with a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceedings). You will be notified of any such business transaction and of possible changes to the processing of your Personal Information in accordance with applicable law.*
Personal Information Categories
[Name & Contact Details] (#nameandcontact)
Account Information
Social Network Information
Information Uploaded Through Use of Service
Device Information
Biometric Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
Legitimate Interests, such as:
In pursuing a business transaction
Corporate restructuring
Third-Party Sources
N/A
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
Emergency & Incident Response
Examples of Processing Activities
Such as responding to, handling and documenting incidents and emergencies, actively monitoring to ensure adequate incident prevention, response and documentation, sending notifications and alerts in the event of incidents or emergencies
Personal Information Categories
Name & Contact Details
Account Information
Social Network Information
Device Information
IP Address
Log Information
Cookies and Related Technologies
Legal Basis under GDPR
- Legitimate Interests, such as
in monitoring, reacting to, and documenting an emergency and/ or incident.
Third-Party Sources
Law enforcement
Incident reporter
Purpose
Examples of Processing Activities
Personal Information Categories
Legal Basis under GDPR
Third-Party Sources
*
Services Provided Include:
--> User Acquisition
Allows Developers to run ad campaigns to find the most valuable users to keep their application growing.
--> Audience Pinpointer
Allows Developers to optimize advertising campaigns
--> Mediation
Allows Developers to establish rules for how that developer’s partnered ad networks can bid on the developer’s inventory
--> Header Bidding
Allows ad networks to participate in a real time auction for a specific piece of inventory.
--> Unity Ads
Allows Developers to implement advertising in their application.
-->Unity Ads & Analytics product
Allows Developers to implement in-app advertisement placements which will be sold to various demand sources on the Unity network.
--> deltaDNA Predictive Segments
Analytics which creates predictions about user behavior
--> IAP
Allows Developers to integrate their in-game economies with the applicable platforms' in app purchase transaction mechanisms.
--> Unity Player Sign In
Allows App Users to create an account so they have a persistent ID across projects or games/apps.
-> Unity Rewards Offerwall
Allows Users to complete various offers in order to earn rewards in participating Developer applications.
-> Unity Levelplay
Allows Developers to manage and optimize their monetization strategy through mediation.
-> Struckd
Allows Users to create, and play games on mobile and web applications.
**
For more information on our legal obligations, please see section ‘
Other Disclosures
’
below.
***
For more information on disclosure of Personal Information in connection with a sale or business transaction, please see ‘
Other Disclosures
’ below.
5. Sharing Information
Below, you will find an outline of scenarios in which information may be shared using our Services.
Our
Affiliates
, including
ironSource
All purposes described in this Privacy Policy
Developers
Developers using some of our Services including Unity Analytics, will have ongoing access to Personal Information about the App User, including information relating to the users previous purchases, actions completed within their games, and entitlements to be received.
Vendors & Service Providers
We share Personal Information with select vendors and service providers to help us provide our Services such as:
Website & Data Hosting and Analytics
These assist us with operations and general business such as:
Providing the functionality of the Services
Storing and transferring data in a secure manner
Improving and developing new products and Services
Data analytics
Payment Processors
Facilitating financial transactions.
Our payments processors request that we provide you with a link to their privacy statements:
Tilia (used for Struckd Mobile) -
Privacy Statement
Fraud & Security
These assist us with activities such as:
Protecting and securing our systems and Services
Monitoring, investigating, and taking action on fraudulent activity
Professional Services
These provide a variety of services to us such as audit, legal, and financial.
Information Technology
These assist us with infrastructure provision
Law Enforcement or other similar parties
For safety, security, and legal compliance, including:
When we are required to disclose the information in response to legal process (e.g., if we receive a court order, search warrant, subpoena, or similar legal process);
If we believe that the Service is being used in the commission of a crime, including to report such criminal activity or to exchange information with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction;
To protect the vital interests of you, another person or the public, for example when there is a meaningful risk that poses a threat to the safety of you, another person or the public generally; and
In order to protect the rights or property of Unity, including to enforce the terms and licenses that govern the use of the Services.
Advertisers
As discussed in our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
, we may permit advertisers and their agents to use cookies or related technologies within the Service to store information on or read information from your browser or device so that they can optimize their advertising campaigns, including to frequency cap and deliver targeted ads.
Unity Ads
We use Personal Information as discussed in this policy collected from Developers’ apps to place personalized ads in Developers’ apps and elsewhere. This usage will permit other parties, such as publishers and attribution companies, to learn about the devices that received, viewed or interacted with ads. For more information about our partners, please see the section
Unity Ads Privacy Features and Third-Party Partners in Providing Advertising
.
To third parties in the event of a business transaction
Business Transactions
Bidding Partners
We use Personal Information as discussed in this policy with our Bidding Partners for our Mediation Service. For more information about our partners, please see the section
Unity Ads Privacy Features and Third-Party Partners in Providing Advertising
.
Third-party products and Services
As discussed in our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
and elsewhere, we may permit advertisers and their agents to use cookies or related technologies within the Service to store information on or read information from your browser or device so that they can optimize their advertising campaigns, including to frequency cap and deliver targeted ads.
With your consent
We may share your information for other purposes if (i) you direct us to do so or (ii) you consent to such sharing.
Due to your actions
Sharing can happen within our Services and outside it when you take certain actions. For example:
When you share a replay on a social network – depending on your privacy settings at the relevant social network – some users of the relevant social network will be able to see the replay;
When you post comments on our forums, visitors and other forum users will be able to see your username, photo, and comments;
When you publish games on the Struckd, your game and profile will be visible;
When you ask to be matched with another player to play a connected game.
Our
Affiliates
, including
ironSource
All purposes described in this Privacy Policy
Developers
Developers using some of our Services including Unity Analytics, will have ongoing access to Personal Information about the App User, including information relating to the users previous purchases, actions completed within their games, and entitlements to be received.
Vendors & Service Providers
We share Personal Information with select vendors and service providers to help us provide our Services such as:
Website & Data Hosting and Analytics
These assist us with operations and general business such as:
Providing the functionality of the Services
Storing and transferring data in a secure manner
Improving and developing new products and Services
Data analytics
Payment Processors
Facilitating financial transactions.
Our payments processors request that we provide you with a link to their privacy statements:
Tilia (used for Struckd Mobile) -
Privacy Statement
Fraud & Security
These assist us with activities such as:
Protecting and securing our systems and Services
Monitoring, investigating, and taking action on fraudulent activity
Professional Services
These provide a variety of services to us such as audit, legal, and financial.
Information Technology
These assist us with infrastructure provision
Law Enforcement or other similar parties
For safety, security, and legal compliance, including:
When we are required to disclose the information in response to legal process (e.g., if we receive a court order, search warrant, subpoena, or similar legal process);
If we believe that the Service is being used in the commission of a crime, including to report such criminal activity or to exchange information with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction;
To protect the vital interests of you, another person or the public, for example when there is a meaningful risk that poses a threat to the safety of you, another person or the public generally; and
In order to protect the rights or property of Unity, including to enforce the terms and licenses that govern the use of the Services.
Advertisers
As discussed in our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
, we may permit advertisers and their agents to use cookies or related technologies within the Service to store information on or read information from your browser or device so that they can optimize their advertising campaigns, including to frequency cap and deliver targeted ads.
Unity Ads
We use Personal Information as discussed in this policy collected from Developers’ apps to place personalized ads in Developers’ apps and elsewhere. This usage will permit other parties, such as publishers and attribution companies, to learn about the devices that received, viewed or interacted with ads. For more information about our partners, please see the section
Unity Ads Privacy Features and Third-Party Partners in Providing Advertising
.
To third parties in the event of a business transaction
Business Transactions
Bidding Partners
We use Personal Information as discussed in this policy with our Bidding Partners for our Mediation Service. For more information about our partners, please see the section
Unity Ads Privacy Features and Third-Party Partners in Providing Advertising
.
Third-party products and Services
As discussed in our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
and elsewhere, we may permit advertisers and their agents to use cookies or related technologies within the Service to store information on or read information from your browser or device so that they can optimize their advertising campaigns, including to frequency cap and deliver targeted ads.
With your consent
We may share your information for other purposes if (i) you direct us to do so or (ii) you consent to such sharing.
Due to your actions
Sharing can happen within our Services and outside it when you take certain actions. For example:
When you share a replay on a social network – depending on your privacy settings at the relevant social network – some users of the relevant social network will be able to see the replay;
When you post comments on our forums, visitors and other forum users will be able to see your username, photo, and comments;
When you publish games on the Struckd, your game and profile will be visible;
When you ask to be matched with another player to play a connected game.
Other Disclosures
Additional information for those located in the European Economic Area
We also disclose your Personal Information as necessary or appropriate, in particular when we have a legal obligation or legitimate interest to do so, as set out in further detail below.
To comply with applicable law and regulations
This may include laws outside your country of residence, which could give rise to a legal obligation requiring us to process your Personal Information, including:
Civil and commercial matters:
Where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
To comply with Council Regulation (EC) No 1206/2001 of 28 May 2001 on cooperation between the courts of the Member States in the taking of evidence in civil or commercial matters.
Criminal matters:
to comply with requests and orders from EU and EU Member State law enforcement to provide information in relation to a criminal investigation in compliance with applicable local laws, or to take steps to report information we believe is important to law enforcement where so required or advisable under applicable local laws.
Consumer matters:
to comply with requests from competent authorities under EU or EU Member State consumer protection law, such as under Directive (EU) 2019/2161 and its implementing laws in EU Member States.
Corporate and taxation matters:
to comply with our obligations under applicable EU Member State corporate and tax legislation, such as where a national tax law of an EU Member State requires collection of specific transactional personal information for tax purposes.
Regulatory matters:
to respond to a request or to provide information we believe is necessary or appropriate to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as when relevant EU Member State data protection supervisory authorities initiate investigation under the General Data Protection Regulation into our Company. These can include authorities outside of your country of residence.
Compliance and internal investigations:
to comply with whistleblowing requirements under Directive (EU) 2019/1937 and its implementing laws in EU Member States.
Health and safety regulations:
to comply with health and safety reporting obligations in accordance with applicable local laws, such as in relation to accidents involving members of the public on our premises.
Compliance with the Digital Services Act:
(Regulation (EU) 2022/2065) and any other applicable laws.  Note: Unity will provide its users of impacted services with aggregate reporting regarding Unity’s compliance with the Digital Services Act upon the user’s request.
For other legal reasons
For dispute resolution purposes;
To protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others.
Purpose
Purpose
Further Detail
To comply with applicable law and regulations
Further Detail
This may include laws outside your country of residence, which could give rise to a legal obligation requiring us to process your Personal Information, including:
Civil and commercial matters:
Where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
To comply with Council Regulation (EC) No 1206/2001 of 28 May 2001 on cooperation between the courts of the Member States in the taking of evidence in civil or commercial matters.
Criminal matters:
to comply with requests and orders from EU and EU Member State law enforcement to provide information in relation to a criminal investigation in compliance with applicable local laws, or to take steps to report information we believe is important to law enforcement where so required or advisable under applicable local laws.
Consumer matters:
to comply with requests from competent authorities under EU or EU Member State consumer protection law, such as under Directive (EU) 2019/2161 and its implementing laws in EU Member States.
Corporate and taxation matters:
to comply with our obligations under applicable EU Member State corporate and tax legislation, such as where a national tax law of an EU Member State requires collection of specific transactional personal information for tax purposes.
Regulatory matters:
to respond to a request or to provide information we believe is necessary or appropriate to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as when relevant EU Member State data protection supervisory authorities initiate investigation under the General Data Protection Regulation into our Company. These can include authorities outside of your country of residence.
Compliance and internal investigations:
to comply with whistleblowing requirements under Directive (EU) 2019/1937 and its implementing laws in EU Member States.
Health and safety regulations:
to comply with health and safety reporting obligations in accordance with applicable local laws, such as in relation to accidents involving members of the public on our premises.
Compliance with the Digital Services Act:
(Regulation (EU) 2022/2065) and any other applicable laws.  Note: Unity will provide its users of impacted services with aggregate reporting regarding Unity’s compliance with the Digital Services Act upon the user’s request.
Purpose
Further Detail
For other legal reasons
Further Detail
For dispute resolution purposes;
To protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others.
Purpose
Further Detail
6. Our Policies Concerning Children
Unity Struckd
If the user is a child, we may collect and store the below information solely for our internal operations and our legitimate interest:
IP address
Unique Installation-specific ID
Randomly generated User ID
Vendor ID
Device ID
We collect the above information
for internal analytics to understand the service and e.g., why an error is occuring in Struckd or what causes users to engage with Struckd
so that we can send push notification
so that we can make updates to the application without needing to push an update
We may share some of this information with our service providers who we contract with to help us provide our services to you. Please note, while we collect country and birth date, this information is not stored.
Unity Advertising  Services
Developers using Unity’s Advertising Services may offer any of the following three categories of applications: 1) child-directed (Users are likely children), 2) mixed audience (Users are both children and non-children), 3) non-child directed (Users are unlikely to be children). If the application is a mixed audience, the Developer should implement an age-gate where required by law, and send a signal to Unity which indicates that we need to limit data collection, serve non-personalized ads, or otherwise disable the service. The Developer similarly categorizes applications which are specifically child-directed. A child is considered to be any User under the age of consent in their applicable jurisdiction.
In connection with the Ads Service, in the event we receive a signal from a Developer, we reduce our data collection for our Ads Service. In such instances, we will only collect Personal Information listed below. We collect this Personal Information for internal operations and our legitimate interests in providing the Service.
IP address is used to provide a compliant experience suitable for the User’s region.
Unique Installation-specific ID is used for operational purposes related to the serving of contextual advertisements.
User ID is used in connection with providing rewards in exchange for watching an ad. Unity uses a developer-set identification (User ID) to let the Developer know when a User with the User ID has completed the watched the ad and is therefore entitled to receive the in-game reward (coin, gems, etc.).
In connection with the Unity Rewards service, in the event we receive a signal from a Developer, we will collect and maintain a service-specific identifier associated with the Developer’s application in order to enable a service block since the Unity Rewards service is not intended for children.
Our Services are otherwise not intended for children. If you are aware that our Services are otherwise collecting Personal Information about children, please contact us at
DPO@unity3d.com
If you or your parent or guardian have questions about this policy or how we use your personal information, you can contact us at
DPO@unity3d.com
.
7. Your Choices About Unity’s Collection and Use of Your Information
Below, you will find information about your choices regarding Unity’s collection and use of your information through the use of our Services.
A. Unity Ads opt-out
You cannot opt-out of receiving ads in games or apps using Unity Ads, but you can take steps to opt-out of certain personalized ads, within the ad unit, by clicking or tapping the Data Privacy icon.
B. Unity Ads opt-in
In certain jurisdictions, Unity will ask for your affirmative consent before serving you personalized ads. Your consent (and other privacy choices) may be changed at any time within the ad unit by clicking or tapping the Data Privacy icon ​​​​​​
C. Analytics
Developers may choose to install a mechanism to opt-out of analytics.
D. Unity Player Sign-In
You may opt-out of aggregated analytics by clicking the “opt-out” button at the bottom of the screen.
E. Safe Voice
Developers may install a mechanism to opt-out.
F. Unity Rewards Offerwall
Developers should have a User opt-out mechanism. Access and erasure requests can be submitted through
this webform
.
G. Unity Struckd
Users can opt-out of optional data collection and sharing through the settings of the application.
8. Privacy Rights
Depending on the country or state in which you reside, you may have various privacy rights. For more information on the applicable rights in , please choose the appropriate location in Brazil, Canada, European Economic Area (“
EEA
”) and United Kingdom (“
UK
”) , Israel, Japan, Republic of Korea, and U.S.A. (California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia) below:
Brazil
The Brazilian General Data Protection Act provides you the right to:
Confirm Unity's processing of your data;
Access your data;
Correct your incomplete, inaccurate, or outdated data;
Request anonymization, blocking or elimination of unnecessary or excessive data or of data processed in noncompliance with the Brazilian General Data Protection Act;
Port your data to other service providers or suppliers of products;
Delete your personal data when processed with your consent;
Obtain information on the public and private entities with whom Unity shared your data;
Obtain information on the possibility of not providing consent and on the consequences of the denial;
Revoke your consent to the processing of your data when we seek your consent; and
Lodge complaints before data protection authorities.
Canada
The Canadian Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act provides certain rights with respect to your personal data, such as:
Right to Access - You have the right to request Unity provide you with a copy of your personal data.
Right to Rectification (Correction) - You have the right to request Unity to correct any information about you that you believe is incorrect. You also have the right to request Unity to complete information about you that you believe is incorrect.
EEA and UK
The EU and UK General Data Protection Regulations (collectively, the “
GDPR
”) provides certain rights (should they apply to you) in relation to the way in which Unity processes your Personal Information as a data controller. You have the following rights:
Right to Access - You have the right to request Unity provide you with a copy of your Personal Information.
Right to Rectification (Correction) - You have the right to request Unity to correct any information about you that you believe is incorrect. You also have the right to request Unity to complete information about you that you believe is incorrect.
Right to Erasure (Deletion) - You have the right to request Unity to erase your Personal Information, under certain conditions.
Right to Restrict Processing - You have the right to request Unity to restrict the processing of your Personal Information, under certain conditions.
Right to Object to Processing - You have the right to object to Unity’s processing of your Personal Information, under certain conditions.
Right to Data Portability - You have the right to request Unity to transfer your Personal Information that we have collected to another organization, or directly to you, under certain conditions.
Right to Lodge a Complaint - You may lodge a complaint with an EEA data protection authority for your country or region where you have your habitual residence or place of work or where an alleged infringement of applicable data protection law occurs. A list of data protection authorities is available at
https://ec.europa.eu/newsroom/article29/items/612080
. In the UK, you may lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner’s Office (“
ICO
”).
If you do have a complaint, we would appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns before approaching your supervisory body, so please contact us at dpo@unity3d.com if you wish to discuss any complaint.
The Israel Protection of Privacy Law 5741-1981:
Any information provided by you is on a voluntary basis with no legal requirement to do so, but if you refuse to provide such information we may not be able to provide you with the Services. According to the Protection of Privacy Law, each person is entitled to inspect, either himself or through a representative authorized by him in writing or his guardian, any information about him kept in a database.
Japan
The Act on the Protection of the Personal Information of Japan provides certain rights with respect to your personal information, such as:
The right to request a notification of the purposes of use of your personal information
The right to request the disclosure, correction, addition, or deletion of your personal information
The right to request the discontinuation of use or provision to any third party
The right to request the disclosure of the record of provision of your personal information
If you are a resident of Japan and wish to exercise any of the above rights, please email us at DPO@unity3d.com (or contact us at the address indicated in the “Contact Us” section listed below)
Unity Technologies, GINZA SIX 8F, 6-10-1 Ginza, Chuo-ku, Tokyo Japan 104-0061
United States of America
If you are a resident of California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, or Virginia, please see Section 19 “
Additional Information for Residents of California”
, below, for additional information on how we handle your Personal Information and the privacy requests you may make under applicable law.
Below, you will find information on how to access, correct, update, suppress, restrict, or delete your Personal Information, object to or opt out of the processing of Personal Information, withdraw your consent (which will not affect the lawfulness of processing prior to the withdrawal), or if you would like to request to receive a copy of your Personal Information for purposes of transmitting it to another company (to the extent these rights are provided to you by applicable law), you may contact us in accordance with the instructions immediately below, or in accordance with the ‘
Contact Us’
section below. We will respond to your request consistent with applicable law.
In your request, please make clear what Personal Information you would like to have changed or whether you would like to have your Personal Information suppressed from our database. For your protection, we may only implement requests with respect to the Personal Information associated with the particular identifier (e.g., email address, device ID, advertising ID) that you use to send us your request, and we may need to verify your identity before implementing your request. We will try to comply with your request as soon as reasonably practicable.
Please note that we may need to retain certain information for recordkeeping purposes and/or to complete any transactions that you began prior to requesting a change or deletion (e.g., when you make a purchase or enter a promotion, you may not be able to change or delete the Personal Information provided until after the completion of such purchase or promotion).
In the event your request relates to the following Services, you will need to contact the Developer directly as we do not process the Personal Information to which your request relates:
Unity Analytics
Please note: the Developer may have configured privacy settings within the app in order to permit you to: object to profiling, opt-out of further profiling, request deletion (erasure) of Personal Information, or request access to Personal Information.
2.
App Users viewing Unity Ads
Depending on your Developers implementation of privacy tools, you can access the Personal Information collected about your device on a per-app basis by clicking or tapping the Data Privacy icon
on the ad unit. By scrolling through the disclosure, you will either see a dynamically populated paragraph of plain text showing you the Personal Information related to your device from that app or you will see an option to click/tap a link within the text to see the data display. If you object to our maintaining this Personal Information or collecting future app-usage data, you may elect to opt-out of further collection and request deletion of historical data. Please note IP addresses may be maintained in logs for security of our system for our Services running on your device and may continue to be collected.
3.
Unity Player Sign-In
If you are a game player using Unity Player Sign-In and would like to exercise your Privacy Rights, please submit it
here
.
4.
Unity Rewards Offerwall
Developers should have an opt-out mechanism. Access and erasure requests can be submitted through
this webform
.
5. Unity Struckd
Users can delete their data from within the application. Users can submit access requests, please contact us in accordance with the ‘
Contact Us’
section below.
For ironSource Services
To exercise your rights for all ironSource Services, please see the relevant instructions in the ironSource
Privacy Policy
.
For the Tapjoy Offerwall
Please see the relevant instructions in the Tapjoy
Privacy Policy
.
For Services not listed
To exercise your rights for all other Services, please contact us in accordance with the instructions immediately above, or in accordance with the ‘
Contact Us’
section below.
For efficiency, please note the service your request is about.
9. Transfers out of Country of Collection
Unity has implemented and maintains a framework consistent with applicable law for transfers of Personal Information outside of the country of collection, including for transfers out of the UK and/or EEA.
Unity has implemented and maintains a framework consistent with applicable law for transfers of Personal Information outside of the country of collection, including for transfers out of the UK and/or EEA.
Your Personal Information may be stored and processed in any country where we have
facilities
, including
ironSource
which is headquartered in Israel, or in which we engage service providers, such as Google Cloud Platform and Looker, and by using the Services you understand that your Personal Information will be transferred to countries outside of your country of residence, including the United States, which may have data protection rules that are different from those of your country. In certain circumstances, courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies or security authorities in those other countries may be entitled to access your Personal Information.
Where this will involve transferring your Personal Information outside the UK and/or EEA, we ensure a similar degree of protection is afforded to it by ensuring at least one of the following safeguards is implemented:
Adequacy Decisions:
Some non-EEA countries are recognized under the UK GDPR and by the European Commission as providing an adequate level of data protection according to EEA standards (the full list of these countries is available
here
). For example, we may transfer to our affiliates who are located around the world, including Canada, Japan, New Zealand, Republic of Korea, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom.
Standard Contractual Clauses:
For transfers of Personal Information from the UK and/or EEA to third countries, which are not considered adequate under the UK GDPR and/or by the European Commission, we have put in place standard contractual clauses adopted under the UK GDPR and/or by the European Commission to protect your Personal Information. For example, we use Google Cloud Platform’s infrastructure and data centers which are located around the world, including the United States. We rely on both controller-controller and controller-processor Standard Contractual Clauses. You may obtain a copy of these measures by contacting us in accordance with the “
Contacting Us
” section below. “
UK GDPR
” has the meaning given to it in section 3(10) (as supplemented by section 205(4)) of the Data Protection Act 2018.
Japan
For transfers from Japan to countries other than the EEA/UK, we have put adequate measures in place to protect your Personal Information.
The transferees are obligated to comply with equivalent or comparable rules to those under the Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan (APPI) on a continuous basis, and we periodically confirm their compliance. We also periodically confirm any changes to the data privacy regulations of other countries that may affect the compliance measures taken by our overseas affiliates and third-party service providers and take measures such as requesting that they take corrective measures or suspending the provision of Personal Information if any issues arise in the implementation of such compliance measures. We will provide you with further information on the measures we take in this regard upon your request.
10. Retention
We retain Personal Information for as long as is necessary or as permitted in light of the purpose(s) for which it was obtained and consistent with applicable law, for example, for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements. The criteria to determine our retention periods include:
The length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you and provide the Services to you (for example, for as long as you have an account with us or keep using the Services);
Whether there is a legal obligation to which we are subject (for example, certain laws require us to keep records of your transactions for a certain period of time before we can delete them); or
Whether retention is advisable in light of our legal position (such as in regard to applicable statutes of limitations, litigation or regulatory investigations).
Where a legal obligation arises or retention is advisable in light of our legal position, in some circumstances, we will retain certain Personal Information, even after your account has been deleted and/or we no longer provide the Services to you; for example:
To cooperate with law enforcement or public, regulatory and government authorities: If we receive a preservation order or search warrant, related to your Services account, we will preserve Personal Information subject to such order or warrant after you delete your Services account.
To comply with legal provisions on tax and accounting: We may retain your Personal Information after you delete your Personal Information, as required by tax law and to comply with bookkeeping requirements. Please note the length of time may vary by country.
For fraud and security purposes: We may retain your Personal Information for fraud/ security purposes such as IP address, User ID, Device ID, and unique app installation-specific ID, which can be used to investigate whether a specific device exhibits a pattern of abnormal app interaction behavior, which may indicate a malicious bot or fraudulent actor.
To pursue or defend a legal action: We may retain relevant Personal Information in the event of a legal claim or complaint, including regulatory investigations or legal proceedings about a claim related to your Personal Information, or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation (whether in respect of our relationship with you or otherwise) after the dispute has been settled or decided by a court or tribunal from which there is no further right of appeal. The criteria for determining the length of time we will retain this information include:
Whether there is a legal obligation to which we are subject (for example, if the settlement or decision requires us to keep the records for a certain period of time before we can delete them); or
Whether retention is advisable in light of our legal position (such as in regard to applicable statutes of limitations, litigation or regulatory investigations).
11. Security
We employ a variety of measures to safeguard the collection, transmission, and storage of the information we collect. These measures vary based on the sensitivity of the information that we collect, process, and store, and the current state of technology. Please note that no system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure. Therefore, while we strive to employ reasonable protections for your information that are appropriate to its sensitivity, we cannot guarantee or warrant the security of the information you share with us and we cannot be responsible for the theft, destruction, loss or inadvertent disclosure of your information. Where we have given you (or where you have chosen) a password which enables you to access certain parts of our site, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not to share a password with anyone. We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected Personal Information breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where we are legally required to do so.
If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is no longer secure, please immediately notify us in accordance with the
“Contact Us”
section below
12. Biometric Information
Please note, Unity is a data processor for information uploaded through Safe Voice, which, depending on legal interpretation, may be considered biometric data. The following Section contains legal information which is only applicable under U.S. Law.
Your use of certain features may result in the collection of biometric information. Biometric information is any information based on an individual's biometric identifier used to identify an individual. Biometric information that may be collected depending on how you use Unity's products includes voice recordings. For example, if you are using Unity Safe Voice for in-app voice communication, that may be considered to be collecting biometric information under applicable laws.
We use commercially reasonable organizational, technical, and administrative methods designed to protect biometric information within our organization.
We retain biometric information for as long as needed or permitted in light of the purposes stated in this policy, unless a longer retention period is permitted or required by applicable law. For more information on the criteria used to determine our retention periods, please see the "
Retention
" section in our Privacy Policy.
We will destroy or dispose of your biometric information as required by applicable law. For example, we may destroy electronic records of biometric information through such processes as overwriting magnetic media, degaussing, or physical destruction, and we may dispose of paper records by such processes as shredding or incineration.
Please note you may need to make your request for deletion through Unity’s customer as we may need our customer’s assistance to locate your account.
13. Unity Ads Privacy Features and Third Party Partners in Providing Advertising
Privacy Features
If Unity delivers personalized advertising through its ad network, Unity will provide notice and information about how you may be able to opt-out of such personalized advertisements. Please note that the limitations available to you are determined by the laws within your jurisdiction and the tools the Developer chooses to implement. Such an opportunity to opt out may occur through your device settings (see the section “Information and choices regarding tracking and targeting on mobile devices” in our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
and the choices available within the ad unit as described in this Policy by accessing the Data Privacy icon in the ad unit.
Developer Advertising Using Other Ad Networks
Developers may use other third-party advertising networks, and Unity’s choice features within its ad units only apply to ads delivered in the Unity network.
Please note that the Developer of the app showing Unity Ads may have limited choices in providing certain identifying information, including your device advertising ID, about you to our third-party partners advertising goods and services with Unity. You may still see ads from the partners listed below, but they will not be based on your Personal Information. Additionally, you may have opted-out of profiling in Unity’s ad network within a Unity Ad for your app, in which case we will only serve contextual ads from ourselves and these partners within your app. For all others, please review the following information:
Third Party Ad Network Partners
The following third-party partners may receive an ad request from Unity containing your Personal Information. This list may be updated from time to time. These partners use this information to build your profile and personalize your ad experience to serve future ads you may see on the internet as well as inside the Unity ad network. The privacy policies linked below provide you with information around the Personal Information that they have from all sources, including Unity, and your data protection rights under applicable law in relation to the processing of your Personal Information.
Aarki
,
AdColony
,
Adikteev
,
Admazing
,
AdMaxim
,
Admix
,
AdMixer
,
Adtiming
,
Advlion
,
Affle
,
AlgoBluesea
,
Algorix
,
Appier
,
Appreciate
,
apptimus
,
Beeswax
,
Bidease
,
Bidmachine
,
Bidmatrix
,
BidSwitch
,
Bigabid
,
BigoAds
,
Brave People LTD
,
Bucksense
,
Centro
,
Chartboost
,
Clearpier
,
Connekt Media
,
Criteo LLC
,
Dataseat Ltd
,
DiscoverTech
,
Eskimi,
GCMOB
,
Google
(Review the link to AdSettings),
Hybrid.Ai
,
Hyper LLC
,
IGNITE MEDIA
,
Illumin,
Index Exchange
,
InMobi
,
Jampp
,
Kayzen (fka Applift)
,
Kidoz
,
Lifestreet
,
Liftoff
,
LoopMe
,
Magnite
,
MediaMath
,
MeituEve
,
Mintegral
,
MobAvenue
,
Mobupps
,
Moloco
,
MoPub
,
OMS,
OpenX
,
Opera
,
Pangle
,
Persona.ly
,
Playdigo, Inc.
,
Pokkt
,
Pubmatic
,
Pubnative
,
Pubwise, PulsePoint, Inc.
,
Remerge
,
Rhebus,
RhythmOne
,
Rise
,
RTBHouse
,
Samsung,
Se7en
,
Smadex
,
Snap Inc
.,
Spotad
,
SuperAwesome
,
SVG
,
Telaria
,
Tencent
,
TheTradeDesk
,
TopOn
,
Unicorn
,
Vidazoo,
Webeye
,
Wildlife Studios
,
Wish
,
Wof
,
Xandr
,
Xapads
,
Yandex
,
YeahMobi
,
Youappi
and
Zmaticoo
.
Bidding Partners
In addition, Unity’s mediation product shares your Personal Information to the following bidding partners. This list may be updated from time to time. These partners use this information to build your profile and personalize your ad experience to serve future ads you may see on the internet as well as inside the Unity ad network. The privacy policies linked below provide you with information around the Personal Information that they have from all sources, including Unity, and your data protection rights under applicable law in relation to the processing of your Personal Information.
Adcolony
,
Applovin
,
Ironsource
,
Meta
,
Mintegral
,
Snap inc.
, and
Vungle
.
14. Cookie & Advertising Policy
We may collect Personal Information through the use of cookies and similar technologies. For more information on how Unity uses cookies, the types of cookies and other technologies used, and your privacy choices, please see our
Cookie & Advertising Policy
To update your cookie preferences, please select "Cookie Settings" at the bottom of the web page or click the shield icon.
15. Sites and Services Operated by Others
The Unity Service may contain links to other sites, applications, and services. Because Unity does not operate those other sites, applications, and services, we cannot take responsibility for the privacy practices of the entities that operate them. We recommend that you consistently check privacy policies to understand an operator’s practices. As a reminder, this Privacy Policy describes Unity’s practices.
This Privacy Policy does not address, and we are not responsible for, the privacy, information, or other practices of any third parties, including any third party operating any website or service to which the Services link. The inclusion of a link on the Services does not imply endorsement of the linked site or service by us or by our affiliates.
The Services may provide functionality allowing you to make payments to us using third-party payment services with which you have created your own account. When you use such a service to make a payment to us, your Personal Information will be collected by such a third party and not by us, and will be subject to the third party’s privacy policy, rather than this Privacy Policy. We have no control over, and are not responsible for, this third party’s collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Information.
In addition, we are not responsible for the information collection, use, disclosure, or security policies or practices of other organizations, such as Facebook, Apple, Google, Microsoft, RIM, or any other app developer, app provider, social media platform provider, operating system provider, wireless service provider, or device manufacturer, including with respect to any Personal Information you disclose to other organizations through or in connection with the Apps or our Social Media Pages.
16. Other Useful Information
For more information on Unity's policies and other Legal Information, please see our
Legal Information
page.
17. Contact Us
Unity Technologies S.F., located at 30 3rd Street, San Francisco, CA 94103 (United States contact), is the organization responsible for collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Information under this Privacy Policy.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at
DPO@unity3d.com
.
Because email communications are not always secure, please do not include credit card or other sensitive information in your emails to us.
You can contact us as follows:
DPO@unity3d.com
Unity Technologies, 30 3rd Street, San Francisco, CA 94103 (United States contact)
Unity Technologies ApS, Niels Hemmingsens Gade 24, 1153 Copenhagen, Denmark (European Union contact)
Unity Technologies, GINZA SIX 8F, 6-10-1 Ginza, Chuo-ku, Tokyo Japan 104-0061 (Japan Contact)
18. Changes to this Privacy Policy
The “LAST UPDATED” legend at the top of this Privacy Policy indicates when this Privacy Policy was last revised. Any changes will become effective when we post the revised Privacy Policy on the Services.
We reserve the right to change our practices and this Policy at any time. We may also send an email or provide notice within some or all of our offerings when this Policy changes. We encourage you to check this page regularly so that you know what our current practices are.
19. Additional Information for Residents of California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, Virginia, Florida, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Delaware, Iowa, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, and Tennessee.
Collection, Disclosure, Sharing, and Sale of Personal Information
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, Virginia, Florida, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Delaware, Iowa, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, and Tennessee residents have certain rights under state privacy laws with respect to personal data we collect. If you are a resident of such states, this section of the privacy policy contains disclosures required by law and explains rights that may be available to you depending on the applicable jurisdiction.
The following chart details which categories of Personal Information we collect and process, as well as which categories of Personal Information we disclose to third parties for our operational business purposes, including within the 12 months preceding the date this Privacy Policy was last updated. The chart also details the categories of Personal Information that we “sell” or “share” for purposes of cross-context behavioral or targeted advertising, including within the preceding 12 months. You may view our CCPA Transparency Report at
https://unity.com/legal/privacy-report
. This report provides details on our responses to requests to access, delete or opt-out under CCPA.
Identifiers, such as name, signature, contact information, online identifiers, and government-issued ID numbers
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
ad networks
ad networks
Personal information as defined in the California customer records law, such as name, contact information, payment card number, financial information, medical information, insurance information, education information, employment information, and government-issued ID numbers
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; Asset Store Sellers; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
none
none
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law, such as sex, age, race, disability, and marital status
affiliates; service providers; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
none
none
Commercial Information, such as transaction information and purchase history
affiliates; service providers; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
none
none
Biometric information, such as scans of hand and face geometry
affiliates; service providers; legal authorities
none
none
Internet or network activity information, such as browsing history and interactions with our Services
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
ad networks
ad networks
Geolocation Data, such as approximate location derived from IP address
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
ad networks
ad networks
Audio/Video Data. Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information, such as call and video recordings
affiliates; service providers; marketing partners; legal authorities
none
none
Education Information subject to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act such as student records, directory information
affiliates; service providers; legal authorities
none
none
Employment Information. Professional or employment-related information, such as work history and prior employer
affiliates; service providers; legal authorities
none
none
Inferences drawn from any of the Personal Information listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences or characteristics
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
ad networks
ad networks
Categories of Personal Information
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Identifiers, such as name, signature, contact information, online identifiers, and government-issued ID numbers
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
ad networks
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
ad networks
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Personal information as defined in the California customer records law, such as name, contact information, payment card number, financial information, medical information, insurance information, education information, employment information, and government-issued ID numbers
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; Asset Store Sellers; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
none
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
none
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law, such as sex, age, race, disability, and marital status
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
none
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
none
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Commercial Information, such as transaction information and purchase history
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
none
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
none
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Biometric information, such as scans of hand and face geometry
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
none
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
none
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Internet or network activity information, such as browsing history and interactions with our Services
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
ad networks
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
ad networks
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Geolocation Data, such as approximate location derived from IP address
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
ad networks
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
ad networks
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Audio/Video Data. Audio, electronic, visual, and similar information, such as call and video recordings
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; marketing partners; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
none
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
none
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Education Information subject to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act such as student records, directory information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
none
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
none
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Employment Information. Professional or employment-related information, such as work history and prior employer
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
none
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
none
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Inferences drawn from any of the Personal Information listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences or characteristics
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
affiliates; service providers; ad networks; social networks; marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
ad networks
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
ad networks
Categories of Personal Information
Disclosed to Which Categories of Third Parties for Operational Business Purposes
Shared with Which Categories of Third Parties for Cross-Context Behavioral or Targeted Advertising
Sold to Which Categories of Third Parties
Personal Information that reveals an individual’s social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number; account log-in, financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account; precise geolocation; racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, citizenship, immigration status, or union membership; the contents of mail, email, and text messages unless Unity is the intended recipient of the communication; genetic data;
The processing of biometric information for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual;
Personal Information collected and analyzed concerning an individual’s health;
Personal Information collected and analyzed concerning an individual’s sex life or sexual orientation;
Personal Information collected from a known child.
affiliates; service providers;  legal authorities
none
none
Sensitive Personal Information.
Sensitive Personal Information.
Personal Information that reveals an individual’s social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number; account log-in, financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account; precise geolocation; racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, citizenship, immigration status, or union membership; the contents of mail, email, and text messages unless Unity is the intended recipient of the communication; genetic data;
The processing of biometric information for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual;
Personal Information collected and analyzed concerning an individual’s health;
Personal Information collected and analyzed concerning an individual’s sex life or sexual orientation;
Personal Information collected from a known child.
affiliates; service providers;  legal authorities
none
none
Individual Requests
Subject to applicable law, you may make the following requests:
You may request to know whether we process your Personal Information, and to access such Personal Information.
If you are a California resident, you may request that we disclose to you the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
The categories of Personal Information we collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such Personal Information;
The business or commercial purpose for collecting or sharing Personal Information about you;
The categories of Personal Information about you that we shared (as defined under the applicable privacy law) and the categories of third parties to whom we shared such Personal Information; and
The categories of Personal Information about you that we otherwise disclosed, and the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed such Personal Information (if applicable).
You may request to correct inaccuracies in your Personal Information;
You may request to have your Personal Information deleted;
You may request to receive a copy of your Personal Information, including specific pieces of Personal Information, including, where applicable, to obtain a copy of the Personal Information you provided to us in a portable format;
You may request to opt out of the “sale” of your Personal Information; and
You may request to opt out of targeted advertising, including the “sharing” of your Personal Information for purposes of cross-context behavioral advertising.
Please note that Unity has placed a
California Notice of Rights
on its website to explain how California residents may exercise their privacy rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act. This notice is incorporated into this policy.
We will not unlawfully discriminate against you for exercising your rights under applicable privacy law. To make a privacy request, please contact us at
DPO@unity3d.com
or Unity Technologies, 30 3rd Street, San Francisco, CA 94103. We will verify and respond to your request consistent with applicable law, taking into account the type and sensitivity of the Personal Information subject to the request. We may need to request additional Personal Information from you, such as your email or account information, such as email address/ device type/ device ID where applicable, in order to verify your identity and protect against fraudulent requests. If you make a request to delete, we may ask you to confirm your request before we delete your Personal Information.
To request to opt out of any future sale of your Personal Information, or to opt out of any future sharing of your Personal Information for purposes of cross-context behavioral advertising or any future processing for purposes of targeted advertising, click
here
:
We do not knowingly sell or share the Personal Information of minors under 16 years of age.
Appeal Process
If you are a Colorado, Virginia, Connecticut, Florida, Montana, Oregon, or Texas consumer, and we refuse to take action on your request, you may appeal our refusal within a reasonable period after you have received notice of the refusal. You may file an appeal by contacting us DPO@unity3d.com or Unity Technologies, 30 3rd Street, San Francisco, CA 94103.
Authorized Agents
If an agent would like to make a request on your behalf as permitted under applicable law, the agent may use the submission methods noted in the section entitled “Individual Requests.” As part of our verification process, we may request that the agent provide, as applicable, proof concerning his or her status as an authorized agent. In addition, we may require that you verify your identity as described in the section entitled “Individual Requests” or confirm that you provided the agent permission to submit the request.
De-Identified Information
Where we maintain or use de-identified information, we will continue to maintain and use the de-identified information only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify the information.
Providing Personal Information to third parties for direct marketing purposes
: California residents have the right to request the identity of any third parties to whom the resident’s Personal Information was provided, if such provision was to enable the third party’s direct marketing efforts. If you are a California resident and wish to make such a request, please submit your request to DPO@unity3d.com. Alternatively, you may opt-out of having your personal information shared with third parties for their direct marketing purposes, by emailing us at DPO@unity3d.com.
How we respond to “Do Not Track” signals
: We are committed to providing you with meaningful choices about the information collected on our Services. Our cookie management tool on our website recognizes browser-initiated Do Not Track signals. To learn more about Do Not Track signals, you can visit allaboutdnt.com.
Removal of content
.
Pursuant to California Business & Professions Code section 22581, if you are a resident of California, under 18, and a registered user of the Services, you may ask us to remove content or information that you have posted to the Services by writing to
DPO@unity3d.com
Please note that your request does not ensure complete or comprehensive removal of the content or information, as, for example, some of your content may have been reposted by another user
​
Sub-policy 12
https://unity.com/legal/game-player-and-app-user-privacy-faq:
Legal Information
Game Player and App User Privacy FAQ
Game Player and App User Privacy FAQ
Frequently Asked Questions (FAQs)
Last Updated: November 15, 2022
Last Edit/Review: N/A
These FAQs provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
.They are intended to enhance rather than replace the important notices in the Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
I visit Unity or its affiliates' websites, what should I know?
We collect log info, including IP address and device data, related to your visits to our site. When you post comments on our community pages and forums, other forum users will be able to see your username, photo and comments. When you post, you should assume that all the information you provide is public.
I play a game that was built with or uses certain Unity software, what should I know?
Depending on the software used by the Developer, Unity may collect some or all of the following information about your device: unique device identifiers (e.g., IDFV for iOS devices and Android ID for Android devices); IP address; country of install (mapped from IP address); device manufacturer and model platform type (iOS, Android, Mac, Windows, etc.) and the operating system and version running on your system or device; language; CPU information such as model, the number of CPUs present, frequency, and instruction set support flags; the graphics card type and vendor name; graphics card driver name and version (e.g., “nv4disp.dll 6.10.93.71”); which graphics API is in use (e.g., “OpenGL 2.1” or “Direct3D 9.0c”); amount of system and video RAM present; current screen resolution; version of the Unity Editor used to create the game; sensor flags (e.g., device support for gyroscope, touch pressure or accelerometer); application or bundle identification (“app ID”) of the game installed; unique advertising identifiers provided for iOS and Android devices (e.g., IDFA or Android Ad ID); and a checksum of all the data that gets sent to verify that it transmitted correctly.
Some developers use Unity’s Analytics, deltaDNA services and Ad services, which collect additional information (see FAQs on Unity Analytics, deltaDNA, and Unity Ads below for details); however, our usage of this data is largely for the following purposes.
In serving ads, we try to predict which ads will be of most interest to you based on the games you play and the ads you watch.
For Unity Analytics and deltaDNA, we assist developers to deliver the best game experience for you.
For example, game developers who use our software often standardize certain features to enhance game player experience, such as saving your place in a game. This means that the game level you reached in your last session is where you will begin when you return to the game.
Developers also need our assistance in tracking when you are eligible to redeem a reward within a game, such as when you have completed a challenge and get store credits to purchase new tools to play the game.
In our Unity Analytics and deltaDNA services, some of your data points will also be rolled up into an anonymized, aggregated format to help game developers make decisions about how they support their games.
For example, if a game developer is considering phasing out support for an older version of iOS software, they may look at the total number of players currently using that version of iOS software to determine if they need to support that version in updates. Another use on a per game basis is when a developer analyzes the numbers of players dropping out after a certain level. The developer would use this information to look at the design of their game and re-assess if the game challenge is truly intuitive or needs some additional instruction for players. This allows the developer to enhance the experience and retain the developer’s customers better.
Some Unity developers may collect your information independent of Unity. Unity does not have control over this information. If you want to request access to or deletion of this information, then check each developer’s app settings or website for instructions on how to make a request.
Does Unity collect what the GDPR refers to as “special categories” of personal information about players, such as political, religious, or sexual orientation?
No. Unity does not collect these special categories of personal information.
I play a game that uses Unity Analytics of deltaDNA, what do I need to know?
Unity has collected device information, like IP address and device identifiers, as well as events completed or actions taken within the game, including level, number of credits, time it took you to earn them, metadata about in-game communications and the value and details of purchases. Using our systems, the developer of the game has ongoing access to this data. This collection and use of data makes it possible for your experience to operate as expected by permitting you to do things like redeem rewards you have earned or return to where you left off in a game. Other Unity customers may have access to aggregated reports about game activity in general across a number of games. These reports are based, in part, on your game activities, but do not specifically identify you or your device. The reports described in this paragraph help developers make decisions on optimal methods to run the games they have made for you. For example, the developer may need to know the types of devices running the game to determine how to support game updates on an ongoing basis. Some data collected by Unity Analytics or deltaDNA may be used by Unity Ads for personalized advertising; see the FAQs related to advertising for more information.
I received an ad from Unity Ads, what do I need to know?
Unity Ads has probably collected device information, like IP address and device identifiers, and information regarding the delivery of ads and your interaction with them, all of which may be shared with ad publishers and attribution companies. For clarity, Unity collects the following data: whether you click or tap an ad for a new game, whether you watch the ad or play a game frequently, whether others playing a game like the one you’re playing have downloaded a particular new game, and whether you download and install the new game you see advertised. Where a developer has enabled certain features, Unity Ads may also collect your session information and monetization events. All of this is for purposes of predicting the types of new games that you might like to download. Unity may track additional data about you in the future for purposes of making these types of predictions, and we will notify you prior to new data collection.
Do I have any choices regarding the data collection described above if I do not wish to see personalized ads?
You cannot opt-out of receiving ads in games or apps using Unity Ads, but you can take steps to opt-out of certain personalized ads, within the ad unit, by clicking or tapping the Data Privacy icon .
If you are in the EU and do not wish to be targeted in this manner, the first Unity ad you see in an app (as of May 25, 2018) explains how you can opt-out of data collection in that particular game. You can opt-out then or at any time by clicking or tapping the Data Privacy icon
on any ad you see (the Data Privacy icon will also allow you to access the data that is collected about you in that particular app).
Additionally, all users, regardless of their location, may opt-out of all personalized advertising by enabling privacy features on their devices such as Limit Ad Tracking (iOS) and Opt Out of Ads Personalization (Android). See your device’s Help system for more information. Also where Unity maintains a network-wide profile on you, it will provide you the ability to opt-out of Unity’s personalized advertising on a network-wide basis.
Please note that if your privacy choices indicate that you do not want personalized advertising, and you will receive only contextual advertising. You may also visit the third parties listed in our Game Player and App User Privacy Policy. (at the links we provide) to see the types of data that these parties have about you based on your device’s advertising identifier.
Why provide advertising at all?
A great deal of creativity and resources go into making all games. Developers and publishers can provide free-to-play games because advertising helps cover their costs. Unity tailors ad types and frequency so players have a better experience (for example, by seeing fewer but more relevant ads). This also allows advertisers to serve the most pertinent ads to players.
Does Unity Ads Network Actually Sell Personal Information?
To begin, Unity does not, and will not, provide your personal information in direct exchange for money.
Therefore, in the literal sense, Unity does not sell your personal information. However, the CCPA requires Unity to disclose if it sells personal information and under its expansive definition of “sell”, Unity believes the following activities may constitute a CCPA sale of personal information. When you play a game that utilizes Unity’s Ad Network, the device you are using sends an advertising identifier (called an “Ad ID”) to Unity. Under the CCPA, this Ad ID is considered personal data. Why? Because it may include information on you such as your location, the device you are using, some of the activities you’ve completed in your game and more. We have included more detail and a link to what’s defined as “personal information” below for your convenience. Unity shares the Ad ID with our advertising and publishing partners and sometimes these partners may use this Ad ID to look up information about you. This may include things like your online activities, purchases you’ve made or websites you’ve visited. This is all done to personalize future advertisements you may see. In fact, the whole point is to give the advertiser an opportunity to advertise to you - and specifically to you - with a personalized ad. For this reason, under CCPA, sharing the Ad ID may be a sale of personal information.
I play a game that uses Unity Multiplayer, what do I need to know?
Unity has collected unique device identifiers, IP address (which may be matched to identify approximate location for matchmaking), as well as information regarding games played and match attributes
What are device identifiers (like IDFA or fingerprints) and why do you collect them?
Like many other providers of mobile apps, instead of requiring users to create an account and log in to it each time they access one of our apps, Unity and others using our products may opt to recognize the user’s device through various device identifiers. Device identifiers are also used for functions that require Unity to recognize devices across various apps.
Further Information
If you have any questions not addressed above, please contact us at
DPO@unity3d.com
.
Sub-policy 13
https://vungle.com/privacy/:
This website stores cookies on your computer. These cookies are used to collect information about how you interact with our website and allow us to remember you. We use this information in order to improve and customize your browsing experience and for analytics and metrics about our visitors both on this website and other media. To find out more about the cookies we use, see our Privacy Policy
If you decline, your information won’t be tracked when you visit this website. A single cookie will be used in your browser to remember your preference not to be tracked.
Cookies settings
Accept All
Decline All
Vungle
privacy
Last Updated:
December 17, 2019
Vungle, Inc. and its group companies (“
Vungle
“, “
we
” or “
us
“) respect your privacy. This privacy notice (“Notice”) explains who we are, how we collect, use and share personal information about you, and how you can exercise your privacy rights.
This Notice covers personal information we collect:
when providing the Vungle Ad Services (see
Section 2
); and
when you visit one of our Websites, and in the usual course of our business, such as in connection with our events, sales and marketing activities (see
Section 3
).
QUICK LINKS
We recommend that you read this Notice in full to ensure you are fully informed. However, to make it easier for you to review those parts of this Notice which apply to you, we have divided up the document into the following sections:
1. WHO WE ARE
(applicable to everyone)
2. VUNGLE AD SERVICES
(applicable to End Users)
2.1 What information do we collect?
2.2 How do we use your information?
2.3 How does Vungle use its technology to collect information?
2.4 Your Opt-Out Choices
2.5 How Do We Share Information?
2.6 Privacy Practices of Vungle Clients
2.7 Minors and Children
3. VUNGLE WEBSITES
(applicable to End Users and visitors to our Websites)
3.1 What information do we collect?
3.2 How do we use your information?
3.3 Cookies and Similar Technologies
3.4 How Do We Share Information?
4. GENERAL INFORMATION
(applicable to everyone).
4.1 How do we share your information?
4.2 Your data protection rights
4.3 Additional information for California Residents.
4.4 Legal basis for processing personal information (EEA residents only).
4.5 Third-Party Websites and Apps
4.6 How do we keep your personal information secure?
4.7 Data Retention
4.8 International Data Transfers
4.9 EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Notice
4.10 Questions or complaints.
4.11 Changes to this Notice
4.12 Contact Us
We participate in and comply with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework to cover data we process from the European Union (“EU”). For further information, please review our EU-U.S.
Privacy Shield Notice
1. WHO WE ARE
Vungle is an ad network providing a technology platform (“
Platform
”) for Clients that want to advertise and/or monetize their applications, games, and other products. Our “
Clients
” include “
Advertisers
” that wish to distribute ad content through the Vungle Platform, and “
Publishers
” of applications that want to display relevant ads to end users (“
End Users
“) of third party applications (“
apps
“) that use our SDKs, APIs, hosted video advertising platform and/or any of our related advertising tools (collectively, the “
Vungle Ad Services
“).
Advertising revenue helps keep many games and apps free, and Vungle works hard to ensure that our ads are interesting, relevant, and safe for End Users.
2. VUNGLE AD SERVICES
This Section describes how Vungle collects and uses information we receive from End Users (“
you
“) of apps that use the Vungle Ad Services.
2.1 What information do we collect?
When you use an app supported by Vungle technology (see Section 2.3,
below
, our services can collect certain information about your mobile device. Some of this information (including for example, your IP address and certain unique identifiers), may identify a particular computer or device and may be “personal information” or “personal data” as defined under law in some jurisdictions (including in California and the EU, respectively) (hereinafter, collectively referred to as “
personal information
”). We collect this information the first time Vungle’s SDK is initialized on a Publisher Client’s app. Note, however, that Vungle’s Ad Services do not collect any information that that enables us to identify End Users personally (such as your name, address, or email address).
LEARN MORE
The information we collect includes:
Information about your device
, such as the type and model, manufacturer, operating system (e.g. iOS, Android, etc.), carrier name, time zone, network connection type (e.g., Wi-Fi, cellular), IP address, Vungle SDK version, information about the Publisher Client’s app currently active on your device (but not any other apps), and identifiers assigned to your device, such as its iOS Identifier for Advertising (IDFA), Android Advertising ID (AAID or GAID), or other unique device identifier (a number uniquely allocated to your device by your device manufacturer or Publisher Client’s app).
Information about your behavior on our Publisher Client’s app
, such as information about the activities or actions on those apps, and session start/stop time. Historic versions of Vungle technology may also collect geolocation information (e.g., latitude and longitude co-ordinates), but only (i) if the Publisher Client’s app has enabled location services on your device and (ii) you have granted the Publisher permission to collect this information). However, versions that are current as of the date of this Notice no longer collect geolocation information.
Information about ads served, viewed, or clicked on
, such as the type of ad, where the ad was served, whether you clicked on it, the number of times you have seen the ad, the number of Vungle ads viewed per session, and whether you visited the Advertiser’s website or relevant app store and/or purchased or installed the product or service advertised.
We may also combine and/or enhance the information we collect about your device, including the personal information, with information we may collect about your interactions with other ads served through Vungle’s Platform that you may view on other Publisher Client’s Apps, or with information collected from our Clients and third parties (such as data providers). This may include, for example, mobile device IDs, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on an app to help make the ads served to you more relevant while limiting your exposure to less relevant ads. We (or our third party partners) may also use this additional information to undertake “user matching,” which means that in addition to the ID an End User has been assigned in our system, we may also receive a list of unique IDs our external partners or Clients have assigned to an End User.
2.2 How do we use your information?
We use the information, including the personal information, we collect (sometimes in combination with information provided and sourced by independent validation partners) for a variety of business purposes, including the following:
Serving Ads:
To allow Publishers to offer advertising inventory in their apps, and Advertisers to bid on and display ads in that inventory.
Ad Reporting and Conversions:
: To allow Vungle to confirm with Advertisers information about when and how End Users have been exposed to their ads, clicked on their ads, or visited their website and to ensure accurate billing for advertising services rendered.
Frequency Capping:
Preventing End Users from seeing the same ad too many times.
Customizing Ads:
To customize and more effectively tailor the ads we display to you and to optimize the display of ads (including limiting your exposure to less relevant ads).
Performance Analytics and Optimization:
To analyze and optimize ad performance, such as tracking views of ads, implementing end user “whitelists” or “blacklists” (to ensure, in some cases, that certain ads are being viewed by appropriate audiences), as well as click-through rates to websites or app stores and/or installs of apps that have been advertised.
Fraud Detection and Prevention:
Identifying invalid clicks, installs, or ad queries, and protecting us and our Clients from fraudulent behavior.
Providing and Improving the Vungle Ad Services:
Auditing, researching, and analyzing data in order to provide, protect, and improve the Vungle Ad Services and to ensure that our technologies function properly.
2.3
How does Vungle use its technology to collect information
?
We use our technology (in some jurisdictions, such as the EU, these may be referred to as “tracking technologies”) to collect information automatically from your device to perform many of the functions described in “
How do we use your information?
” above. To opt out of our use of such technologies, please follow the instructions for opting out in the apps, as described in “
Opt-Out Choices
” below.
LEARN MORE
The standard tracking technologies we use include:
Mobile “SDKs” or “Software Development Kits” (including our own SDKs):
These are blocks of code that are embedded into an app allowing Vungle to collect certain information (as described in “
2.1 What information do we collect?
” above relating to your use of apps using our technology. The embedded code from Vungle’s SDK allows the app to “speak” with Vungle’s Platform for purposes of delivering ads.
Mobile device identifiers:
We also use standard device identifiers, for example the IDFA advertising identifier used on Apple’s iOS devices and the GAID advertising identifier used on Android devices, to monitor and improve the performance of the ads we show you.
Third-Party Ad Measurement URLs/Links:
Additionally, in providing the Vungle Ad Services to our Advertiser Clients, the Vungle ads may include URLs or links from the Advertiser Client’s chosen third-party measurement partner to collect information about your interaction with those ads. The information collected is used for ad delivery, reporting, and billing purposes and may also be used for performance optimization.
“Tags and Pixels”:
These are blocks of code that we and our Clients may use to monitor your interaction with apps using our technology. We may use these to synchronize information that we have collected with information independently collected by our Clients and other third party advertising platforms and advertisers that are interested in providing you with ads.
2.4 Your Opt-Out Choices.
You can opt out of having your information being used by Vungle for performance-based advertising by accessing your mobile device settings and following the most recent published instructions. If you limit ad tracking, you will still see advertisements (even ones sourced from Vungle’s network), but Vungle will no longer be able to use the personal information described above in
Section 2.1
to serve you with more relevant ads. In addition, the advertising identifier (along with any information collected about that identifier) that was previously assigned to you will also be disassociated. This means that if at a later stage, you decide to opt back in, we will not be able to use any of your past information for advertising purposes, and you will (for all practical purposes) be a new user to our system. For apps using older versions of the Vungle SDK, you may also stop the collection of location information by particular apps that may allow collection of location of this information by changing the preferences on your mobile device.
2.5 How Do We Share Information?
Please see Section 4.1,
below
for information concerning how Vungle shares the information collected.
2.6 Privacy Practices of Vungle Clients.
Vungle is not responsible for the information practices of our Clients or their agents. We require our Clients to comply with all applicable laws and regulations and to provide End Users with notice of the collection of data for advertising purposes as outlined in this Notice. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of apps you visit for information about those apps’ data collection and use practices.
2.7 Minors and Children.
Our Clients are responsible for ensuring that their mobile apps comply with data privacy protection legislation applicable to minors and children, such as the United States’ Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
“), including where relevant by obtaining parental consent prior to the collection of personal information. With respect to COPPA specifically, we rely upon our Publisher Clients to confirm whether or not their app is subject to COPPA. As required by COPPA, Vungle will enable a flag in our system when a Client indicates their app is subject to COPPA such that the End User’s device history is disassociated, and the only End User personal information used by the Vungle Ad Services would be persistent identifiers (e.g., IP address and device identifiers) to provide “support for internal operations” of the Vungle Ad Services (as permitted by COPPA).
3. VUNGLE WEBSITES
This Section describes how we collect and use Information in the usual course of business, including through our websites (such as
“http://vungle.com”
or any other website on which this Notice is posted) and other corporate services, web portals, and dashboards we make available to our Clients and End Users (collectively “
Websites
“), as well as in connection with our events, sales and marketing activities. This section does not apply to information collection through apps that use the Vungle Ad Services.
3.1 What information do we collect?
Information that you provide voluntarily:
Certain parts of our Websites may ask you to provide personal information voluntarily. For example, when Clients are registering for a Vungle account, expressing an interest in obtaining additional information about Vungle or our products and services, subscribing to marketing or otherwise contacting us, Vungle collects required personal information from you. The personal information that you are asked to provide (and the reasons why you are asked to provide it) will be made clear to you at the point we ask you to provide your personal information. We will also let you know prior to collection whether the provision of personal information we are collecting is compulsory or may be provided on a voluntary basis, and the consequences (if any) of not providing the information. We also collect personal information you otherwise submit to us, such as when you send Vungle an email.
LEARN MORE
The personal information we collect may include contact information (such as your name, address, telephone number or email address) and contact preferences. It may also include professional information, such as your job title, department or job role, as well as the nature of your request or communication. We also collect information you choose to provide to us when completing any ‘free text’ boxes in our forms (for example, for event sign-up, product feedback or survey requests).
Information we collect automatically:
When using our Websites, we may automatically collect certain information from your device or computer. In some countries, including countries in the EU, this information may be considered personal information under data protection laws.Specifically, the information we collect automatically may include your IP address, your operating system, your browser ID, your browsing activity, and other information about your system and connection, and how you interact with our Websites and other websites. We may collect this information as a part of log files as well as through the use of cookies or other tracking technologies, as explained further under the heading “
Cookies and similar tracking technology
.”
Information we collect from third party sources:
We may obtain information about you from other sources, such as public databases, joint marketing partners, data providers, and social media platforms. Examples of the information we could receive from other sources include account information, page-views, and browsing information.
3.2 How do we use your information?
We use the information we collect or receive to:
Send you marketing and promotional communications.
For example, we and/or our third party marketing partners may use the personal information you send to us for our marketing purposes, if this is in accordance with your marketing preferences. However, you will always be able to opt-out of our marketing at any time (see the “
Your Choices
” section above).
Send administrative information to you.
For example, to send you product, service, and new feature information and/or information about changes to our terms, conditions, and policies.
Engage in and process transactions.
For example, we may use your personal information along with financial, credit card, and/or payment information that you provide to us to process your transactions and for billing purposes. Note that Vungle uses third-party vendors to collect and/or process any financial or payment information, and does not itself collect, receive, or process financial or payment information on its own.
Respond to your requests.
For example, we may use your personal information to fulfill your request for a quote or customer support, or to provide you with information you have requested about the Websites or Vungle Ad Services.
Post testimonials.
We post testimonials on the Websites that may contain personal information. Prior to posting a testimonial, we will obtain our consent to use your name and testimonial. If you wish to update, or delete your testimonial, please contact us at
privacy@vungle.com
and be sure to include your name, testimonial location, and contact information.
Manage your account and provide support or other services.
For example, for the creation or administration of your Vungle account, to communicate with you, and to provide you with customer support or other services you have ordered, such as product updates, product patches and fixes and other similar operational communications.
Select content and improve quality.
We may use your information to help improve the Website, Vungle Ad Services, and to ensure that content on the Websites is presented in the most effective manner for your device (for example, by presenting products and offers tailored to you).
Protect the Vungle Websites.
We may use your information as part of our efforts to keep the Websites safe and secure (for example, for fraud monitoring and prevention).
For our business purposes.
We may use your information for our business purposes, such as data analysis, audits, identifying usage trends, determining the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns, and to evaluate and improve our products, services, marketing, and client relationships.
3.3 Cookies and Similar Technologies.
We may use cookies and similar technology (collectively “
cookies
”) on our Websites to collect and process personal information about you. At any time, you may use your browser settings to change your cookie preferences or control use of cookies.  By continuing to browse, you agree to our use of cookies.  We also use Google Analytics to learn more about usage of our Websites. You can learn more about Google Analytics, including how to opt-out, by visiting
here
.
3.4 How Do We Share Information?
Please see Section 4.1
, below for information concerning how Vungle shares the information collected.
4. GENERAL INFORMATION
4.1 How do we share your information?
We may disclose your personal information to the following categories of recipients:
Advertiser Clients.
If you are an End User, we may exchange information with our Advertiser Clients in connection with the Vungle Ad Services for purposes relevant to our business relationships with them, such as for billing purposes, dispute resolution, or fraud prevention, and to help them identify and/or buy our Publisher Client’s advertising inventory. Our Advertiser Clients are obligated to use the information they receive in compliance with applicable laws and regulations.
Attribution Partners and Mobile Measurement Partners.
Acting on behalf of and as third-party agents for our Advertiser Clients, if you are an End User, we may exchange information (such as your mobile device ID) with our Advertiser Clients’ attribution and mobile measurement partners to validate and measure the success of ads delivered via the Platform for billing purposes.
Vendors, consultants and other service providers.
We may share your information with third party vendors, service providers, contractors or agents who perform functions required for the operation of our business. Examples include to provide data storage and processing services, fraud prevention, technical support for our Platform, analyzing data and performing analysis related to the Website, Platform and related services, and delivering content.
Compliance with laws.
We may disclose information where we are legally required to do so in order to comply with applicable law, governmental requests, a judicial proceeding, court order, or other legal process, such as in response to a court order or a subpoena (including in response to public authorities to meet national security or law enforcement requirements).
Disclosures for national security or law enforcement.
Under certain circumstances, we may be required to disclose your personal information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Vital interests and legal rights.
We may disclose information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person, violations of our Terms of Use or this Notice, or as evidence in litigation in which Vungle may be involved.
Vungle affiliates.
Vungle is headquartered in San Francisco, CA, but we have subsidiary and affiliate offices in London, UK; Berlin, Germany; Tokyo, Japan; Seoul, Korea; Beijing, China; and Singapore, Singapore. A list of our group companies is available here
https://vungle.com/contact-us
. We may share information with our parent companies, subsidiaries and/or affiliates for use and processing purposes described in this Notice.
Business transfers.
We may share or transfer information in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company, provided that we inform the buyer it must use your personal information only for the purposes disclosed in this Notice.
Consent.
We may share your information with any other person with your consent to the disclosure.
4.2 Your data protection rights.
Promotional Emails:
You can opt out of receiving promotional emails from us by clicking the “unsubscribe” link in the email, by emailing unsubscribe@vungle.com. If you choose to no longer receive marketing information, we may still communicate with you regarding such things as your security updates, product functionality, responses to service requests, or other transactional, non-marketing/administrative related purposes.
Other Rights (applicable to California and EEA residents only):
If you are a resident of California or the European Economic Area (“EEA”), legislation in your jurisdiction – such as the California Consumer Protection Act (“CCPA”) and the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), respectively – affords you certain specific data protection rights, as noted below. If you make a request, to protect your privacy and security, we will take steps to verify your identity and requests before granting the rights set forth in this Notice.
CCPA rights (California residents)
You can request
access to or ask that we delete
your personal information at any time. Please note that, under certain circumstances, we have the right to impose a small fee for access and disclosure of your personal information where permitted under applicable law, which will be communicated to you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under California law.  For example, we may retain certain information for legal compliance and to secure our Services.
Vungle does not “sell” personal information
within the meaning of the CCPA. Nevertheless, Vungle will honor any “opt-out of sale” requests we may receive from our Clients, and accordingly take reasonable measures to prevent any further downstream sales. Vungle does share personal information as described in this Notice.
If you are a California resident seeking to exercise your CCPA rights, please (i) email us at
CCPA@vungle.com
, or (ii) visit our website and complete the webform to exercise your rights under the CCPA.
GDPR rights (EEA residents)
You can request
access to or that we change, update or delete
your personal information at any time by contacting us at
privacy@vungle.com
. Please note that we may impose a small fee for access and disclosure of your personal information where permitted under applicable law, which will be communicated to you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law. For example, we may retain certain information for legal compliance and to secure our Services.
You can
object to processing
of your personal information, ask us to
restrict processing
of your personal information or
request portability
of your personal information. To exercise these rights email
privacy@vungle.com
.
If we have collected and processed your personal information with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the
right to complain to a data protection authority
about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. Contact details for data protection authorities in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
“) are available
here
.
Please note that because most of the information we store can only identify a particular browser or device, and cannot identify you individually, you will need to provide us with some additional information to enable us to identify the personal information we hold about you and ensure that we accurately fulfil your request.
4.3 Additional information for California Residents.
California law requires us to provide California residents with some additional information regarding how we collect, use, and share your “personal information” (as defined in the CCPA). Throughout this Notice, we discuss in detail the specific pieces of information we collect from you or your device and discuss how we use and share such information.
As described in detail in
Section 2.1
above, we may collect the following categories of information about you through the Vungle Ad Services: device identifiers (such as IP address); internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or app usage); geolocation information; and other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with your device.
As described in detail in
Section 3.1
above, we may collect the following categories of information about you through your use of the Websites: identifiers (such as name and contact information); commercial information (such as transaction data); financial data (such as credit card information through our payment processors); device identifiers (such as IP address); internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or app usage); geolocation information; and other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with you.
We disclose the following categories of personal information for business purposes: identifiers; commercial information; financial data (via our payment processors); device identifiers; internet or other network or device activity; geolocation information; and other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with you.
As described in detail in
Section 2.2
and
Section 3.3
above, we use and disclose the information we collect for the business purposes described in this Notice, including: to provide and improve the Vungle Ad Services and the Websites, for our operational purposes, for the operational purposes of our service providers, for audit purposes, to detect security incidents and prevent fraud, for debugging and repairing errors, to communicate with you, to provide customer service, to market Vungle services, and for other uses that we notify you about.
We may disclose your personal information to the categories of recipients described in detail in
Section 4.1
, above.
4.4 Legal basis for processing personal information (EEA residents only).
If you are an individual from the EEA, our legal basis for collecting and using personal information described above will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we normally rely on our legitimate interest to collect personal information from you, except where such interests are overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process your personal information, they include the interests described in the sections headed “How do we use your information?” above (
Section 2.2
and
Section 3.2
.
In some cases, we may rely on our consent or have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you, or may otherwise need the personal information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. If we rely on consent to collect and/or process your personal information, we will obtain such consent in compliance with applicable laws.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us using the details provided under the heading “
Contact Us
” below.
4.5 Third-Party Websites and Apps.
This Notice only applies to the Vungle Websites and Vungle Ad Services. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or disclosures of websites, developers, or apps that use or access the Vungle Services or Vungle Ad Services. In addition, ads within the Vungle Platform may contain links to third-party websites and apps. Any access to and use of such linked websites or apps is not governed by this Notice, but instead is governed by the privacy policies of those third parties. We are not responsible for the information practices of such third parties.
4.6 How do we keep your personal information secure?
We use appropriate administrative, organizational, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the personal information we collect and process about you. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal information and to help ensure that your data is safe, secure, and only available to you and to those you provided authorized access. Specific measures we will use include hashing and pseudonymization of data prior to storage. However, no electronic transmission over the Internet or information storage technology can be guaranteed to be 100% secure, so you should take care in deciding what information you send us in this way.
4.7 Data Retention.
We retain personal information we collect from you where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to comply with applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements, to enforce our agreements or comply with our legal obligations). When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your personal information, we will either delete or anonymize such data or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
If you are an End User, we typically store the personal information we collect about you, such as your IP address and other information described above, for 13 months from the date of last collection before we delete, overwrite, or anonymize that data, unless we are required to keep it to comply with a legal or audit obligation.
Please contact us at privacy@vungle.com if you have any questions about the information we collect and/or how we use the information we collect.
4.8 International Data Transfers.
The Vungle Ad Services and Vungle Websites are provided, supported, and hosted in the United States. If you are using the Vungle Ad Services and Vungle Websites from outside the United States, be aware that your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by Vungle in our facilities and by those third parties with whom we may share your personal information, in the United States and other locations including London, Berlin, Tokyo, Seoul, Beijing and Singapore, where we have offices. These countries may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country.
However, we have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected in accordance with this Notice. These include implementing the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses for transfers of personal information between our group companies, which require all group companies to protect personal information they process from the EEA in accordance with European Union data protection law. Our Standard Contractual Clauses can be provided upon request. We have implemented similar appropriate safeguards with our third party service providers and partners and further details can be provided upon request. .
4.9 EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Notice.
Vungle, Inc. is located in the United States and participates in and complies with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the US Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from EU member countries in the United States.
Vungle adheres to and will abide by the Privacy Shield Principles of Notice, Choice, Accountability for Onward Transfer, Security, Data Integrity and Purpose Limitation, Access, and Recourse, Enforcement, and Liability when processing such personal information.
Vungle is responsible for the processing of personal information it receives under each Privacy Shield Framework and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. We comply with the Privacy Shield Principles for all onward transfers of personal information from the EU, including the onward transfer liability provisions.
With respect to personal information received or transferred pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks, we are subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose personal information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
For more information about the Privacy Shield, see the US Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield website located at:
https://www.privacyshield.gov
. To review our certification on the Privacy Shield list, see the US Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield self-certification list located at:
https://www.privacyshield.gov/list
.
4.10 Questions or complaints.
You can direct any questions or complaints about the use or disclosure of your personal information to us at
privacy@vungle.com
. We will investigate and attempt to resolve any complaints or disputes regarding the use or disclosure of personal information within 45 days of receiving your complaint.
JAMS (EEA residents only)
If you are an EEA resident and you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider, JAMS, free of charge at
https://www.jamsadr.com/eu-us-privacy-shield
.
Binding arbitration (EEA residents only)
You may have the option to select binding arbitration for the resolution of your complaint under certain circumstances, provided you have taken the following steps: (1) raised your complaint directly with us and provided us the opportunity to resolve the issue; (2) made use of the independent dispute resolution mechanism identified above; and (3) raised the issue through the relevant data protection authority and allowed the US Department of Commerce an opportunity to resolve the complaint at no cost to you. To find out more about the Privacy Shield’s binding arbitration scheme please see
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=My-Rights-under-Privacy-Shield
.
4.11 Changes to this Notice.
Vungle will review and update this Notice periodically and will note the date of its most recent revision above. If we make material changes to this Notice, we will notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes prior to implementing the changes or by directly sending you a notification. We encourage you to review this Notice frequently to be informed of how Vungle is protecting your information.
4.12 Contact Us.
If you have questions about our privacy practices, or would like to make a complaint, please contact Vungle’s Data Protection Officer by email at
privacy@vungle.com
or by post using the details provided below:
Residents outside of the European Economic Area (EEA)
Vungle, Inc.
Attn: Legal
1255 Battery Street, Suite 500, San Francisco, CA, 94111, United States
European Economic Area (EEA) residents
Vungle Limited
Attn: Data Protection Officer
4th Floor, Farringdon Point, 33 Farringdon Road, London, England, EC1M 3JF
Important note:
If you are resident in the EEA, the “data controller” of your personal information is Vungle, Inc.
This site uses cookies.
Read more
Home
Advertise
Monetize
Creative Labs
Creative Team
Creative Tech
Vungle SDK
Liftoff
GameRefinery
JetFuel
The Plug
TreSensa
Blog
Success Stories
News and Events
Resources
Partners
Careers
Support
About Us
Contact Us
An error has occurred, please try again later.
×
We Value Your Privacy
Settings
NextRoll, Inc. ("NextRoll") and our
19 advertising partners
use cookies and similar technologies on this site and use personal data (e.g., your IP address). If you consent, the cookies, device identifiers, or other information can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes described below. You can click "Allow All" or "Decline All" or click Settings above to customise your consent regarding the purposes and features for which your personal data will be processed and/or the partners with whom you will share personal data.
NextRoll and our
advertising partners
process personal data to: ● Store and/or access information on a device; ● Create a personalised content profile; ● Select personalised content; ● Personalised advertising, advertising measurement, audience research and services development; ● Services development. For some of the purposes above, our advertising partners: ● Use precise geolocation data. Some of our partners rely on their legitimate business interests to process personal data. View our
advertising partners
if you wish to provide or deny consent for specific partners, review the purposes each partner believes they have a legitimate interest for, and object to such processing.
If you select Decline All, you will still be able to view content on this site and you will still receive advertising, but the advertising will not be tailored for you. You may change your setting whenever you see the
Manage consent preferences
on this site.
Decline All
Allow All
Manage consent preferences
Sub-policy 14
https://policies.google.com/privacy#infochoices:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 15
https://www.singular.net/privacy-policy/:
Skip to main content
[Live Webinar] Crushing iOS Growth in 2025
[Live Webinar] Crushing iOS Growth in 2025
Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) explains how information is collected and used by Singular Labs, Inc. (“Singular” or “we”, “us”, “our”) and its subsidiaries and affiliated companies.
This Privacy Policy applies to the following:
1. The data practices on the Singular website at https://www.singular.net (“Website”).
2. The data practices relating to the unified marketing data, intelligent insights, and automation services (our “Platform”) that Singular provides its partners and customers (“Businesses”). The Platform offer a Businesses the ability to administer, measure and monitor their mobile advertising activities. Singular’s technology includes a plug-in that Business’s incorporate into their online services (which may be a website or mobile app). With the plug-in, Singular collects and process certain end-user personal data on the Business’s behalf.
3. Our relationship with representatives of our existing and prospective Businesses using our Platform.
We are committed to protecting and respecting data privacy. Please read this Privacy Policy carefully.
Personal Data Processed
We process the information you provide us when you submit an inquiry on our Website.
When you visit our Website, you can submit an inquiry through our online contact forms or through our chat-bot. You can also request a free trial of our Platform. When you contact us, you will be asked to provide information such as your name, work email address, phone number, company name and the subject of your inquiry. We refer to this entire data as “
Inquiry Information
”.
We collect and process your contact information when you engage us to use our Platform.
When a representative of an existing or prospective Business uses or wishes to use our Platform, we collect that representative’s contact details such as name, email, phone number, position and company, Platform login information, and information relating to the engagement between us and the Business which is made with the involvement of the representative. We refer to this entire data as “
Contact Information
”.
You do not have a legal obligation to provide us with your Inquiry Information or Contact Information; however, if you choose to not share this information with us we may not be able to respond to your inquiry or provide you the Platform.
The Platform we provide involves processing information of the Business’s data subjects.
In order to provide the Platform to a Business, we process personal information of the Business’s end-users. We do this as a data processor (also known as a service provider) on behalf of the Business and under the Business’s instructions.
Generally, the Platform processes personal data regarding the behavior and usage patterns of the end-users of mobile applications and other mobile properties operated by the Business. Subject to the Business’s discretion, the personal data processed by the Platform can include, among others, the end-user’s IP address, Apple’s ID for Advertising (IDFA), Google Android ID and Advertising ID for Android (AIFA), carrier user “ID”, and geo-location information.
We refer to this type of data as “
Platform Information
”.
If you are a data subject of the Platform Information (i.e., you are a Business’s end-user), and would like to obtain more information on the collection and processing of your personal data, please contact the Business which is the data controller of your personal data.
We also collect analytics information about your use of the Training Program and Website.
When you visit the Website or the Platform, we record and collect certain information about your interaction with the Website or the Platform, including the IP address from which you access the Website or Platform, time and date of access, type of browser used, language used, links clicked, and actions taken while using the Website or Platform (“
Analytics Information
“).
Data Controller and Data Processor
The Business is the data controller of the Platform Information, and Singular is its data processor.
Each Business is the data controller of its own Platform Information. They determine the purposes and means of processing that data. We only process such data based on their instructions and for the purpose of providing the Platform to them.
Singular is the data controller of Inquiry, Information Contact Information and Analytics Information
Singular is the data controller for the Inquiry Information, Contact Information and Analytics Information, as explained below.
How we process personal data
To respond to and handle your inquiry.
We process your Inquiry Information to contact you about your inquiry and handle your inquiry.
To send you administrative communications.
We process your Contact Information to send you communications and administrative emails, to manage the provision of the Platform to you and to provide you with further information and updates about Singular’s products and technology.
To send you marketing communication.
We process your Inquiry Information and Contact Information to send you marketing communications such as newsletters, know-how articles, webinar and event invitations, and other useful industry information and announcements. We will do so if we believe you might be interested in receiving these communications from us. You may unsubscribe at any time by contacting us via our online contact form available at
Contact Us
or via the unsubscribe link in each marketing communication you receive from us. If you provided your personal email address to us and we believe that you are a representative of a prospective Business, we will use the Inquiry Information and Contact Information to determine your business email address (using third party tools) so that we can communicate with you through your business email address.
To provide and maintain the Website and Platform.
We process your Analytics Information to provide, maintain and improve your user experience when accessing our Website or when using our Platform. We also will use the Analytics Information for quality assurance and for development and enhancement of the Platform.
We also process the Analytics Information to improve our email communications.
We will use the Analytics Information to prevent fraud, resolve disputes, troubleshoot problems, assist with any investigations, enforce our terms of use for the Platform and take other actions otherwise permitted by law.
In order to provide the Platform to a Business, we process Platform Information as a data processor (also known as a service provider) on behalf of the Business and under the Business’s instructions.
Who processes your data
We will not share your information with third parties, except in the events listed below or when you provide us your explicit and informed
consent.
We will process information with our service providers helping us to operate our business.
We will process personal information with the assistance of our service providers as third parties who assist us with the internal operations of the Website and Platform. These companies are authorized to use your personal information in this context only as necessary to provide these services to us and not for their own promotional purposes. These service providers include Amazon Web Services, Inc. and Snowflake, Inc.
Our third parties are obligated to provide the same level of privacy protection.
When we disclose your personal information to third parties, we are liable for those onward transfers. We only transfer data to these service providers for limited and specific purposes under a contract, and ensure that they effectively process the personal information in a manner consistent with our obligations. The service providers are required to notify us if they can no longer meet their requirements, and upon notice take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized processing. We can provide a summary or a representative copy of the relevant privacy provisions of our contracts with these third parties upon request to
privacy@singular.net
.
We will share information with competent authorities, if you abuse your right to use the Platform, or violate any applicable law.
If you have abused your rights to use the Website or Platform, or violated any applicable law, we will share information with competent authorities and with third parties (such as legal counsels and advisors), for the purpose of handling of the violation or breach.
We will share your information if we are legally required.
We will share information if we are required to do so by a judicial, governmental or regulatory authority.
We will share your information with our corporate group of companies.
Because we operate our business as a corporate group of companies, we may also share your information with companies in our corporate group for the same purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. They include:
Singular Labs, Ltd. (Israel)
Singular (UK) Limited
We will share your information with third parties in any event of a change in our structure.
If the operation of our business is organized within a different framework, or through another legal structure or entity (such as due to a merger or acquisition), we will share information only as required to enable the structural change in the operation of the business.
You may choose to opt out of disclosing your personal information or limiting its use.
You may choose whether your personal information is to be disclosed to a third party, or to be used for a purpose that is materially different from the purposes for which it was originally collected. To exercise that choice, send an email to
privacy@singular.net
.
We will never ask you for sensitive information (i.e. medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, etc).
Cookies
What are cookies?
Cookies are text files, comprised of small amount of data, that are saved on your computer or other device (e.g. smartphone, tablet, etc.) when you use the internet and visit various websites.
The information that the cookies maintain is read by the website you visit, during the session of your visit to the website (these are called ‘session’ cookies), and when you return to visit it again (these are called ‘persistent’ cookies). We also use techniques called web beacons and web pixels for purposes similar to the use of cookies.
We use cookies necessary to operate the Website, for website statistics, for marketing purposes and to remember your website preferences.
We use cookies for a number of purposes, as briefly explained below:
Necessary:
Cookies that are strictly necessary for the functioning of the Website. The Website cannot operate properly without these cookies. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the Website may not function properly.
Statistics:
Analytics cookies that help us understand how you and other users interact with our Website by collecting data that does not directly identify you.
Marketing:
Marketing cookies help us to deliver ads that we believe are relevant to you. For example, we may use retargeting cookies to deliver ads you receive when you visit other websites.
You can always delete or disable cookies.
You can always delete the cookies saved on your device through the settings of your computer browser or device. You can also disable cookies for future use through the settings of your computer browser or device.
Security and data retention
We will retain your Inquiry Information, Analytics Information and Contact Information for as long as we need it for business purposes, and thereafter as needed for record-keeping matters.
We will retain Inquiry Information, Analytics Information and Contact Information for the duration needed to support our ordinary business activities operating the Website and Platform. Thereafter, we will still retain it as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, establish and defend legal claims and enforce our agreements.
We will retain Business Information in accordance with the Business’s instructions and only while the Business uses the Platform.
We will retain Business Information pursuant to the Business instructions, and only for the duration needed to provide the Platform to you. Upon the termination of the agreement with us for the provision of the Platform, we will return or delete you Business Information, unless we are required to retain such information under applicable law.
We implement measures to secure your Information.
We implement measures to reduce the risks of damage, loss of information and unauthorized access or use of information. However, these measures do not provide absolute information security. Therefore, although efforts are made to secure personal information, it is not guaranteed, and you cannot expect that the Website or Platform will be immune from information security risks.
International Data transfers
We will internationally transfer information in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
If we transfer your personal data for processing at locations outside your jurisdiction, we will abide by data transfer rules applicable to these situations.
Additional information for individuals in the EU, UK or Switzerland
Singular is the data controller of the Inquiry Information, Contact Information and Analytics Information.
The following is the contact information of Singular as the primary data controller of the Inquiry Information, Contact Information, and Analytics Information:
Singular Labs, Inc.
181 South Park Street, Unit 2
San Francisco, CA 94107
United States of America
Email:
privacy@singular.net
For any additional inquiries, contact Eran Friedman at
eran@singular.net
Legal basis under EU law for processing your personal data.
The legal basis for processing Analytics Information is our legitimate interest in maintaining, developing and enhancing the Website and the Platform.
The legal basis for processing your Inquiry Information for the purpose of responding to and handling your inquiry is our legitimate interests in responding to your inquiry.
The legal basis for processing your Contact Information and Inquiry Information for the purpose of marketing our services or offering the Platform to you is our legitimate interests in developing and maintaining our business relationship with you as a representative of an existing or prospective Business.
The legal basis for processing your Analytics Information for the purpose of handling instances of abusive use of the Platform is our legitimate interests in defending and enforcing against violations and breaches that are harmful to our business.
The legal basis for processing your information where we are legally required to share it, is our legitimate interests in complying with mandatory legal requirements imposed on us.
The legal basis for processing your information in the event of a change in our corporate structure is our legitimate interests in our business continuity.
With respect to Singular’s processing of your Inquiry Information, Contact Information and Analytics Information, you have certain rights to access, update or delete information, obtain a copy of your information, withdraw your consent and object or restrict certain data processing activities.
If you are in the EU, UK or Switzerland, you have the following rights under the GDPR in relation to Singular’s processing of your Inquiry Information, Contact Information and Analytics Information:
Right to Access
your personal data that we process and receive a copy of it.
Right to Rectify
inaccurate personal data we have concerning you and to have incomplete personal data completed.
Right to Data Portability
, that is, to receive the personal data that you provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format. You have the right to transmit this data to another service provider. Where technically feasible, you have the right that your personal data be transmitted directly from us to the service provider you designate.
Right to Object
, based on your particular situation, to using your personal data on the basis of our legitimate interest, including processing your information for marketing communications. However, in cases other than processing your information for marketing communications, we may override the objection if we demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds, or for the establishment, exercise of defense of legal claims. You may also object at any time to the use of your personal data for direct marketing purposes.
Right to Restrict
the processing your personal data (except for storing it) if you contest the accuracy of your personal data, for a period enabling us to verify its accuracy; if you believe that the processing is unlawful and you oppose the erasure of the personal data and request instead to restrict its use; if we no longer need the personal data for the purposes outlined in this Policy, but you require them to establish, exercise or defense relating to legal claims, or if you object to processing, pending the verification whether our legitimate grounds for processing override yours.
Right to be Forgotten
. Under certain circumstances, such as when you object to us processing your data and we have no compelling legitimate grounds to override your objection, you have the right to ask us to erase your personal data. However, we may still process your personal data if it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation we are subject to under laws in EU Member States, the UK and Switzerland, or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims.
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, contact us at
privacy@singular.net
.
We reserve the right to ask for reasonable evidence to verify your identity before we provide you with information. Where we are not able to provide you the information that you have asked for, we will explain the reason for this.
If you are the data subject of the Business Information we process on behalf of a Business, and would like to exercise any of your EU, UK or Switzerland rights, please contact the Business.
You have a right to submit a complaint to the relevant supervisory data protection authority.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority. If you are in the EU, UK or Switzerland, then according to Article 77 of the GDPR, you can lodge a complaint to the supervisory authority, in particular in the Member State of your residence, place of work or place of alleged infringement of the GDPR.
In the United Kingdom, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO)
– Water Lane, Wycliffe House, Wilmslow – Cheshire SK9 5AF
– Tel. 0303 123 1113.
– Website:
https://ico.org.uk/
For a list of national supervisory authorities in the member states of the European Economic Area and their contact information, click here:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
CPRA Information for consumers residing in California
If you are an individual residing in California, we provide you with the following information pursuant to the California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA).
We do not collect, use, or disclose sensitive personal information.
This is the personal information we have collected over the past 12 months when we operate as a “business” under the CPRA:
Categories of Personal Information
Specific Types of Personal Information Collected
Source of Information
Identifiers
Name, work email address, phone number (within Inquiry information, and Contact Information)
Platform login information (within Contact Information)
The consumer themselves
Information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with, a particular individual
Subject of your inquiry (within Inquiry information and Contact Information)
The consumer themselves
Professional or employment-related information
Company name and position (within Inquiry information and Contact Information)
The consumer themselves or the Business they are associated with
Commercial information, including products or services purchased, obtained, or considered
Subject of your inquiry expressing interest in our Platform
Information relating to the engagement between us and the Business which is made with the involvement of the consumer as a representative of the Business
The consumer themselves or the Business they are associated with
Internet or other electronic network activity information
IP address from which you access the Website or Platform, time and date of access, type of browser used, language used, links clicked, and actions taken while using the Website or Platform
The consumer’s device
The following are the CPRA specific business or commercial purposes for which we use each category of personal information. Details about the information we collect for each category are provided in the table above. More details about the business or commercial purposes are provided in the Privacy Policy’s section titled ‘HOW WE PROCESS PERSONAL DATA’:
Categories of Personal Information
Business or commercial purposes pursuant to the CPRA
Identifiers
Professional or employment-related information
Commercial information, including products or services purchased, obtained, or considered
Information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with, a particular individual
Providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information
Auditing related to a current interaction with the consumer who is a job applicant
Processing transactions and verifying customer information
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, prosecuting those responsible for that activity
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration
Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality of the service and to improve, upgrade or enhance the service
Debugging to identify and repair errors
The chart below explains the personal information we disclosed for a business purpose to third parties in the preceding 12 months:
Categories of personal information (under the CPRA)
Categories of third parties to whom we disclose your information and the specific business or commercial purpose for the disclosure
Identifiers
Professional or employment-related information
Commercial information, including products or services purchased, obtained, or considered
Information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with, a particular individual
Internet or other electronic network activity information
With outside legal counsels and authorities, for the purpose of responding to, handling, and mitigating suspected violations of law in connection with our business.
With third parties to which a law or binding order requires us to disclose your information to. Our purpose in doing so is complying with our obligations under the law or the binding order.
With the target entity of our merger, acquisition or reorganization, and legal counsels, and advisors, for the purpose of facilitating the structural change in the operation of our business within a different framework, or through another legal structure or entity (such as due to a merger or acquisition).
The chart below explains about the personal information we shared for online behaviorally targeted ads in the preceding 12 months. Other than this sharing, we have not sold your personal information in the preceding 12 months.
We do not have actual knowledge that we share the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age.
Categories of personal information
Categories of third parties to whom the information is shared for online behaviorally-targeted ads, and the specific business or commercial purpose for sharing
Internet Protocol (IP) address identifier that your device uses to connect to the internet, and mobile device advertising ID
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Location data
Inferences
Advertising networks, to show you ads based on your visit to our Website.
The following rights apply only to a California resident who is not a representative of a Business receiving a product or service from Singular and only in relation to personal information that is not in the context of the Business receiving a product or service from Singular:
Categories of Personal Information
Business or commercial purposes pursuant to the CPRA
Disclosure of Personal Information We Collect About You
You have the right to know:
·  The categories of personal information we have collected about you;
·  The categories of sources from which the personal information is collected;
·  Our business or commercial purpose for collecting personal information;
·  The categories of third parties with whom we share personal information, if any;
·  The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
Right to Deletion
Subject to certain exceptions set out below, on receipt of a verifiable request from you, we will:
·  Delete your personal information from our records; and
·  Direct any service providers to delete your personal information from their records.
Please note that we may not delete your personal information if it is necessary to:
·  Complete the transaction for which the personal information was collected, fulfill the terms of a written warranty or product recall conducted in accordance with federal law, provide a good or service requested by you, or reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform a contract between you and us;
·  Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity; or prosecute those responsible for that activity;
·  Debug to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality;
·  Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise his or her right of free speech, or exercise another right provided for by law;
·  Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act;
·  Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research that adheres or conforms to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when our deletion of the information is likely to render impossible or seriously impair the achievement of such research, provided we have obtained your informed consent;
·  Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with your expectations based on your relationship with us and compatible with the context in which you provided the information; or
·  Comply with an existing legal obligation.
We also will deny your request to delete if it proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort, or if another exception to the CPRA applies. We will provide you a detailed explanation that includes enough facts to give you a meaningful understanding as to why we cannot comply with the request to delete your information.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
If we receive a verifiable request from you to correct your information and we determined the accuracy of the corrected information you provide, we will correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
In determining the accuracy of the personal information that is the subject of your request to correct, we will consider the totality of the circumstances relating to the contested personal information.
We also may require that you provide documentation if we believe it is necessary to rebut our own documentation that the personal information is accurate.
We may deny your request to correct in the following cases:
• We have a good-faith, reasonable, and documented belief that your request to correct is fraudulent or abusive.
• We determine that the contested personal information is more likely than not accurate based on the totality of the circumstances.
• Conflict with federal or state law.
• Other exception to the CPRA.
• Inadequacy in the required documentation
• Compliance proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort.
We will provide you a detailed explanation that includes enough facts to give you a meaningful understanding as to why we cannot comply with the request to correct your information.
Right to Opt-Out of the Sharing of Personal Information
We share your personal information for behaviorally-targeted ads, as explained above. You have a right to opt-out of that sharing. If you would like to exercise your right to opt-out, please send an email to
privacy@singular.net
.
Protection Against Discrimination
You have the right to not be discriminated against by us because you exercised any of your rights under the CPRA. This means we cannot, among other things:
·  Deny goods or services to you;
·  Charge different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use of discounts or other benefits or imposing penalties;
·  Provide a different level or quality of goods or services to you; or
·  Suggest that you will receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
Please note that we may charge a different price or rate or provide a different level or quality of goods and/or services to you, if that difference is reasonably related to the value provided to our business by your personal information.
Disclosures to third parties
California Civil Code Section 1798.83 (and other, similar state statutes) permits our customers who are California residents (or residents of states with similar legislation) to request certain information regarding our disclosure of Personal Data to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, please send an email to privacy@connatix.com. Please note that we are only required to respond to one request per customer each year.
Exercising your rights
If you would like to exercise any of your CPRA rights as described above, you should email us to:
privacy@singular.net
You may designate an authorized agent to make a request under the CPRA on your behalf. To do so, you need to provide the authorized agent with written permission to do so and the agent will need to submit to us proof that they have been authorized by you. We will also require that you verify your own identity, as explained below.
We may ask you for additional information to confirm your identity and for security purposes, before disclosing the personal data requested to you, by using two or three points of the data verification process, depending on the type of information you require.
Data Privacy Framework
We comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.
We have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
We have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC). In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we commit to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to ICDR-AAA, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://go.adr.org/dpf_irm.html
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of ICDR-AAA are provided at no cost to you.
For complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Before you can invoke this binding arbitration mechanism, you must take the following steps:
(1) raise the claimed violation directly with us, and give us an opportunity to resolve the issue within 45 days;
(2) make use of the independent dispute resolution mechanism explained above, which is at no cost to you; and
(3) raise the issue through your Data Protection Authority to the U.S. Department of Commerce and give the Department of Commerce an opportunity to use best efforts to resolve the issue.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
Limited Use Policy in Relation to Google APIs
Our use and transfer to any other app of information received from Google APIs will adhere to
Google API Services User Data Policy
, including the Limited Use requirements.
Privacy Notice in Relation to Children’s Privacy
For children’s privacy information, refer to our Children’s Privacy Notice here:
www.singular.net/children-privacy-notice
Changes to this privacy notice
If we change this Privacy Policy, we will make efforts to proactively notify you of such changes.
From time to time, we may change this Privacy Policy. If we do so, we will make efforts to proactively notify you of such changes. In any event, the latest version of the Privacy Policy will always be accessible at
https://www.singular.net/privacy-policy
.
Last Updated: February 9, 2025
English
Portuguese
Spanish
Korean
Chinese
English
Portuguese
Spanish
Korean
Chinese
Sub-policy 16
https://www.tapblaze.com/about/privacy-policy/privacy-history.php:
This page is a history log of privacy policy changes.
February 23, 2025
Added TapJoy in Ad Serving Technology
View
02-23-2025 policy
August 29, 2024
Added TAPBLAZE ID id section for section jumping via #tapblazid
Removed Kochava as an attribution partner.
View
08-29-2024 policy
January 16, 2024
Clarified CCPA section.
Clarified Ad Serving Technology section.
Made hyperlinks easier to differentiate.
View
01-16-2024 policy
November 11, 2022
Period of personal information retention further outlined.
Procedures and methods to destroy personal information are stated.
Overseas data transfer further outlined.
View
11-10-2022 policy
October 13, 2022
Data Retention section added.
How to Request Data Deletion section added.
Use of Personal Information and Legal Grounds section added.
Added Entrusted Service Providers section
Added GDPR section for further details
View
10-13-2022 policy
October 12, 2022
Changed Children definition to Under 16 for Global. For "Kids Apps" or Age Gate (where age is set to under 16) games, we do not collect personal information, all advertising is CONTEXTUAL.
Moved website information to top of the page to better section web and app/game section of the privacy policy.
Listed items on separate lines when appropriate for easier readability
Clarified non-personal and personal data
Added Firebase to analytics provider section along with their privacy policy
Clarified age limit for TapBlaze ID
Added Registration and Profile details
Added additional Third Party details
Added International Data Transfer section
View
10-12-2022 policy
October 11, 2022
Removed unpublished games (Friday Party Makeover, Hair Salon Makeover, My Donut Shop, My Cake Shop ) from privacy policy.
Ad Serving Technology: Added Applovin, Digital Turbine (Fyber) and Pangle privacy link
Renamed Facebook Audience Network to Meta
Updated Ironsource Privacy Policy link
View
10-11-2022 policy
December 12, 2019
View
12-12-2019 policy